THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 



Other Books by the same Author 



PHILOSOPHY 



THE ANALYSIS OF MIND 

INTRODUCTION TO MATHEMATICAL PHILOSOPHY 

OUR KNOWLEDGE OP THE EXTERNAL WORLD 

AN OUTLINE OP PHILOSOPHY 

SCEPTICAL ESSAYS 

MYSTICISM AND LOGIC 

THE SCIENTIFIC OUTLOOK 



SOCIAL SCIENCE 



PRINCIPLES OF SOCIAL RECONSTRUCTION 

ROADS TO FREEDOM 

JUSTICE IN WAR TIME 

FREE THOUGHT AND OFFICIAL PROPAGANDA 

MARRIAGE AND MORALS 



EDUCATIONAL 



on education: ESPECIALLY IN EARLY CHILDHOOD 
EDUCATION AND THE SOCIAL ORDER 

With DORA RUSSELL: 

THE PROSPECTS OF INDUSTRIAL CIVILIZATION 

With SCOTT NEARING: 

BOLSHEVISM AND THE WEST 



BERTRAND RUSSELL 

THE CONQUEST 

OF 

HAPPINESS 



LONDON 

GEORGE ALLEN & UNWIN LTD 

MUSEUM STREET 

NA.WAB SAVAR JV.riO :>,-,;-! a :.n >w ( 



FIRST PUBLISHED OCIOBSR 1930 

SECOND IMPRESSION NOVEMBER I930 

THIRD IMPRESSION DECEMBER I93O 

FOURTH IMPRESSION MAY I93I 
FIFTH IMPRESSION NOVEMBER 1932 



All rights reserved 

PRINTED IN GREAT BRITAIN BY 
UNWIN BROTHERS LTD., WOKING 



I think I could turn and live with animals, they are so placid 

and self-contained, 
I stand and look at them long and long. 
They do not sweat and whine about their condition, 
They do not lie awake in the dark and weep for their sins, 
They do not make me sick discussing their duty to God, 
Not one is dissatisfied, not one is demented with the mania ot 

owning things, 
Not one kneels to another, nor to his kind that lived thousands 

of years ago, 
Not one is respectable or unhappy over the whole earth. 

Walt Whitman 



PREFACE 

This book is not addressed to the learned, or to 
those who regard a practical problem merely as 
something to be talked about. No profound philo- 
sophy or deep erudition will be found in the following 
pages. I have aimed only at putting together some 
remarks which are inspired by what I hope is 
common sense. All that I claim for the recipes offered 
to the reader is that they are such as are confirmed 
by my own experience and observation, and that 
they have increased my own happiness whenever 
I have acted in accordance with them. On this 
ground I venture to hope that some among those 
multitudes of men and women who suffer unhappi- 
ness without enjoying it, may find their situation 
diagnosed and a method of escape suggested. It is 
in the belief that many people who are unhappy 
could become happy by well-directed effort that I 
have written this book. 



CONTENTS 

CHAPTER PAGE 

PREFACE 9 

PART I.— CAUSES OF UNHAPPINESS 

1. WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 1 5 

II. BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 27 

HI. COMPETITION 45 

IV. BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 57 

V. FATIGUE 69 

VI. ENVY 83 

VII. THE SENSE OF SIN 96 

VIII. PERSECUTION MANIA I 1 1 

IX. FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 1 26 

PART II.— CAUSES OF HAPPINESS 

X. IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 1 43 

XI. ZEST I58 

XII. AFFECTION 1 75 

XHI. THE FAMILY 1 86 

XIV. WORK 208 

XV. IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 219 

XVI. EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 23O 

XVn. THE HAPPY MAN 241 

INDEX 249 



II 



PART 1 
CAUSES OF UNHAPPINESS 



CHAPTER I 
WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

Animals are happy so long as they have health and 
enough to eat. Human beings, one feels, ought to 
be, but in the modern world they are not, at least 
in a great majority of cases. If you are unhappy 
yourself, you will probably be prepared to admit 
that you are not exceptional in this. If you are 
happy, ask yourself how many of your friends are 
so. And when you have reviewed your friends, 
teach yourself the art of reading faces ; make your- 
self receptive to the moods of those whom you meet 
in the course of an ordinary day. 

A mark in every face I meet, 
Marks of weakness, marks of woe 

says Blake. Though the kinds are different, you will 
find that unhappiness meets you everywhere. Let 
us suppose that you are in New York, the most 
typically modern of great cities. Stand in a busy 
street during working hours, or on a main thorough- 
fare at a week-end, or at a dance of an evening; 
empty your mind of your own ego, and let the 
personalities of the strangers about you take posses- 
sion of you one after another. You will find that 
each of these different crowds has its own trouble. 
In the work-hour crowd you will see anxiety, 
excessive concentration, dyspepsia, lack of interest 

»3 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

in anything but the struggle, incapacity for play, 
unconsciousness of their fellow creatures. On a main 
road at the week-end you will see men and women, 
all comfortably off, and some very rich, engaged in 
the pursuit of pleasure. This pursuit is conducted 
by all at a uniform pace, that of the slowest car in 
the procession; it is impossible to see the road for 
the cars, or the scenery since looking aside would 
cause an accident ; all the occupants of all the cars 
are absorbed in the desire to pass other cars, which 
they cannot do on account of the crowd ; if their 
minds wander from this preoccupation, as will 
happen occasionally to those who are not them- 
selves driving, unutterable boredom seizes upon 
them and stamps their features with trivial dis- 
content. Once in a way a car-load of coloured 
people will show genuine enjoyment, but will cause 
indignation by erratic behaviour, and ultimately 
get into the hands of the police owing to an accident : 
enjoyment in holiday time is illegal. 

Or, again, watch people at a gay evening. All come 
determined to be happy, with the kind of grim 
resolve with which one determines not to make 
a fuss at the dentist's. It is held that drink and 
petting are the gateways to joy, so people get drunk 
quickly, and try not to notice how much their 
partners disgust them. After a sufficient amount of 
drink, men begin to weep, and to lament how 
unworthy they are, morally, of the devotion of 
their mothers. All that alcohol does for them is to 

16 



WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

liberate the sense of sin, which reason suppresses 
in saner moments. 

The causes of these various kinds of unhappiness 
lie partly in the social system, partly in individual 
psychology — which, of course, is itself to a consider- 
able extent a product of the social system. I have 
written before about the changes in the social 
system required to promote happiness. Concerning 
the abolition of war, of economic exploitation, of 
education in cruelty and fear, it is not my intention 
to speak in this volume. To discover a system for 
the avoidance of war is a vital need of our civiliza- 
tion; but no such system has a chance while men 
are so unhappy that mutual extermination seems to 
them less dreadful than continued endurance of the 
light of day. To prevent the perpetuation of poverty 
is necessary if the benefits of machine production 
are to accrue in any degree to those most in need of 
them; but what is the use of making everybody 
rich if the rich themselves are miserable? Education 
in cruelty and fear is bad, but no other kind can be 
given by those who are themselves the slaves of these 
passions. These considerations lead us to the problem 
of the individual : what can a man or woman, here 
and now, in the midst of our nostalgic society, do 
to achieve happiness for himself or herself? In 
discussing this problem, I shall confine my attention 
to those who are not subject to any extreme cause of 
outward misery. I shall assume a sufficient income 
to secure food and shelter, sufficient health to make 

b 17 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

ordinary bodily activities possible. I shall not 
consider the great catastrophes, such as loss of all 
one's children, or public disgrace. There are things 
to be said about such matters, and they are important 
things, but they belong to a different order from the 
things that I wish to say. My purpose is to suggest 
a cure for the ordinary day-to-day unhappiness 
from which most people in civilized countries 
suffer, and which is all the more unbearable because, 
having no obvious external cause, it appears in- 
escapable. I believe this unhappiness to be very 
largely due to mistaken views of the world, mistaken 
ethics, mistaken habits of life, leading to destruction 
of that natural zest and appetite for possible things 
upon which all happiness, whether of men or 
animals, ultimately depends. These are matters 
which lie within the power of the individual, and I 
propose to suggest the changes by which his happi- 
ness, given average good fortune, may be achieved. 
Perhaps the best introduction to the philosophy 
which I wish to advocate will be a few words of 
autobiography. I was not born happy. As a child, 
my favourite hymn was: "Weary of earth and 
laden with my sin." At the age of five, I reflected 
that, if I should live to be seventy, I had only endured, 
so far, a fourteenth part of my whole life, and I felt 
the long-spread-out boredom ahead of me to be 
almost unendurable. In adolescence, I hated life 
and was continually on the verge of suicide, from 
which, however, I was restrained by the desire 
18 



WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

to know more mathematics. Now, on the contrary, 
I enjoy life ; I might almost say that with every year 
that passes I enjoy it more. This is due partly to 
having discovered what were the things that I most 
desired, and having gradually acquired many of 
these things. Partly it is due to having successfully 
dismissed certain objects of desire — such as the acqui- 
sition of indubitable knowledge about something 
or other — as essentially unattainable. But very largely 
it is due to a diminishing preoccupation with 
myself. Like others who had a Puritan education, 
I had the habit of meditating on my sins, follies, 
and shortcomings. I seemed to myself— no doubt 
justly — a miserable specimen. Gradually I learned 
to be indifferent to myself and my deficiencies ; I 
came to centre my attention increasingly upon 
external objects: the state of the world, various 
branches of knowledge, individuals for whom I felt 
affection. External interests, it is true, bring each 
its own possibility of pain : the world may be plunged 
in war, knowledge in some direction may be hard 
to achieve, friends may die. But pains of these kinds 
do not destroy the essential quality of life, as do those 
that spring from disgust with self. And every external 
interest inspires some activity which, so long as the 
interest remains alive, is a complete preventive of 
ennui. Interest in oneself, on the contrary, leads to 
no activity of a progressive kind. It may lead to the 
keeping of a diary, to getting psycho-analysed, or 
perhaps to becoming a monk. But the monk will not 

»9 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

be happy until the routine of the monastery has 
made him forget his own soul. The happiness which 
he attributes to religion he could have obtained 
from becoming a crossing-sweeper, provided he 
were compelled to remain one. External discipline 
is the only road to happiness for those unfortunates 
whose self-absorption is too profound to be cured 
in any other way. 

Self-absorption is of various kinds. We may take 
the sinner, the narcissist, and the megalomaniac as 
three very common types. 

When I speak of "the sinner", I do not mean the 
man who commits sins : sins are committed by every- 
one or no one, according to our definition of the 
word. I mean the man who is absorbed in the 
consciousness of sin. This man is perpetually incur- 
ring his own disapproval, which, if he is religious, 
he interprets as the disapproval of God. He has an 
image of himself as he thinks he ought to be, which 
is in continual conflict with his knowledge of him- 
self as he is. If, in his conscious thought, he has 
long since discarded the maxims that he was taught 
at his mother's knee, his sense of sin may be buried 
deep in his unconscious, and only emerge when he 
is drunk or asleep. Nevertheless, it may suffice to 
take the savour out of everything. At bottom he 
still accepts all the prohibitions he was taught in 
infancy. Swearing is wicked; drinking is wicked; 
ordinary business shrewdness is wicked; above 
all, sex is wicked. He does not, of course, abstain 

30 



WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

from any of these pleasures, but they are all poisoned 
for him by the feeling that they degrade him. 
The one pleasure that he desires with his whole soul 
is that of being approvingly caressed by his mother, 
which he can remember having experienced in 
childhood. This pleasure being no longer open to 
him, he feels that nothing matters; since he must 
sin, he decides to sin deeply. When he falls in 
love he looks for maternal tenderness, but cannot 
accept it, because, owing to the mother-image, he 
feels no respect for any woman with whom he has 
sexual relations. Then, in his disappointment, he 
becomes cruel, repents of his cruelty, and starts 
afresh on the dreary round of imagined sin and 
real remorse. This is the psychology of very many 
apparently hard-boiled reprobates. What drives 
them astray is devotion to an unattainable object 
(mother or mother-substitute) together with the 
inculcation, in early years, of a ridiculous ethical 
code. Liberation from the tyranny of early beliefs 
and affections is the first step towards happiness 
for these victims of maternal "virtue". 

Narcissism is, in a sense, the converse of an 
habitual sense of sin; it consists in the habit of 
admiring oneself and wishing to be admired. Up 
to a point it is, of course, normal, and not to be 
deplored ; it is only in its excesses that it becomes a 
grave evil. In many women, especially rich Society 
women, the capacity for feeling love is completely 
dried up, and is replaced by a powerful desire that 

81 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

all men should love them. When a woman of this 
kind is sure that a man loves her, she has no further 
use for him. The same thing occurs, though less 
frequently, with men; the classic example is the 
hero of Liaisons Danger euses. When vanity is carried 
to this height, there is no genuine interest in any 
other person, and therefore no real satisfaction to 
be obtained from love. Other interests fail even more 
disastrously. A narcissist, for example, inspired by 
the homage paid to great painters, may become 
an art student; but, as painting is for him a mere 
means to an end, the technique never becomes 
interesting, and no subject can be seen except in 
relation to self. The result is failure and disappoint- 
ment, with ridicule instead of the expected adulation. 
The same thing applies to those novelists whose 
novels always have themselves idealized as heroines. 
All serious success in work depends upon some 
genuine interest in the material with which the 
work is concerned. The tragedy of one successful 
politician after another is the gradual substitution 
of narcissism for an interest in the community and 
the measures for which lib stands. The man who is 
only interested in himself is not admirable, and is 
not felt to be so. Consequently the man whose sole 
concern with the world is that it shall admire him 
is not likely to achieve his object. But even if he 
does, he will not be completely happy, since human 
instinct is never completely self-centred, and the 
narcissist is limiting himself artificially just as truly 

88 



WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

as is the man dominated by a sense of sin. The 
primitive man might be proud of being a good 
hunter, but he also enjoyed the activity of the chase. 
Vanity, when it passes beyond a point, kills pleasure 
in every activity for its own sake, and thus leads 
inevitably to listlessness and boredom. Often its 
source is diffidence, and its cure lies in the growth 
of self-respect. But this is only to be gained by 
successful activity inspired by objective interests. 

The megalomaniac differs from the narcissist by 
the fact that he wishes to be powerful rather than 
charming, and seeks to be feared rather than loved. 
To this type belong many lunatics and most of the 
great men in history. Love of power, like vanity, is 
a strong element in normal human nature, and as 
such is to be accepted; it becomes deplorable only 
when it is excessive or associated with an insufficient 
sense of reality. Where this occurs it makes a man 
unhappy or foolish, if not both. The lunatic who 
thinks he is a crowned head may be, in a sense, 
happy, but his happiness is not of a kind that any 
sane person would envy. Alexander the Great 
was psychologically of the same type as the lunatic, 
though he possessed the talent to achieve the 
lunatic's dream. He could not, however, achieve 
his own dream, which enlarged its scope as his 
achievement grew. When it became clear that he 
was the greatest conqueror known to fame, he 
decided that he was a God. Was he a happy man? 
His drunkenness, his furious rages, his indifference 

as 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

to women, and his claim to divinity, suggest that 
he was not. There is no ultimate satisfaction in the 
cultivation of one element of human nature at 
the expense of all the others, nor in viewing all the 
world as raw material for the magnificence of one's 
own ego. Usually the megalomaniac, whether 
insane or nominally sane, is the product of some 
excessive humiliation. Napoleon suffered at school 
from inferiority to his schoolfellows, who were 
rich aristocrats, while he was a penurious scholar- 
ship boy. When he allowed the return of the imigris, 
he had the satisfaction of seeing his former school- 
fellows bowing down before him. What bliss ! Yet it 
led to the wish to obtain a similar satisfaction at the 
expense of the Czar, and this led to Saint Helena. 
Since no man can be omnipotent, a life dominated 
wholly by love of power can hardly fail, sooner or 
later, to meet with obstacles that cannot be over- 
come. The knowledge that this is so can only be 
prevented from obtruding on consciousness by some 
form of lunacy, though if a man is sufficiently great 
he can imprison or execute those who point this 
out to him. Repressions in the political and in the 
psycho-analytic senses thus go hand in hand. And 
wherever psycho-analytic repression in any marked 
form takes place, there is no genuine happiness. 
Power kept within its proper bounds may add 
greatly to happiness, but as the sole end of life it 
leads to disaster, inwardly if not outwardly. 
The psychological causes of unhappiness, it is 

84 



WHAT MAKES PEOPLE UNHAPPY? 

clear, are many and various. But all have something 
in common. The typical unhappy man is one who, 
having been deprived in youth of some normal 
satisfaction, has come to value this one kind of satis- 
faction more than any other, and has therefore given 
to his life a one-sided direction, together with a 
quite undue emphasis upon the achievement as 
opposed to the activities connected with it. There 
is, however, a further development which is very 
common in the present day. A man may feel so 
completely thwarted that he seeks no form of satis- 
faction, but only distraction and oblivion. He then 
becomes a devotee of "pleasure". That is to say, he 
seeks to make life bearable by becoming less alive. 
Drunkenness, for example, is temporary suicide; 
the happiness that it brings is merely negative, a 
momentary cessation of unhappiness. The narcissist 
and the megalomaniac believe that happiness is 
possible, though they may adopt mistaken means 
of achieving it ; but the man who seeks intoxication, 
in whatever form, has given up hope except in 
oblivion. In his case, the first thing to be done is 
to persuade him that happiness is desirable. Men 
who are unhappy, like men who sleep badly, are 
always proud of the fact. Perhaps their pride is 
like that of the fox who had lost his tail ; if so, the 
way to cure it is to point out to them how they can 
grow a new tail. Very few men, I believe, will 
deliberately choose unhappiness if they see a way 
of being happy. I do not deny that such men exist, 

35 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

but they are not sufficiently numerous to be impor- 
tant. I shall therefore assume that the reader would 
rather be happy than unhappy. Whether I can help 
him to realize this wish, I do not know; but at any 
rate the attempt can do no harm. 



t6 



CHAPTER II 
BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

It is common in our day, as it has been in many other 
periods of the world's history, to suppose that those 
among us who are wise have seen through all the 
enthusiasms of earlier times and have become aware 
that there is nothing left to live for. The men who 
hold this view are genuinely unhappy, but they are 
proud of their unhappiness, which they attribute 
to the nature of the universe and consider to be the 
only rational attitude for an enlightened man. Their 
pride in their unhappiness makes less sophisticated 
people suspicious of its genuineness ; they think that 
the man who enjoys being miserable is not miserable. 
This view is too simple; undoubtedly there is some 
slight compensation in the feeling of superiority 
and insight which these sufferers have, but it is not 
sufficient to make up for the loss of simpler pleasures. 
I do not myself think that there is any superior 
rationality in being unhappy. The wise man will 
be as happy as circumstances permit, and if he finds 
the contemplation of the universe painful beyond a 
point, he will contemplate something else instead. 
This is what I wish to prove in the present chapter. 
I wish to persuade the reader that, whatever the 
arguments may be, reason lays no embargo upon 
happiness; nay, more, I am persuaded that those 
who quite sincerely attribute their sorrows to their 

27 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

views about the universe are putting the cart before 
the horse: the truth is that they are unhappy for 
some reason of which they are not aware, and this 
unhappiness leads them to dwell upon the less 
agreeable characteristics of the world in which 
they live. 

For modern Americans the point of view that I 
wish to consider has been set forth by Mr. Joseph 
Wood Krutch in a book called The Modern Temper; 
for our grandfathers' generation it was set forth by 
Byron; for all time it was set forth by the writer of 
Ecclesiastes. Mr. Krutch says : "Ours is a lost cause 
and there is no place for us in the natural universe, 
but we are not, for all that, sorry to be human. We 
should rather die as men than live as animals." 
Byron says : 

There's not a joy the world can give like that it takes away, 
When the glow of early thought declines in feeling's dull decay. 

The author of Ecclesiastes says : 

Wherefore I praised the dead which are already dead more 
than the living which are yet alive. 

Yea, better is he than both they, which hath not yet been, 
who hath not seen the evil work that is done under the sun. 

All these three pessimists arrived at these gloomy 
conclusions after reviewing the pleasures of life. 
Mr. Krutch has lived in the most intellectual circles 
of New York ; Byron swam the Hellespont and had 
innumerable love affairs ; the author of Ecclesiastes 
was even more varied in his pursuit of pleasure : he 
28 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

tried wine, he tried music, "and that of all sorts", 
he built pools of water, he had men-servants and 
maid-servants, and servants born in his house. 
Even in these circumstances his wisdom departed 
not from him. Nevertheless he saw that all is vanity, 
even wisdom. 

And I gave my heart to know wisdom, and to know madness 
and folly: I perceived that this also is vexation of spirit. 

For in much wisdom is much grief: and he that increaseth 
knowledge increaseth sorrow. 

His wisdom seems to have annoyed him; he made 
unsuccessful efforts to get rid of it. 

I said in mine heart, Go to now, I will prove thee with 
mirth, therefore enjoy pleasure: and, behold, this also is 
vanity. 

But his wisdom remained with him. 

Then I said in my heart, As it happeneth to the fool, so it 
happeneth even to me; and why was I then more wise? 
Then I said in my heart, that this also is vanity. 

Therefore I hated life; because the work that is wrought 
under the sun is grievous unto me : for all is vanity and vexation 
of spirit. 

It is fortunate for literary men that people no longer 
read anything written long ago, for if they did they 
would come to the conclusion that, whatever may 
be said about pools of water, the making of new 
books is certainly vanity. If we can show that the 
doctrine of Ecclesiastes is not the only one open to 
a wise man, we need not trouble ourselves much with 

SB 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

the later expressions of the same mood. In an 
argument of this sort we must distinguish between a 
mood and its intellectual expression. There is no 
arguing with a mood; it can be changed by some 
fortunate event, or by a change in our bodily 
condition, but it cannot be changed by argument. 
I have frequently experienced myself the mood in 
which I felt that all is vanity; I have emerged from 
it not by means of any philosophy, but owing to 
some imperative necessity of action. If your child 
is ill, you may be unhappy, but you will not feel that 
all is vanity ; you will feel that the restoring of the 
child to health is a matter to be attended to regardless 
of the question whether there is ultimate value in 
human life or not. A rich man may, and often does, 
feel that all is vanity, but if he should happen to 
lose his money, he would feel that his next meal 
was by no means vanity. The feeling is one born of 
a too easy satisfaction of natural needs. The human 
animal, like others, is adapted to a certain amount 
of struggle for life, and when by means of great 
wealth homo sapiens can gratify all his whims without 
effort, the mere absence of effort from his life removes 
an essential ingredient of happiness. The man who 
acquires easily things for which he feels only a very 
moderate desire concludes that the attainment of 
desire does not bring happiness. If he is of a philo- 
sophic disposition, he concludes that human life is 
essentially wretched, since the man who has all he 
wants is still unhappy. He forgets that to be without 
30 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

some of the things you want is an indispensable part 
of happiness. 

So much for the mood. There are, however, also 
intellectual arguments in Ecclesiastes. 

The riven run into the sea ; yet the sea is not full. 
There is no new thing under the sun. 
There is no remembrance of former things. 
I hated all my labour which I had taken under the sun: 
because I should leave it unto the man that shall be after me. 

If one were to attempt to set up these arguments in 
the style of a modern philosopher they would come 
to something like this: Man is perpetually toiling, 
and matter is perpetually in motion, yet nothing 
abides, although the new thing that comes after it 
is in no way different from what has gone before. 
A man dies, and his heir reaps the benefits of his 
labours ; the rivers run into the sea, but their waters 
are not permitted to stay there. Over and over 
again in an endless purposeless cycle men and 
things are born and die without improvement, 
without permanent achievement, day after day, year 
after year. The rivers, if they were wise, would stay 
where they are. Solomon, if he were wise, would not 
plant fruit trees of which his son is to enjoy the fruit. 
But in another mood how different all this looks. 
No new thing under the sun? What about skyscrapers, 
aeroplanes, and the broadcast speeches of politicians? 
What did Solomon ' know about such things? I 

1 Ecclesiastes was not, of course, really written by Solomon, but 
it is convenient to allude to the author by this name. 

3* 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

he could have heard on the wireless the speech of 
the Queen of Sheba to her subjects on her return 
from his dominions, would it not have consoled him 
among his futile trees and pools? If he could have 
had a press-cutting agency to let him know what the • 
newspapers said about the beauty of his architecture, 
the comforts of his harem, and the discomfitures 
of rival sages in argument with him, could he have 
gone on saying that there is no new thing under the 
sun? It may be that these things would not have 
wholly cured his pessimism, but he would have had 
to give it a new expression. Indeed, one of Mr. 
Krutch's complaints of our time is that there are so 
many new things under the sun. If either the absence 
or the presence of novelty is equally annoying, it 
would hardly seem that either could be the true 
cause of despair. Again, take the fact that "all the 
rivers run into the sea, yet the sea is not full ; unto 
the place from whence the rivers come, thither they 
return again". Regarded as ground for pessimism, 
this assumes that travel is unpleasant. People go to 
health resorts in the summer, yet return again unto 
the place whence they came. This does not prove 
that it is futile to go to health resorts in the summer. 
If the waters were endowed with feeling, they would 
probably enjoy the adventurous cycle after the 
manner of Shelley's Cloud. As for the painfulness 
of leaving things to one's heir, that is a matter that 
may be looked at from two points of view : from the 
point of view of the heir it is distinctly less disastrous. 
3« 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

Nor is the fact that all things pass in itself any ground 
for pessimism. If they were succeeded by worse 
things, that would be a ground, but if they are 
succeeded by better things, that is a reason for opti- 
mism. What are we to think if, as Solomon main- 
tains, they are succeeded by things exactly like 
themselves? Does not this make the whole process 
futile? Emphatically not, unless the various stages 
of the cycle are themselves painful. The habit of 
looking to the future and thinking that the whole 
meaning of the present lies in what it will bring 
forth is a pernicious one. There can be no value in 
the whole unless there is value in the parts. Life is 
not to be conceived on the analogy of a melodrama 
in which the hero and heroine go through incredible 
misfortunes for which they are compensated by a 
happy ending. I live and have my day, my son 
succeeds me and has his day, his son in turn succeeds 
him. What is there in all this to make a tragedy 
about? On the contrary, if I lived for ever the joys 
of life would inevitably in the end lose their savour. 
As it is, they remain perennially fresh. 

I warmed both hands before the fire of life; 
It sinks, and I am ready to depart. 

This attitude is quite as rational as that of indig- 
nation with death. If, therefore, moods were to be 
decided by reason, there would be quite as much 
reason for cheerfulness as for despair. 

'Ecclesiastes" is tragic; Mr. Krutch's Modern 
c 33 



«i 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

Temper is pathetic. Mr. Krutch, at bottom, is sad 
because the old mediaeval certainties have crumbled, 
and also some that are of more recent origin. "As 
for this present unhappy time," he says, "haunted 
by ghosts from a dead world and not yet at home 
in its own, its predicament is not unlike the predica- 
ment of the adolescent who has not yet learned to 
orient himself without reference to the mythology 
amid which his childhood was passed." This state- 
ment is entirely correct as applied to a certain 
section of intellectuals, those, namely, who, having 
had a literary education, can know nothing of the 
modern world, and, having throughout their youth 
been taught to base belief upon emotion, cannot 
divest themselves of that infantile desire for safety 
and protection which the world of science cannot 
gratify. Mr. Krutch, like most other literary men, 
is obsessed with the idea that science has not fulfilled 
its promises. He does not, of course, tell us what 
these promises were, but he seems to think that 
sixty years ago men like Darwin and Huxley ex- 
pected something of science which it has not given. 
I think this is an entire delusion, fostered by those 
writers and clergymen who do not wish their special- 
ties to be thought of little value. That the world 
contains many pessimists at the present moment is 
true. There have always been many pessimists 
whenever there have been many people whose 
income has diminished. Mr. Krutch, it is true, 
is an American, and American incomes, on the 
34 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

whole, have been increased by the War, but through- 
out the Continent of Europe the intellectual classes 
have suffered terribly, while the War itself gave 
everyone a sense of instability. Such social causes 
have a great deal more to do with the mood of an 
epoch than has its theory as to the nature of the 
world. Few ages have been more despairing than 
the thirteenth century, although that faith which 
Mr. Krutch so regrets was then firmly entertained by 
everyone except the Emperor and a few great 
Italian nobles. Thus Roger Bacon says: "For more 
sins reign in these days of ours than in any past 
age, and sin is incompatible with wisdom. Let us 
see all conditions in the world, and consider them 
diligently everywhere : we shall find boundlesss cor- 
ruption, and first of all in the Head. . . . Lechery 
dishonours the whole court, and gluttony is lord of 
all. ... If then this is done in the Head, how is it 
in the members? See the prelates: how they hunt 
after money and neglect the cure of souls. . . . Let 
us consider the Religious Orders: I exclude none 
from what I say. See how far they are fallen, one and 
all, from their right state; and the new Orders 
(of Friars) are already horribly decayed from their 
first dignity. The whole clergy is intent upon pride, 
lechery, and avarice: and wheresoever clerks are 
gathered together, as at Paris and Oxford, they 
scandalize the whole laity with their wars and 
quarrels and other vices. . . . None care what is 
done, or how, by hook or by crook, provided only 

3f> 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS • 

that each can fulfil his lust." Concerning the pagan 
sages of antiquity, he says : "Their lives were beyond 
all comparison better than ours, both in all decency 
and in contempt of the world, with all its delights 
and riches and honours ; as all men may read in the 
works of Aristotle, Seneca, Tully, Avicenna, Alfara- 
bius, Plato, Socrates, and others ; and so it was that 
they attained to the secrets of wisdom and found 
out all knowledge." 1 Roger Bacon's opinion was 
that of all his literary contemporaries, not one of 
whom liked the age in which he found himself. 
I do not for a moment believe that this pessimism 
had any metaphysical cause. Its causes were war, 
poverty, and violence. 

One of Mr. Krutch's most pathetic chapters deals 
with the subject of love. It appears that the Vic- 
torians thought very highly of it, but that we with 
our modern sophistication have come to see through 
it. "For the more skeptical of the Victorians, love 
performed some of the functions of the God whom 
they had lost. Faced with it, many of even the 
most hard-headed turned, for the moment, mysticsfc 
They found themselves in the presence of something 
which awoke in them that sense of reverence which 
nothing else claimed, and something to which they 
felt, even in the very depth of their being, that an 
unquestioning loyalty was due. For them love, like 
God, demanded all sacrifices; but like Him, also, 
it rewarded the believer by investing all the phe- 

< Quoted from Coulton's From St. Francis to Dante, p. 57. 
36 



BYRONIG UNHAPPINESS 

nomena of life with a meaning not yet analysed 
away. We have grown used — more than they — to 
a Godless universe, but we are not yet accustomed 
to one which is loveless as well, and only when we 
have so become shall we realize what atheism 
really means." It is curious how different the 
Victorian age looks to the young of our time from 
what it seemed when one was living in it. I remember 
two old ladies, both typical of certain aspects of 
the period, whom I knew well in my youth. One 
was a Puritan, and the other a Voltairean. The 
former regretted that so much poetry deals with 
love, which, she maintained, is an uninteresting 
subject. The latter remarked: "Nobody can say 
anything against me, but I always say that it is 
not so bad to break the seventh commandment as 
the sixth, because at any rate it requires the consent 
of the other party." Neither of these views was quite 
like what Mr. Krutch presents as typically Victorian. 
His ideas are derived evidently from certain writers 
who were by no means in harmony with their 
environment. The best example, I suppose, is 
Robert Browning. I cannot, however, resist the 
conviction that there is something stuffy about 
love as he conceived it. 

God be thanked, the meanest of His creatures 
Boasts two soul-sides, one to face the world with, 
One to show a woman when he loves her I 

This assumes that combativeness is the only possible 

37 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

attitude towards the world at large. Why? Because 
the world is cruel, Browning would say. Because it 
will not accept you at your own valuation, we 
should say. A couple may form, as the Brownings 
did, a mutual admiration society. It is very pleasant 
to have someone at hand who is sure to praise your 
work, whether it deserves it or not. And Browning 
undoubtedly felt that he was a fine, manly fellow 
when he denounced Fitzgerald in no measured 
terms for having dared not to admire Aurora 
Leigh. I cannot feel that this complete suspension of 
the critical faculty on both sides is really admirable. 
It is bound up with fear and with the desire to find 
a refuge from the cold blasts of impartial criticism. 
Many old bachelors learn to derive the same satis- 
faction from their own fireside. I lived too long 
myself in the Victorian age to be a modern according 
to Mr. Krutch's standards. I have by no means 
lost my belief in love, but the kind of love that I 
can believe in is not the kind that the Victorians 
admired ; it is adventurous and open-eyed, and, while 
it gives knowledge of good, it does not involve for- 
getfulness of evil, nor does it pretend to be sanctified 
or holy. The attribution of these qualities to the 
kind of love that was admired was an outcome 
of the sex taboo. The Victorian was profoundly 
convinced that most sex is evil, and had to attach 
exaggerated adjectives to the kind of which he could 
approve. There was more sex hunger than there is 
now, and this no doubt caused people to exaggerate 
38 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

the importance of sex just as the ascetics have always 
done. We are at the present day passing through a 
somewhat confused period, when many people have 
thrown over the old standards without acquiring 
new ones. This leads them into various troubles, 
and as their unconscious usually still believes in 
the old standards, the troubles, when they come, 
produce despair, remorse, and cynicism. I do not 
think the number of people to whom this happens 
is very large, but they are among the most vocal 
people of our time. I believe that if one took the 
average of well-to-do young people in our day and 
in the Victorian epoch, one would find that there is 
now a great deal more happiness in connection with 
love, and a great deal more genuine belief in the 
value of love, than there was sixty years ago. The 
reasons which lead certain persons to cynicism are 
connected with the tyranny of the old ideals over 
the unconscious, and with the absence of a rational 
ethic by which present-day people can regulate 
their conduct. The cure lies not in lamentation and 
nostalgia for the past, but in a more courageous 
acceptance of the modern outlook and a determina- 
tion to root out nominally discarded superstitions 
from all their obscure hiding-places. 

To say shortly why one values love (is not easy ; 
nevertheless, I will make the attempt. Love is to be 
valued in the first instance — and this, though not 
its greatest value, is essential to all the rest— as in 
itself a source of delight. 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

Oh Love! they wrong thee much 
That say thy sweet is bitter, 
When thy rich fruit is such 
As nothing can be sweeter. 

The anonymous author of these lines was not 
seeking a solution for atheism, or a key to the 
universe; he was merely enjoying himself. And not 
only is love a source of delight, but its absence is a 
source of pain. In the second place, love is to be 
valued because it enhances all the best pleasures, 
such as music, and sunrise in mountains, and the 
sea under the full moon. A man who has never 
enjoyed beautiful things in the company of a woman 
whom he loved has not experienced to the full the 
magic power of which such things are capable. 
Again, love is able to break down the hard shell of 
the ego, since it is a form of biological co-operation 
in which the emotions of each are necessary to the 
fulfilment of the other's instinctive purposes. There 
have been in the world at various times various 
solitary philosophies, some very noble, some less so. 
The Stoics and the early Christians believed that 
a man could realize the highest good of which human 
life is capable by means of his own will alone, or 
at any rate without human aid; others again have 
regarded power as the end of life, and yet others 
mere personal pleasure. All these are solitary philo- 
sophies in the sense that the good is supposed to be 
something realizable in each separate person, not 
only in a larger or smaller society of persons. All 
40 



BYRONIC UNHAPPINESS 

such views, to my mind, are false, and not only in 
ethical theory, but as expressions of the better part 
of our instincts. Man depends upon co-operation, 
and has been provided by nature, somewhat inade- 
quately, it is true, with the instinctive apparatus 
out of which the friendliness required for co-operation 
can spring. Love is the first and commonest form of 
emotion leading to co-operation, and those who have 
experienced love with any intensity will not be 
content with a philosophy that supposes their highest 
good to be independent of that of the person loved. 
In this respect parental feeling is even more powerful, 
but parental feeling at its best is the result of love 
between the parents. I do not pretend that love in 
its highest form is common, but I do maintain that 
in its highest form it reveals values which must 
otherwise remain unknown, and has itself a value 
which is untouched by scepticism, although sceptics 
who are incapable of it may falsely attribute their 
incapacity to their scepticism. 

True love is a durable fire, 
In the mind ever burning, 
Never sick, never dead, never cold, 
From itself never turning. 

I come next to what Mr. Krutch has to say about 
tragedy. He contends, and in this I cannot but 
agree with him, that Ibsen's Ghosts is inferior 
to King Lear. "No increased powers of expression, 
no greater gift for words, could have transformed 
Ibsen into Shakespeare. The materials out of 

4« 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

which the latter created his works — his conception 
of human dignity, his sense of the importance of 
human passions, his vision of the amplitude of 
human life — simply did not and could not exist for 
Ibsen, as they did not and could not exist for his 
contemporaries. God and Man and Nature had all 
somehow dwindled in the course of the intervening 
centuries, not because the realistic creed of modern 
art led us to seek out mean people, but because this 
meanness of human life was somehow thrust upon 
us by the operation of that same process which led 
to the development of realistic theories of art by 
which our vision could be justified." It is undoubtedly 
the case that the old-fashioned kind of tragedy 
which dealt with princes and their sorrows is not 
suitable to our age, and when we try to treat in 
the same manner the sorrows of an obscure individual 
the effect is not the same. The reason of this is not, 
however, any deterioration in our outlook on life, 
but quite the reverse. It is due to the fact that we 
can no longer regard certain individuals as the great 
ones of the earth, who have a right to tragic passions, 
while all the rest must merely drudge and toil to 
produce the magnificence of those few. Shakespeare 
says: 

When beggars die, there are no comets seen; 

The heavens themselves blaze forth the death of princes. 

In Shakespeare's day this sentiment, if not literally 
believed, at least expressed an outlook which was 
4« 



BYRONIG UNHAPPINBSS 

practically universal and most profoundly accepted 
by Shakespeare himself. Consequently the death of 
Ginna the poet is comic, whereas the deaths of 
Cesar, Brutus and Cassius are tragic. The cosmic 
significance of an individual death is lost to us 
because we have become democratic, not only in 
outward forms, but in our inmost convictions. High 
tragedy in the present day, therefore, has to concern 
itself rather with the community than with the 
individual. I would give as an example of what I 
mean Ernst Toller's Massemensch. 1 I do not maintain 
that this work is as good as the best that has been 
done in the best ages in the past, but I do maintain 
that it is justly comparable; it is noble, profound 
and actual, concerned with heroic action, and 
"purging the reader through pity and terror", as 
Aristotle said it should. There are as yet few examples 
of this modern kind of tragedy, since the old technique 
and the old traditions have to be abandoned without 
being replaced by mere educated commonplace. 
To write tragedy, a man must feel tragedy. To feel 
tragedy, a man must be aware of the world in which 
he lives, not only with his mind, but with his blood 
and sinews. Mr. Krutch talks throughout his book 
at intervals about despair, and one is touched by his 
heroic acceptance of a bleak world, but the bleak- 
ness is due to the fact that he and most literary men 
have not yet learnt to feel the old emotions in response 

» Translated into English by Vera Meynell under the title 
Masus and Man. 

43 



THE CONQUEST OP HAPPINESS 

to new stimuli. The stimuli exist, but not in literary 
coteries. Literary coteries have no vital contact with 
the life of the community, and such contact is 
necessary if men's feelings arc to have the seriousness 
and depth within which both tragedy and true 
happiness proceed. To all the talented young men 
who wander about feeling that there is nothing in 
the world for them to do, I should say : "Give up 
trying to write, and, instead, try not to write. Go 
out into the world; become a pirate, a king in 
Borneo, a labourer in Soviet Russia; give yourself an 
existence in which the satisfaction of elementary 
physical needs will occupy almost all your energies." 
I do not recommend this course of action to everyone, 
but only to those who suffer from the disease which 
Mr. Krutch diagnoses. I believe that, after some years 
of such an existence, the ex-intellectual will find that 
in spite of his efforts he can no longer refrain from 
writing, and when this time comes his writing will 
not seem to him futile. 



44 



CHAPTER III 
COMPETITION 

If you ask any man in America, or any man in 
business in England, what it is that most interferes 
with his enjoyment of existence, he will say : "The 
struggle for life." He will say this in all sincerity; 
he will believe it. In a certain sense it is true; yet 
in another, and that a very important sense, it is 
profoundly false. The struggle for life is a thing which 
does, of course, occur. It may occur to any of us 
if we are unfortunate. It occurred, for example, 
to Conrad's hero Falk, who found himself on a 
derelict ship, one of the two men among the crew 
who were possessed of fire-arms, with nothing to 
eat but the other men. When the two men had 
finished the meals upon which they could agree, a 
true struggle for life began. Falk won, but was 
ever after a vegetarian. Now that is not what the 
business man means when he speaks of the "struggle 
for life". It is an inaccurate phrase which he has 
picked up in order to give dignity to something 
essentially trivial. Ask him how many men he has 
known in his class of life who have died of hunger. 
Ask him what happened to his friends after they 
had been ruined. Everybody knows that a business 
man who has been ruined is better off so far as 
material comforts are concerned than a man who 
has never been rich enough to have the chance of 

45 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

being ruined. What people mean, therefore, by the 
struggle for life is really the struggle for success. 
What people fear when they engage in the struggle 
is not that they will fail to get their breakfast next 
morning, but that they will fail to outshine their 
neighbours. 

It is very singular how little men seem to realize 
that they are not caught in the grip of a mechanism 
from which there is no escape, but that the treadmill 
is one upon which they remain merely because 
they have not noticed that it fails to take them up to 
a higher level. I am thinking, of course, of men in 
higher walks of business, men who already have a 
good income and could, if they chose, live on what 
they have. To do so would seem to them shameful, 
like deserting from the army in the face of the 
enemy, though if you ask them what public cause 
they are serving by their work, they will be at a 
loss to reply as soon as they have run through the 
platitudes to be found in the advertisements of the 
strenuous life. 

Consider the life of such a man. He has, we may 
suppose, a charming house, a charming wife, and 
charming children. He wakes up early in the morning 
while they are still asleep and hurries off to his 
office. There it is his duty to display the qualities of 
a great executive ; he cultivates a firm jaw, a decisive 
manner of speech, and an air of sagacious reserve 
calculated to impress everybody except the office 
boy. He dictates letters, converses with various 

46 



COMPETITION 

important persons on the 'phone, studies the market, 
and presently has lunch with some person with 
whom he is conducting or hoping to conduct a deal. 
The same sort of thing goes on all the afternoon. 
He arrives home, tired, just in time to dress for dinner. 
At dinner he and a number of other tired men have 
to pretend to enjoy the company of ladies who have 
no occasion to feel tired yet. How many hours it 
may take the poor man to escape it is impossible 
to foresee. At last he sleeps, and for a few hours the 
tension is relaxed. 

The working life of this man has the psychology 
of a hundred-yards race, but as the race upon which 
he is engaged is one whose only goal is the grave, 
the concentration, which is appropriate enough for 
a hundred yards, becomes in the end somewhat 
excessive. What does he know about his children? 
On week-days he is at the office ; on Sundays he is 
at the golf links. What does he know of his wife? 
When he leaves her in the morning, she is asleep. 
Throughout the evening he and she are engaged in 
social duties which prevent intimate conversation. 
He has probably no men friends who are important 
to him, although he has a number with whom he 
affects a geniality that he wishes he felt. Of spring- 
time and harvest he knows only as they affect the 
market ; foreign countries he has probably seen, but 
with eyes of utter boredom. Books seem to him futile, 
and music highbrow. Year by year he grows more 
lonely; his attention grows more concentrated, and 

47 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

his life outside business more desiccated. I have seen 
the American of this type in later middle life, in 
Europe, with his wife and daughters. Evidently they 
had persuaded the poor fellow that it was time he 
took a holiday, and gave his girls a chance to do the 
Old World. The mother and daughters in ecstasy 
surround him and call his attention to each new 
item that strikes them as characteristic. Pater- 
familias, utterly weary, utterly bored, is wondering 
what they are doing in the office at this moment, or 
what is happening in the baseball world. His 
womenkind, in the end, give him up, and conclude 
that males are Philistines. It never dawns upon 
them that he is a victim to their greed ; nor, indeed, 
is this quite the truth, any more than suttee is quite 
what it appeared to a European onlooker. Probably 
in nine cases out of ten the widow was a willing 
victim, prepared to be burnt for the sake of glory 
and because religion so ordained. The business 
man's religion and glory demand that he should 
make much money; therefore, like the Hindu widow, 
he suffers the torment gladly. If the American 
business man is to be made happier, he must first 
change his religion. So long as he not only desires 
success, but is whole-heartedly persuaded that it is 
a man's duty to pursue success, and that a man who 
does not do so is a poor creature, so long his life 
will remain too concentrated and too anxious to 
be happy. Take a simple matter, such as invest- 
ments. Almost every American would sooner get 
48 



COMPETITION 

8 per cent, from a risky investment than 4 per cent, 
from a safe one. The consequence is that there are 
frequent losses of money and continual worry and 
fret. For my part, the thing that I should wish to 
obtain from money would be leisure with security. 
But what the typical modern man desires to get 
with it is more money, with a view to ostentation, 
splendour, and the outshining of those who have 
hitherto been his equals. The social scale in America 
is indefinite and continually fluctuating. Conse- 
quently all the snobbish emotions become more 
restless than they are where the social order is fixed, 
and although money in itself may not suffice to 
make people grand, it is difficult to be grand without 
money. Moreover, money made is the accepted 
measure of brains. A man who makes a lot of money 
is a clever fellow; a man who does not, is not. 
Nobody likes to be thought a fool. Therefore, when 
the market is in ticklish condition, a man feels the 
way young people feel during an examination. 

I think it should be admitted that an element of 
genuine though irrational fear as to the consequences 
of ruin frequently enters into a business man's 
anxieties. Arnold Bennett's Clayhanger, however 
rich he became, continued to be afraid of dying in 
the workhouse. I have no doubt that those who have 
suffered greatly through poverty in their childhood 
are haunted by terrors lest their children should 
suffer similarly, and feel that it is hardly possible 
to build up enough millions as a bulwark against 

d 49 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

this disaster. Such fears are probably inevitable 
in the first generation, but they are less likely to 
afflict those who have never known great poverty. 
They are in any case a minor and somewhat excep- 
tional factor in the problem. 

The root of the trouble springs from too much 
emphasis upon competitive success as the main 
source of happiness. I do not deny that the feeling 
of success makes it easier to enjoy life. A painter, 
let us say, who has been obscure throughout his 
youth, is likely to become happier if his talent 
wins recognition. Nor do I deny that money, up to 
a certain point, is very capable of increasing happi- 
ness; beyond that point, I do not think it does so. 
What I do maintain is that success can only be one 
ingredient in happiness, and is too dearly purchased 
if all the other ingredients have been sacrificed to 
obtain it. 

The source of this trouble is the prevalent philo- 
sophy of life in business circles. In Europe, it is 
true, there are still other circles that have prestige. 
In some countries there is an aristocracy; in all 
there are the learned professions, and in all but 
a few of the smaller countries the army and the 
navy enjoy great respect. Now while it is true that 
there is a competitive element in success no matter 
what a man's profession may be, yet at the same 
time the kind of thing that is respected is not just 
success, but that excellence, whatever that may be, 
to which success has been due. A man of science 

5« 



COMPETITION 

may or may not make money; he is certainly not 
more respected if he does than if he does not. No 
one is Surprised to find an eminent general or 
admiral poor ; indeed, poverty in such circumstances 
is, in a sense, itself an honour. For these reasons, 
in Europe, the purely monetary competitive struggle 
is confined to certain circles, and those perhaps not 
the most influential or the most respected. In America 
the matter is otherwise. The Services play too small 
a part in the national life for their standards to have 
any influence. As for the learned professions, no 
outsider can tell whether a doctor really knows 
much medicine, or whether a lawyer really knows 
much law, and it is therefore easier to judge of their 
merit by the income to be inferred from their stan- 
dard of life. As for professors, they are the hired 
servants of business men, and as such win less 
respect than is accorded to them in older countries. 
The consequence of all this is that in America the 
professional man imitates the business man, and does 
not constitute a separate type as he does in Europe. 
Throughout the well-to-do classes, therefore, there 
is nothing to mitigate the bare undiluted fight for 
financial success. 

From quite early years American boys feel that 
this is the only thing that matters, and do not wish 
to be bothered with any kind of education that is 
devoid of pecuniary value. Education used to be 
conceived very largely as a training in the capacity 
for enjoyment — enjoyment, I mean, of those more 

51 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

delicate kinds that are not open to wholly unculti- 
vated people. In the eighteenth century it was one 
of the marks of a "gentleman" to take a discriminat- 
ing pleasure in literature, pictures, and music. We 
nowadays may disagree with his taste, but it was at 
least genuine. The rich man of the present day 
tends to be of quite a different type. He never reads. 
If he is creating a picture gallery with a view to 
enhancing his fame, he relies upon experts to choose 
his pictures ; the pleasure that he derives from them 
is not the pleasure of looking at them, but the 
pleasure of preventing some other rich man from 
having them. In regard to music, if he happens to be 
a Jew, he may have genuine appreciation; if not, 
he will be as uncultivated as he is in regard to the 
other arts. The result of all this is that he does not 
know what to do with leisure. As he gets richer and 
richer it becomes easier and easier to make money, 
until at last five minutes a day will bring him more 
than he knows how to spend. The poor man is thus 
left at a loose end as a result of his success. This 
must inevitably be the case so long as success itself 
is represented as the purpose of life. Unless a man 
has been taught what to do with success after getting 
it, the achievement of it must inevitably leave him 
a prey to boredom. 

The competitive habit of mind easily invades 
regions to which it does not belong. Take, for example, 
the question of reading. There are two motives for 
reading a book : one, that you enjoy it ; the other, 

5» 



COMPETITION 

that you can boast about it. It has become the thing 
in America for ladies to read (or seem to read) certain 
books every month ; some read them, some read the 
first chapter, some read the reviews, but all have these 
books on their tables. They do not, however, read 
any masterpieces. There has never been a month 
when Hamlet or King Lear has been selected by the 
Book Clubs ; there has never been a month when it 
has been necessary to know about Dante. Conse- 
quently the reading that is done is entirely of mediocre 
modern books and never of masterpieces. This also 
is an effect of competition, not perhaps wholly bad, 
since most of the ladies in question, if left to them- 
selves, so far from reading masterpieces, would read 
books even worse than those selected for them by 
their literary pastors and masters. 

The emphasis upon competition in modern life 
is connected with a general decay of civilized stan- 
dards such as must have occurred in Rome after 
the Augustan age. Men and women appear to have 
become incapable of enjoying the more intellectual 
pleasures. The art of general conversation, for 
example, brought to perfection in the French salons 
of the eighteenth century, was still a living tradition 
forty years ago. It was a very exquisite art, bringing 
the highest faculties into play for the sake of some- 
thing completely evanescent. But who in our age 
cares for anything so leisurely? In China the art still 
flourished in perfection ten years ago, but I imagine 
that the missionary ardour of the Nationalists 

53 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

has since then swept it completely out of existence. 
The knowledge of good literature, which was uni- 
versal among educated people fifty or a hundred 
years ago, is now confined to a few professors. All 
the quieter pleasures have been abandoned. Some 
American students took me walking in the spring 
through a wood on the borders of their campus; 
it was filled with exquisite wild flowers, but not one 
of my guides knew the name of even one of them. 
What use would such knowledge be? It could not 
add to anybody's income. 

The trouble does not lie simply with the individual, 
nor can a single individual prevent it in his own 
isolated case. The trouble arises from the generally 
received philosophy of life, according to which life 
is a contest, a competition, in which respect is to 
be accorded to the victor. This view leads to an 
undue cultivation of the will at the expense of the 
senses and the intellect. Or possibly, in saying this, 
we may be putting the cart before the horse. Puritan 
moralists have always emphasized the will in modern 
times, although originally it was faith upon which 
they laid stress. It may be that ages of Puritanism 
produced a race in which will had been over- 
developed, while the senses and the intellect had 
been starved, and that such a race adopted a philo- 
sophy of competition as the one best suited to its 
nature. However that may be, the prodigious 
success of these modern dinosaurs, who, like their 
prehistoric prototypes, prefer power to intelligence, 

54 



COMPETITION 

is causing them to be universally imitated: they 
have become the pattern for the white man every- 
where, and this is likely to be increasingly the case 
for the next hundred years. Those, however, who 
are not in the fashion may take comfort from the 
thought that the dinosaurs did not ultimately 
triumph ; they killed each other out, and intelligent 
bystanders inherited their kingdom. Our modern 
dinosaurs are killing themselves out. They do not, 
on the average, have so much as two children per 
marriage; they do not enjoy life enough to wish to 
beget children. At this point the unduly strenuous 
philosophy which they have carried over from their 
Puritan forefathers shows itself unadapted to the 
world. Those whose outlook on life causes them to 
feel so little happiness that they do not care to 
beget children are biologically doomed. Before 
very long they must be succeeded by something 
gayer and jollier. 

Competition considered as the main thing in life 
is too grim, too tenacious, too much a matter of 
taut muscles and intent will, to make a possible basis 
of life for more than one or two generations at 
most. After that length of time it must produce 
nervous fatigue, various phenomena of escape, a 
pursuit of pleasures as tense and as difficult as 
work (since relaxing has become impossible), and 
in the end a disappearance of the stock through 
sterility. It is not only work that is poisoned by 
the philosophy of competition; leisure is poisoned 

55 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

just as much. The kind of leisure which is quiet 
and restoring to the nerves comes to be felt boring. 
There is bound to be a continual acceleration of 
which the natural termination would be drugs and 
collapse. The cure for this lies in admitting the part 
of sane and quiet enjoyment in a balanced ideal 
of life. 



56 



CHAPTER IV 
BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

Boredom as a factor in human behaviour has 
received, in my opinion, far less attention than it 
deserves. It has been, I believe, one of the great 
motive powers throughout the historical epoch, 
and is so at the present day more than ever. Bore- 
dom would seem to be a distinctively human emotion. 
Animals in captivity, it is true, become listless, 
pace up and down, and yawn, but in a state of nature 
I do not believe that they experience anything analo- 
gous to boredom. Most of the time they are on the 
look-out for enemies, or food, or both; sometimes 
they are mating, sometimes they are trying to keep 
warm. But even when they are unhappy, I do not 
think that they are bored. Possibly the anthropoid 
apes may resemble us in this respect, as in so many 
others, but having never lived with them I have not 
had the opportunity to make the experiment. One 
of the essentials of boredom consist in the contrast 
between present circumstances and some other 
more agreeable circumstances which force them- 
selves irresistibly upon the imagination. It is also 
one of the essentials of boredom that one's faculties 
must not be fully occupied. Running away from 
enemies who are trying to take one's life is, I imagine, 
unpleasant, but certainly not boring. A man would 
not feel bored while he was being executed, unless 

57 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

he had almost superhuman courage. In like manner 
no one has ever yawned during his maiden speech 
in the House of Lords, with the exception of the late 
Duke of Devonshire, who was reverenced by their 
Lordships in consequence. Boredom is essentially 
a thwarted desire for events, not necessarily pleasant 
ones, but just occurrences such as will enable the 
victim of ennui to know one day from another. The 
opposite of boredom, in a word, is not pleasure, 
but excitement. 

The desire for excitement is very deep-seated in 
human beings, especially in males. I suppose that 
in the hunting stage it was more easily gratified 
than it has been since. The chase was exciting, 
war was exciting, courtship was exciting. A savage 
will manage to commit adultery with a woman while 
her husband is asleep beside her, knowing that it 
is instant death if the husband wakes. This situation, 
I imagine, is not boring. But with the coming of 
agriculture life began to grow dull, except, of 
course, for the aristocrats, who remained, and still 
remain, in the hunting stage. We hear a great deal 
about the tedium of machine-minding, but I think 
the tedium of agriculture by old-fashioned methods 
is at least as great. Indeed, contrary to what most 
philanthropists maintain, I should say that the 
machine age has enormously diminished the sum 
of boredom in the world. Among wage-earners the 
working hours are not solitary, while the evening 
hours can be given over to a variety of amusements 

58 



BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

that were impossible in an old-fashioned country 
village. Consider again the change in lower middle- 
class life. In old days, after supper, when the wife 
and daughters had cleared away the things, every- 
body sat round and had what was called "a happy 
family time". This meant that paterfamilias went 
to sleep, his wife knitted, and the daughters wished 
they were dead or at Timbuktu. They were not 
allowed to read, or to leave the room, because the 
theory was that at that period their father con- 
versed with them, which must be a pleasure to all 
concerned. With luck they ultimately married and 
had a chance to inflict upon their children a youth 
as dismal as their own had been. If they did not 
have luck, they developed into old maids, perhaps 
ultimately into decayed gentlewomen — a fate as 
horrible as any that savages have bestowed upon 
their victims. All this weight of boredom should be 
borne in mind in estimating the world of a hundred 
years ago, and when one goes further into the 
past the boredom becomes still worse. Imagine the 
monotony of winter in a mediaeval village. People 
could not read or write, they had only candles to 
give them light after dark, the smoke of their one 
fire filled the only room that was not bitterly cold. 
Roads were practically impassable, so that one 
hardly ever saw anybody from another village. It 
must have been boredom as much as anything that 
led to the practice of witch hunts as the sole sport 
by which winter evenings could be enlivened. 

59 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

We are less bored than our ancestors were, but 
we are more afraid of boredom. We have come to 
know, or rather to believe, that boredom is not 
part of the natural lot of man, but can be avoided 
by a sufficiently vigorous pursuit of excitement. 
Girls nowadays earn their own living, very largely 
because this enables them to seek excitement in 
the evening and to escape "the happy family 
time" that their grandmothers had to endure. 
Everybody who can lives in a town; in America, 
those who cannot, have a car, or at the least a 
motor-bicycle, to take them to the movies. And of 
course they have the radio in their houses. Young 
men and young women meet each other with much 
less difficulty than was formerly the case, and 
every housemaid expects at least once a week as 
much excitement as would have lasted a Jane 
Austen heroine throughout a whole novel. As we 
rise in the social scale the pursuit of excitement 
becomes more and more intense. Those who can 
afford it are perpetually moving from place to place, 
carrying with them as they go gaiety, dancing and 
drinking, but for some reason always expecting to 
enjoy these more in a new place. Those who have 
to earn a living get their share of boredom, of 
necessity, in working hours, but those who have 
enough money to be freed from the need of work 
have as their ideal a life completely freed from 
boredom. It is a noble ideal, and far be it from me 
to decry it, but I am afraid that like other ideals it is 

60 



BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

more difficult of achievement than the idealists 
suppose. After all, the mornings are boring in pro- 
portion as the previous evenings were amusing. 
There will be middle age, possibly even old age. 
At twenty men think that life will be over at thirty. 
I, at the age of fifty-eight, can no longer take that 
view. Perhaps it is as unwise to spend one's vital 
capital as one's financial capital. Perhaps some 
element of boredom is a necessary ingredient in 
life. A wish to escape from boredom is natural; 
indeed, all races of mankind have displayed it as 
opportunity occurred. When savages have first 
tasted liquor at the hands of the white men, they 
have found at last an escape from age-old tedium, 
and, except when the Government has interfered, 
they have drunk themselves into a riotous death. 
Wars, pogroms, and persecutions have all been 
part of the flight from boredom; even quarrels 
with neighbours have been found better than nothing. 
Boredom is therefore a vital problem for the moralist, 
since at least half the sins of mankind are caused 
by the fear of it. 

Boredom, however, is not to be regarded as wholly 
evil. There are two sorts, of which one is fructifying, 
while the other is stultifying. The fructifying kind 
arises from the absence of drugs, and the stultifying 
kind from the absence of vital activities. I am not 
prepared to say that drugs can play no good part 
in life whatsoever. There are moments, for example, 
when an opiate will be prescribed by a wise physician, 

61 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

and I think these moments more frequent than 
prohibitionists suppose. But the craving for drugs 
is certainly something which cannot be left to the 
unfettered operation of natural impulse. And the 
kind of boredom which the person accustomed to 
drugs experiences when deprived of them is some- 
thing for which I can suggest no remedy except 
time. Now what applies to drugs applies also, 
within limits, to every kind of excitement. A life 
too full of excitement is an exhausting life, in 
which continually stronger stimuli are needed to 
give the thrill that has come to be thought an essen- 
tial part of pleasure. A person accustomed to too 
much excitement is like a person with a morbid 
craving for pepper, who comes at last to be unable 
even to taste a quantity of pepper which would 
cause anyone else to choke. There is an element 
of boredom which is inseparable from the avoidance 
of too much excitement, and too much excitement 
not only undermines the health, but dulls the palate 
for every kind of pleasure, substituting titillations 
for profound organic satisfactions, cleverness for 
wisdom, and jagged surprises for beauty. I do not 
want to push to extremes the objection to excitement. 
A certain amount of it is wholesome, but, like 
almost everything else, the matter is quantitative. 
Too little may produce morbid cravings, too much 
will produce exhaustion. A certain power of enduring 
boredom is therefore essential to a happy life, and is 

one of the things that ought to be taught to the young. 
6a 



BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

All great books contain boring portions, and all 
great lives have contained uninteresting stretches. 
Imagine a modern American publisher confronted 
with the Old Testament as a new manuscript sub- 
mitted to him for the first time. It is not difficult to 
think what his comments would be, for example, on 
the genealogies. "My dear sir," he would say, "this 
chapter lacks pep; you can't expect your reader 
to be interested in a mere string of proper names 
of persons about whom you tell him so little. You 
have begun your story, I will admit, in fine style, 
and at first I was very favourably impressed, but 
you have altogether too much wish to tell it all. 
Pick out the high lights, take out the superfluous 
matter, and bring me back your manuscript when 
you have reduced it to a reasonable length." So 
the modern publisher would speak, knowing the 
modern reader's fear of boredom. He would say 
the same sort of thing about the Confucian classics, 
the Koran, Marx's Capital, and all the other sacred 
books which have proved to be best sellers. Nor 
does this apply only to sacred books. All the best 
novels contain boring passages. A novel which 
sparkles from the first page to the last is pretty sure 
not to be a great book. Nor have the lives of great 
men been exciting except at a few great moments. 
Socrates could enjoy a banquet now and again, 
and must have derived considerable satisfaction 
from his conversations while the hemlock was 
taking effect, but most of his life he lived quietly 

68 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

with Xanthippe, taking a constitutional in the 
afternoon, and perhaps meeting a few friends by 
the way. Kant is said never to have been more than 
ten miles from Konigsberg in all his life. Darwin, 
after going round the world, spent the whole of the 
rest of his life in his own house. Marx, after stirring 
up a few revolutions, decided to spend the remainder 
of his days in the British Museum. Altogether it 
will be found that a quiet life is characteristic of 
great men, and that their pleasures have not been 
of the sort that would look exciting to the outward 
eye. No great achievement is possible without 
persistent work, so absorbing and so difficult that 
little energy is left over for the more strenuous kinds 
of amusement, except such as serve to recuperate 
physical energy during holidays, of which Alpine 
climbing may serve as the best example. 

The capacity to endure a more or less monotonous 
life is one which should be acquired in childhood. 
Modern parents are greatly to blame in this respect ; 
they provide their children with far too many 
passive amusements, such as shows and good things 
to eat, and they do not realize the importance to 
a child of having one day like another, except, of 
course, for somewhat rare occasions. The pleasures 
of childhood should in the main be such as the 
child extracts himself from his environment by means 
of some effort and inventiveness. Pleasures which 
are exciting and at the same time involve no physical 
exertion, such, for example, as the theatre, should 

64 



BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

occur very rarely. The excitement is in the nature 
of a drug, of which more and more will come to be 
required, and the physical passivity during the 
excitement is contrary to instinct. A child develops 
best when, like a young plant, he is left undisturbed 
in the same soil. Too much travel, too much variety 
of impressions, are not good for the young, and cause 
them as they grow up to become incapable of 
enduring fruitful monotony. I do not mean that 
monotony has any merits of its own ; I mean only 
that certain good things are not possible except 
where there is a certain degree of monotony. Take, 
say, Wordsworth's Prelude. It will be obvious to 
every reader that whatever had any value in 
Wordsworth's thoughts and feelings would have 
been impossible to a sophisticated urban youth. A 
boy or young man who has some serious constructive 
purpose will endure voluntarily a great deal of 
boredom if he finds that it is necessary by the way. 
But constructive purposes do not easily form them- 
selves in a boy's mind if he is living a life of dis- 
tractions and dissipations, for in that case his thoughts 
will always be directed towards the next pleasure 
rather than towards the distant achievement. For 
all these reasons a generation that cannot endure 
boredom will be a generation of little men, of men 
unduly divorced from the slow processes of nature, 
of men in whom every vital impulse slowly withers, 
as though they were cut flowers in a vase. 
I do not like mystical language, and yet I hardly 

e 65 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

know how to express what I mean without employing 
phrases that sound poetic rather than scientific. 
Whatever we may wish to think, we are creatures 
of Earth ; our life is part of the life of the Earth, 
and we draw our nourishment from it just as the 
plants and animals do. The rhythm of Earth life 
is slow; autumn and winter are as essential to it as 
spring and summer, and rest is as essential as 
motion. To the child, even more than to the man, it 
is necessary to preserve some contact with the ebb 
and flow of terrestrial life. The human body has 
been adapted through the ages to this rhythm, and 
religion has embodied something of it in the festival 
of Easter. I have seen a boy of two years old, who 
had been kept in London, taken out for the first 
time to walk in green country. The season was 
winter, and everything was wet and muddy. To the 
adult eye there was nothing to cause delight, but 
in the boy there sprang up a strange ecstasy; he 
kneeled in the wet ground and put his face in the 
grass, and gave utterance to half-articulate cries 
of delight. The joy that he was experiencing was 
primitive, simple and massive. The organic need 
that was being satisfied is so profound that those in 
whom it is starved are seldom completely sane. 
Many pleasures, of which we may take gambling 
as a good example, have in them no element of this 
contact with Earth. Such pleasures, in the instant 
when they cease, leave a man feeling dusty and 

dissatisfied, hungry for he knows not what Such 
66 



BOREDOM AND EXCITEMENT 

pleasures bring nothing that can be called joy. 
Those, on the other hand, that bring us into contact 
with the life of the Earth have something in them 
profoundly satisfying ; when they cease, the happiness 
that they have brought remains, although their 
intensity while they existed may have been less 
than that of more exciting dissipations. The distinc- 
tion that I have in mind runs through the whole 
gamut from the simplest to the most civilized occu- 
pations. The two-year-old boy whom I spoke of a 
moment ago displayed the most primitive possible 
form of union with the life of Earth. But in a higher 
form the same thing is to be found in poetry. What 
makes Shakespeare's lyrics supreme is that they are 
filled with this same joy that made the two-year- 
old embrace the grass. Consider "Hark, hark, the 
lark", or "Gome unto these yellow sands" ; you 
will find in these poems the civilized expression of 
the same emotion that in our two-year-old could 
only find utterance in inarticulate cries. Or, again, 
consider the difference between love and mere 
sex attraction. Love is an experience in which our 
whole being is renewed and refreshed as is that of 
plants by rain after drought. In sex intercourse with- 
out love there is nothing of this. When the momentary 
pleasure is ended, there is fatigue, disgust, and a 
sense that life is hollow. Love is part of the life of 
Earth ; sex without love is not. 

The special kind of boredom from which modern 
urban populations suffer is intimately bound up 

67 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

with their separation from the life of Earth. It makes 
life hot and dusty and thirsty, like a pilgrimage in 
the desert. Among those who are rich enough to 
choose their way of life, the particular brand of 
unendurable boredom from which they suffer is 
due, paradoxical as this may seem, to their fear of 
boredom. In flying from the fructifying kind of 
boredom, they fall a prey to the other far worse 
kind. A happy life must be to a great extent a quiet 
life, for it is only in an atmosphere of quiet that true 
joy can live. 



68 



CHAPTER V 
FATIGUE 

Fatigue is of many sorts, some of which are a much 
graver obstacle to happiness than others. Purely 
physical fatigue, provided it is not excessive, tends 
if anything to be a cause of happiness ; it leads to 
sound sleep and a good appetite, and gives zest to 
the pleasures that are possible on holidays. But 
when it is excessive it becomes a very grave evil. 
Peasant women in all but the most advanced com- 
munities are old at thirty, worn out with excessive 
toil. Children in the early days of industrialism were 
stunted in their growth and frequently killed by 
overwork in early years. The same thing still happens 
in China and Japan, where industrialism is new; 
to some extent also in the Southern States of America. 
Physical labour carried beyond a certain point is 
atrocious torture, and it has very frequently been 
carried so far as to make life all but unbearable. 
In the most advanced parts of the modern world, 
however, physical fatigue has been much minimized 
through the improvement of industrial conditions. 
The kind of fatigue that is most serious in the present 
day in advanced communities is nervous fatigue. 
This kind, oddly enough, is most pronounced among 
the well-to-do, and tends to be much less among 
wage-earners than it is among business men and 
brain-workers. 

69 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

To escape from nervous fatigue in modern life 
is a very difficult thing. In the first place, all through 
working hours, and still more in the time spenf 
between work and home, the urban worker is 
exposed to noise, most of which, it is true, he learns 
not to hear consciously, but which none the less 
wears him out, all the more owing to the subcon- 
scious effort involved in not hearing it. Another thing 
which causes fatigue without our being aware of it 
is the constant presence of strangers. The natural 
instinct of man, as of other animals, is to investigate 
every stranger of his species, with a view to deciding 
whether to behave to him in a friendly or hostile 
manner. This instinct has to be inhibited by those 
who travel in the underground in the rush hour, 
and the result of inhibiting it is that they feel a 
general diffused rage against all the strangers with 
whom they are brought into this involuntary 
contact. Then there is the hurry to catch the morning 
train, with the resulting dyspepsia. Consequendy, 
by the time the office is reached and the day's work 
begins, the black-coated worker already has frayed 
nerves and a tendency to view the human race as a 
nuisance. His employer, arriving in the same mood, 
does nothing to dissipate it in the employee. Fear of 
the sack compels respectful behaviour, but this 
unnatural conduct only adds to the nervous strain. 
If once a week employees were allowed to pull the 
employer's nose and otherwise indicate what they 
thought of him, the nervous tension for them would 

70 



FATIGUE 

be relieved, but for the employer, who also has his 
troubles, this would not mend matters. What the 
fear of dismissal is to the employee, the fear of 
bankruptcy is to the employer. Some, it is true, are 
big enough to be above this fear, but to reach a 
great position of this kind they have generally had 
to pass through years of strenuous struggle, during 
which they had to be actively aware of events in all 
parts of the world and constantly foiling the machina- 
tions of their competitors. The result of all this is 
that when sound success comes a man is already a 
nervous wreck, so accustomed to anxiety that he 
cannot shake off the habit of it when the need for 
it is past. There are, it is true, rich men's sons, but 
they generally succeed in manufacturing for them- 
selves anxieties as similar as possible to those that 
they would have suffered if they had not been born 
rich. By betting and gambling, they incur the 
displeasure of their fathers ; by cutting short their 
sleep for the sake of their amusements, they debili- 
tate their physique; and by the time they settle 
down, they have become as incapable of happiness 
as their fathers were before them. Voluntarily or 
involuntarily, of choice or of necessity, most moderns 
lead a nerve-racking life, and are continually too 
tired to be capable of enjoyment without the help 
of alcohol. 

Leaving on one side those rich men who are merely 
fools, let us consider the commoner case of those 
whose fatigue is associated with strenuous work for 

7i 



THE/CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

a living. To a great extent fatigue in such cases is 
due to worry, and worry could be prevented by a 
better philosophy of life and a litde more mental 
discipline. Most men and women are very deficient 
in control over their thoughts. I mean by this that 
they cannot cease to think about worrying topics at 
times when no action can be taken in regard to 
them. Men take their business worries to bed with 
them, and in the hours of the night, when they should 
be gaining fresh strength to cope with to-morrow's 
troubles, they are going over and over again in their 
minds problems about which at the moment they 
can do nothing, thinking about them, not in a way 
to produce a sound line of conduct on the morrow, 
but in that half-insane way that characterizes the 
troubled meditations of insomnia. Something of 
the midnight madness still clings about them in 
the morning, clouding their judgment, spoiling 
their temper, and making every obstacle infuriating. 
The wise man thinks about his troubles only when 
there is some purpose in doing so ; at other times he 
thinks about other things, or, if it is night, about 
nothing at all. I do not mean to suggest that at a 
great crisis, for example, when ruin is imminent, or 
when a man has reason to suspect that his wife is 
deceiving him, it is possible, except to a few excep- 
tionally disciplined minds, to shut out the trouble 
at moments when nothing can be done about it. 
But it is quite possible to shut out the ordinary 
troubles of ordinary days, except while they have to 
7a 



FATIGUE 

be dealt with. It is amazing how much both happiness 
and efficiency can be increased by the cultivation 
of an orderly mind, which thinks about a matter 
adequately at the right time rather than inade- 
quately at all times. When a difficult or worrying 
decision has to be reached, as soon as all the 
data are available give the matter your best thought 
and make your decision ; having made the decision, 
do not revise it unless some new fact comes to your 
knowledge. Nothing is so exhausting as indecision, 
and nothing is so futile. 

A great many worries can be diminished by 
realizing the unimportance of the matter which is 
causing the anxiety. I have done in my time a 
considerable amount of public speaking; at first 
every audience terrified me, and nervousness made 
me speak very badly ; I dreaded the ordeal so much 
that I always hoped I might break my leg before 
I had to make a speech, and when it was over I 
was exhausted from the nervous strain. Gradually 
I taught myself to feel that it did not matter whether 
I spoke well or ill, the universe would remain much 
the same in either case. I found that the less I cared 
whether I spoke well or badly, the less badly I 
spoke, and gradually the nervous strain diminished 
almost to vanishing point. A great deal of nervous 
fatigue can be dealt with in this way. Our doings 
are not so important as we naturally suppose; our 
successes and failures do not after all matter very 
much. Even great sorrows can be survived ; troubles 

73 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

which seem as if they must put an end to happiness 
for life fade with the lapse of time until it becomes 
almost impossible to remember their poignancy. 
But over and above these self-centred considerations 
is the fact that one's ego is no very large part of the 
world. The man who can centre his thoughts and 
hopes upon something transcending self can find a 
certain peace in the ordinary troubles of life which is 
impossible to the pure egoist. 

What might be called hygiene of the nerves has 
been much too little studied. Industrial psychology, 
it is true, has made elaborate investigations into 
fatigue, and has proved by careful statistics that if 
you go on doing something for a sufficiently long 
time you will ultimately get rather tired — a result 
which might have been guessed without so much 
parade of science. The study of fatigue by psycho- 
logists is mainly concerned with muscular fatigue, 
although there are also a certain number of studies 
of fatigue in school children. None of these, however, 
touch upon the important problem. The important 
kind of fatigue is always emotional in modern life ; 
purely intellectual fatigue, like purely muscular 
fatigue, produces its own remedy in sleep. Any 
person who has a great deal of intellectual work 
devoid of emotion to do — say, for example, elaborate 
computations — will sleep off at the end of each day 
the fatigue that that day has brought. The harm 
that is attributed to overwork is hardly ever due to 
that cause, but to some kind of worry or anxiety 

74 



FATIGUE 

The trouble with emotional fatigue is that it inter- 
feres with rest. The more tired a man becomes, 
the more impossible he finds it to stop. One of the 
symptoms of approaching nervous break-down is the 
belief that one's work is terribly important, and that 
to take a holiday would bring all kinds of disaster. 
If I Vere a medical man, I should prescribe a 
holiday to any patient who considered his work 
important. The nervous break-down which appears 
to be produced by the work is, in fact, in every case 
that I have ever known of personally, produced 
by some emotional trouble from which the patient 
attempts to escape by means of his work. He is 
loath to give up his work because, if he does so, he 
will no longer have anything to distract him from 
the thoughts of his misfortune, whatever it may be. 
Of course, the trouble may be fear of bankruptcy, 
and in that case his work is directly connected 
with his worry, but even then worry is likely to 
lead him to work so long that his judgment be- 
comes clouded and bankruptcy comes sooner than 
if he worked less. In every case it is the emo- 
tional trouble, not the work, that causes the break- 
down. 

The psychology of worry is by no means simple. 
I have spoken already of mental discipline, namely 
the habit of thinking of things at the right time. This 
has its importance, first because it makes it possible 
to get through the day's work with less expenditure 
of thought, secondly because it affords a cure for 

75 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

insomnia, and thirdly because it promotes efficiency 
and wisdom in decisions. But methods of this kind 
do not touch the subconscious or the unconscious, 
and when a trouble is grave no method is of much 
avail unless it penetrates below the level of conscious- 
ness. There has been a great deal of study by psycho- 
logists of the operation of the unconscious upon the 
conscious, but much less of the operation of the 
conscious upon the unconscious. Yet the latter is of 
vast importance in the subject of mental hygiene, 
and must be understood if rational convictions are 
ever to operate in the realm of the unconscious. 
This applies in particular in the matter of worry. 
It is easy enough to tell oneself that such and such 
a misfortune would not be so very terrible if it 
happened, but so long as this remains merely a 
conscious conviction it will not operate in the watches 
of the night, or prevent the occurrence of night- 
mares. My own belief is that a conscious thought can 
be planted into the unconscious if a sufficient amount 
of vigour and intensity is put into it. Most of the 
unconscious consists of what were once highly 
emotional conscious thoughts, which have now 
become buried. It is possible to do this process of 
burying deliberately, and in this way the unconscious 
can be led to do a lot of useful work. I have found, 
for example, that if I have to write upon some 
rather difficult topic the best plan is to think about 
it with very great intensity — the greatest intensity 
of which I am capable — for a few hours or days, 
76 



FATIGUE 

and at the end of that time give orders, so to speak, 
that the work is to proceed underground. After some 
months I return consciously to the topic and find 
that the work has been done. Before I had discovered 
this technique, I used to spend the intervening 
months worrying because I was making no progress ; 
I arrived at the solution none the sooner for this 
worry, and the intervening months were wasted, 
whereas now I can devote them to other pursuits. 
A process in many ways analogous can be adopted 
with regard to anxieties. When some misfortune 
threatens, consider seriously and deliberately what 
is the very worst that could possibly happen. 
Having looked this possible misfortune in the face, 
give yourself sound reasons for thinking that after 
all it would be no such very terrible disaster. Such 
reasons always exist, since at the worst nothing that 
happens to oneself has any cosmic importance. 
When you have looked for some time steadily at the 
worst possibility and have said to yourself with real 
conviction, "Well, after all, that would not matter 
so very much", you will find that your worry 
diminishes to a quite extraordinary extent. It may 
be necessary to repeat the process a few times, but 
in the end, if you have shirked nothing in facing 
the worst possible issue, you will find that your 
worry disappears altogether, and is replaced by a 
kind of exhilaration. 

This is part of a more general technique for the 
avoidance of fear. Worry is a form of fear, and all 

77 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

forms of fear produce fatigue. A man who has learnt 
not to feel fear will find the fatigue of daily life 
enormously diminished. Now fear, in its most harm- 
ful form, arises where there is some danger which 
we are unwilling to face. At odd moments horrible 
thoughts dart into our minds ; what they are depends 
upon the person, but almost everybody has some kind 
of lurking fear. With one man it is cancer, with 
another financial ruin, with a third the discovery 
of some disgraceful secret, a fourth is tormented 
by jealous suspicions, a fifth is haunted at night by 
the thought that perhaps the tales of hell-fire told 
him when he was young may be true. Probably 
all these people employ the wrong technique for 
dealing with their fear; whenever it comes into 
their mind, they try to think of something else; 
they distract their thoughts with amusement or 
work, or what not. Now every kind of fear grows 
worse by not being looked at. The effort of turning 
away one's thoughts is a tribute to the horribleness 
of the spectre from which one is averting one's 
gaze ; the proper course with every kind of fear is to 
think about it rationally and calmly, but with great 
concentration, until it has become completely 
familiar. In the end familiarity will blunt its terrors ; 
the whole subject will become boring, and our 
thoughts will turn away from it, not, as formerly, 
by an effort of will, but through mere lack of interest 
in the topic. When you find yourself inclined to 
brood on anything, no matter what, the best plan 
78 



FATIGUE 

always is to think about it even more than you 
naturally would, until at last its morbid fascination 
is worn off. 

One of the matters in which modern morality is 
most defective is this question of fear. It is true that 
physical courage, especially in war, is expected of 
men, but other forms of courage are not expected 
of them, and no form of courage is expected of women. 
A woman who is courageous has to conceal the fact 
if she wishes men to like her. The man who is 
courageous in any matter except physical danger 
is also thought ill of. Indifference to public opinion, 
for example, is regarded as a challenge, and the 
public docs what it can to punish the man who dares 
to flout its authority. All this is quite opposite to 
what it should be. Every form of courage, whether 
in men or women, should be admired as much as 
physical courage is admired in a soldier. The com- 
monness of physical courage among young men is 
a proof that courage can be produced in response 
to a public opinion that demands it. Given more 
courage there would be less worry, and therefore 
less fatigue; for a very large proportion of the 
nervous fatigues from which men and women 
suffer at present are due to fears, conscious or 
unconscious. 

A very frequent source of fatigue is love of excite- 
ment. If a man could spend his leisure in sleep, he 
would keep fit, but his working hours are dreary, 
and he feels the need of pleasure during his hours of 

79 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

freedom. The trouble is that the pleasures which are 
easiest to obtain and most superficially attractive 
are mostly of a sort to wear out the nerves. Desire 
for excitement, when it goes beyond a point, is a 
sign either of a twisted disposition or of some instinc- 
tive dissatisfaction. In the early days of a happy 
marriage most men feel no need of excitement, but 
in the modern world marriage often has to be 
postponed for such a long time that when at last it 
becomes financially possible excitement has become 
a habit which can only be kept at bay for a short 
time. If public opinion allowed men to marry at 
twenty-one without incurring the financial burdens 
at present involved in matrimony, many men would 
never get into the way of demanding pleasures as 
fatiguing as their work. To suggest that this should 
be made possible is, however, immoral, as may be 
seen from the fate of Judge Lindsey, who has suffered 
obloquy, in spite of a long and honourable career, 
for the sole crime of wishing to save young people 
from the misfortunes that they incur as a result of 
their elders' bigotry. I shall not, however, pursue 
this topic any further at present, since it comes 
under the heading of Envy, with which we shall 
be concerned in a later chapter. 

For the private individual, who cannot alter the 
laws and institutions under which he fives, it is 
difficult to cope with the situation that oppressive 
moralists created and perpetuate. It is, however, 
worth while to realize that exciting pleasures are 



FATIGUE 

not a road to happiness, although so long as more 
satisfying joys remain unattainable a man may 
find it hardly possible to endure life except by the 
help of excitement. In such a situation the only 
thing that a prudent man can do is to ration 
himself, and not to allow himself such an amount 
of fatiguing pleasure as will undermine his health 
or interfere with his work. The radical cure 
for the troubles of the young lies in a change of 
public morals. In the meantime a young man does 
well to reflect that he will ultimately be in a position 
to marry, and that he will be unwise if he lives in 
such a way as to make a happy marriage impos- 
sible, which may easily happen through frayed 
nerves and an acquired incapacity for the gentler 
pleasures. 

One of the worst features of nervous fatigue is 
that it acts as a sort of screen between a man and 
the outside world. Impressions reach him, as it 
were, muffled and muted ; he no longer notices people 
except to be irritated by small tricks or manner- 
isms ; he derives no pleasure from his meals or from 
the sunshine, but tends to become tensely concen- 
trated upon a few objects and indifferent to all the 
rest. This state of affairs makes it impossible to rest, 
so that fatigue continually increases until it reaches 
a point where medical treatment is required. All 
this is at bottom a penalty for having lost that con- 
tact with Earth of which we spoke in the preceding 
chapter. But how such contact is to be preserved in 

f 81 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

our great modern urban agglomerations of popu- 
lation, it is by no means easy to see. However, here 
again we find ourselves upon the fringe of large 
social questions with which in this volume it is not 
my intention to deal. 



CHAPTER VI 
ENVY 

Next to worry probably one of the most potent 
causes of unhappiness is envy. Envy is, I should say, 
one of the most universal and deep-seated of human 
passions. It is very noticeable in children before they 
are a year old, and has to be treated with the 
most tender respect by every educator. The very 
slightest appearance of favouring one child at 
the expense of another is instantly observed and 
resented. Distributive justice, absolute, rigid, and 
unvarying, must be observed by anyone who 
has children to deal with. But children are only 
slightly more open in their expressions of envy, 
and of jealousy (which is a special form of envy), 
than arc grown-up people. The emotion is just 
as prevalent among adults as among children. 
Take, for example, maid-servants: I remember 
when one of our maids, who was a married woman, 
became pregnant, and we said that she was not 
to be expected to lift heavy weights, the instant 
result was that none of the others would lift heavy 
weights, and any work of that sort that needed doing 
we had to do ourselves. Envy is the basis of demo- 
cracy. Heraclitus asserts that the citizens of Ephesus 
ought all to be hanged because they said, "There 
shall be none first among us". The democratic 
movement in Greek States must have been almost 

83 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

wholly inspired by this passion. And the same is 
true of modern democracy. There is, it is true, an 
idealistic theory according to which democracy 
is the best form of government. I think myself that 
this theory is true. But there is no department of 
practical politics where idealistic theories are 
strong enough to cause great changes ; when great 
changes occur, the theories which justify them are 
always a camouflage for passion. And the passion 
that has given driving force to democratic theories 
is undoubtedly the passion of envy. Read the 
memoirs of Madame Roland, who is frequently 
represented as a noble woman inspired by devotion 
to the people. You will find that what made her 
such a vehement democrat was the experience of 
being shown into the servants' hall when she had 
occasion to visit an aristocratic chateau. 

Among average respectable women envy plays 
an extraordinarily large part. If you are sitting 
in the Underground and a well-dressed woman 
happens to walk along the car, watch the eyes of 
the other women. You will see that every one 
of them, with the possible exception of those who 
are even better dressed, will watch the woman 
with malevolent glances, and will be struggling 
to draw inferences derogatory to her. The love 
of scandal is an expression of this general malevo- 
lence : any story against another woman is instantly 
believed, even on the flimsiest evidence. A lofty 
morality serves the same purpose: those who have 

84 



ENVY 

a chance to sin against it are envied, and it is 
considered virtuous to punish them for their sins. 
This particular form of virtue is certainly its own 
reward. 

Exactly the same thing, however, is to be observed 
among men, except that women regard all other 
women as their competitors, whereas men as a rule 
only have this feeling towards other men in the 
same profession. Have you, reader, ever been 
so imprudent as to praise an artist to another 
artist? Have you ever praised a politician to another 
politician of the same party? Have you ever praised 
an Egyptologist to another Egyptologist? If you 
have, it is a hundred to one that you will have 
produced an explosion of jealousy. In the corre- 
spondence of Leibniz and Huyghens there are a 
number of letters lamenting the supposed fact that 
Newton had become insane. "Is it not sad", they 
write to each other, "that the incomparable genius 
of Mr. Newton should have become overclouded 
by the loss of reason?" And these two eminent 
men, in one letter after another, wept crocodile 
tears with obvious relish. As a matter of fact, the 
event which they were hypocritically lamenting 
had not taken place, though a few examples of 
eccentric behaviour had given rise to the rumour. 

Of all the characteristics of ordinary human 
nature envy is the most unfortunate; not only does 
the envious person wish to inflict misfortune and 
do so whenever he can with impunity, but he is 

85 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

also himself rendered unhappy by envy. Instead 
of deriving pleasure from what he has, he derives 
pain from what others have. If he can, he deprives 
others of their advantages, which to him is as desirable 
as it would be to secure the same advantages 
himself. If this passion is allowed to run riot it 
becomes fatal to all excellence, and even to the 
most useful exercise of exceptional skill. Why 
should a medical man go to see his patients in a 
car when the labourer has to walk to his work? 
Why should the scientific investigator be allowed 
to spend his time in a warm room when others 
have to face the inclemency of the elements? Why 
should a man who possesses some rare talent of 
great importance to the world be saved from the 
drudgery of his own housework? To such questions 
envy finds no answer. Fortunately, however, there 
is in human nature a compensating passion, namely 
that of admiration. Whoever wishes to increase 
human happiness must wish to increase admiration 
and to diminish envy. 

What cure is there for envy? For the saint there 
is the cure of selflessness, though even in the case 
of saints envy of other saints is by no means im- 
possible. I doubt whether St. Simeon Stylites 
would have been wholly pleased if he had learnt 
of some other saint who had stood even longer 
on an even narrower pillar. But, leaving saints 
out of account, the only cure for envy in the case 
of ordinary men and women is happiness, and the 

86 



ENVY 

difficulty is that envy is itself a terrible obstacle 
to happiness. I think envy is immensely promoted 
by misfortunes in childhood. The child who finds 
a brother or sister preferred before himself acquires 
the habit of envy, and when he goes out into the 
world looks for injustices of which he is the victim, 
perceives them at once if they occur, and imagines 
them if they do not. Such a man is inevitably 
unhappy, and becomes a nuisance to his friends, 
who cannot be always remembering to avoid 
imaginary slights. Having begun by believing 
that no one likes him, he at last by his behaviour 
makes his belief true. Another misfortune in child- 
hood which has the same result is to have parents 
without much parental feeling. Without having an un- 
duly favoured brother or sister, a child may perceive 
that the children in other families are more loved 
by their mother and father than he is. This will 
cause him to hate the other children and his own 
parents, and when he grows up he will feel himself 
an Ishmael. Some kinds of happiness are everyone's 
natural birthright, and to be deprived of them 
is almost inevitably to become warped and em- 
bittered. 

But the envious man may say: "What is the 
good of telling me that the cure for envy is happi- 
ness? I cannot find happiness while I continue 
to feel envy, and you tell me that I cannot cease 
to be envious until I find happiness." But real 
life is never so logical as this. Merely to realize 

87 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

the causes of one's own envious feelings is to take 
a long step towards curing them. The habit of 
thinking in terms of comparisons is a fatal one. 
When anything pleasant occurs it should be enjoyed 
to the full, without stopping to think that it is 
not so pleasant as something else that may possibly 
be happening to someone else. "Yes," says the 
envious man, "this is a sunny day, and it is spring- 
time, and the birds are singing, and the flowers 
are in bloom, but I understand that the spring- 
time in Sicily is a thousand times more beautiful, 
that the birds sing more exquisitely in the groves 
of Helicon, and that the rose of Sharon is more 
lovely than any in my garden." And as he thinks 
these thoughts the sun is dimmed, and the birds' 
song becomes a meaningless twitter, and the flowers 
seem not worth a moment's regard. All the other 
joys of life he treats in the same way. "Yes," he will 
say to himself, "the lady of my heart is lovely, I 
love her and she loves me, but how much more 
exquisite must have been the Queen of Sheba! 
Ah, if I had but had Solomon's opportunities!" 
All such comparisons are pointless and foolish; 
whether the Queen of Sheba or our next-door 
neighbour be the cause of discontent, cither is 
equally futile. With the wise man, what he has 
does not cease to be enjoyable because someone 
else has something else. Envy, in fact, is one form 
of a vice, partly moral, partly intellectual, which 
consists in seeing things never in themselves, but 
88 



ENVY 

only in their relations. I am earning, let us say, a 
salary sufficient for my needs. I should be content, 
but I hear that someone else whom I believe to 
be in no way my superior is earning a salary twice 
as great as mine. Instantly, if I am of an envious 
disposition, the satisfactions to be derived from 
what I have grow dim, and I begin to be eaten up 
with a sense of injustice. For all this the proper 
cure is mental discipline, the habit of not thinking 
profitless thoughts. After all, what is more enviable 
than happiness? And if I can cure myself of envy 
I can acquire happiness and become enviable. 
The man who has double my salary is doubtless 
tortured by the thought that someone eke in turn 
has twice as much as he has, and so it goes on. 
If you desire glory, you may envy Napoleon. But 
Napoleon envied Gscsar, Caesar envied Alexander, 
and Alexander, I daresay, envied Hercules, who 
never existed. You cannot, therefore, get away 
from envy by means of success alone, for there will 
always be in history or legend some person even 
more successful than you are. You can get away 
from envy by enjoying the pleasures that come 
your way, by doing the work that you have to do, 
and by avoiding comparisons with those whom 
you imagine, perhaps quite falsely, to be more 
fortunate than yourself. 

Unnecessary modesty has a great deal to do 
with envy. Modesty is considered a virtue, but 
for my part I am very doubtful whether, in its 

89 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

more extreme forms, it deserves to be so regarded. 
Modest people need a great deal of reassuring, 
and often do not dare to attempt tasks which they 
are quite capable of performing. Modest people 
believe themselves to be outshone by those with 
whom they habitually associate. They are therefore 
particularly prone to envy, and, through envy, to 
unhappiness and illwill. For my part, I think there 
is much to be said for bringing up a boy to think 
himself a fine fellow. I do not believe that any 
peacock envies another peacock his tail, because 
every peacock is persuaded that his own tail is the 
finest in the world. The consequence of this is 
that peacocks are peaceable birds. Imagine how 
unhappy the life of a peacock would be if he had 
been taught that it is wicked to have a good opinion 
of oneself. Whenever he saw another peacock 
spreading out his tail, he would say to himself: 
"I must not imagine that my tail is better than 
that, for that would be conceited, but oh, how 
I wish it were! That odious bird is so convinced 
of his own magnificence! Shall I pull out some 
of his feathers? And then perhaps I need no longer 
fear comparison with him." Or perhaps he would 
lay a trap for him, and prove that he was a wicked 
peacock who had been guilty of unpeacockly 
behaviour, and he would denounce him to the 
assembly of the leaders. Gradually he would 
establish the principle that peacocks with specially 
fine tails arc almost always wicked, and that the 
90 



ENVY 

wise ruler in the peacock kingdom would seek 
out the humble bird with only a few draggled tail 
feathers. Having got this principle accepted, he 
would get all the finest birds put to death, and 
in the end a really splendid tail will become only 
a dim memory of the past. Such is the victory of 
envy masquerading as morality. But where every 
peacock thinks himself more splendid than any 
of the others, there is no need for all this repression. 
Each peacock expects to win the first prize in the 
competition, and each, because he values his own 
peahen, believes that he has done so. 

Envy is, of course, closely connected with com- 
petition. We do not envy a good fortune which we 
conceive as quite hopelessly out of our reach. In 
an age when the social hierarchy is fixed, the 
lowest classes do not envy the upper classes so long 
as the division between rich and poor is thought 
to be ordained by God. Beggars do not envy million- 
aires, though of course they will envy other beggars 
who are more successful. The instability of social 
status in the modern world, and the equalitarian 
doctrines of democracy and socialism, have greatly 
extended the range of envy. For the moment this 
is an evil, but it is an evil which must be endured 
in order to arrive at a more just social system. 
As soon as inequalities are thought about rationally 
they are seen to be unjust unless they rest upon 
some superiority of merit. And as soon as they are 
seen to be unjust, there is no remedy for the resulting 

9' 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

envy except the removal of the injustice. Our age 
is therefore one in which envy plays a peculiarly 
large part. The poor envy the rich, the poorer 
nations envy the richer nations, women envy men, 
virtuous women envy those who, though not 
virtuous, remain unpunished. While it is true that 
envy is the chief motive force leading to justice as 
between different classes, different nations, and 
different sexes, it is at the same time true that 
the kind of justice to be expected as a result of 
envy i« likely to be the worst possible kind, namely 
that which consists rather in diminishing the 
pleasures of the fortunate than in increasing those 
of the unfortunate. Passions which work havoc 
in private life work havoc in public life also. It 
is not to be supposed that out of something as 
evil as envy good results will flow. Those, therefore, 
who from idealistic reasons desire profound changes 
in our social system, and a great increase of social 
justice, must hope that other forces than envy will 
be instrumental in bringing the changes about. 

All bad things are interconnected, and any 
one of them is liable to be the cause of any other ; 
more particularly fatigue is a very frequent cause 
of envy. When a man feels inadequate to the work 
he has to do, he feels a general discontent which is 
exceedingly liable to take the form of envy towards 
those whose work is less exacting. One of the ways 
of diminishing envy, therefore, is to diminish 
fatigue. But by far the most important thing is 

9* 



ENVY 

to secure a life which is satisfying to instinct. Much 
envy that seems purely professional really has a 
sexual source. A man who is happy in his marriage 
and his children is not likely to feel much envy 
of other men because of their greater wealth or 
success, so long as he has enough to bring up his 
children in what he feels to be the right way. 
The essentials of human happiness are simple, so 
simple that sophisticated people cannot bring 
themselves to admit what it is they really lack. 
The women we spoke of earlier who look with envy 
on every well-dressed woman are, one may be 
sure, not happy in their instinctive life. Instinctive 
happiness is rare in the English-speaking world, 
especially among women. Civilization in this respect 
appears to have gone astray. If there is to be less 
envy, means must be found for remedying this 
state of affairs, and if no such means are found 
our civilization is in danger of going down to destruc- 
tion in an orgy of hatred. In old days people only 
envied their neighbours, because they knew little 
about anyone else. Now through education and 
the Press they know much in an abstract way about 
large classes of mankind of whom no single individual 
is among their acquaintance. Through the movies 
they think they know how the rich live, through 
the newspapers they know much of the wickedness 
of foreign nations, through propaganda they know 
of the nefarious practices of all whose skin has 
a pigmentation different from their own. Yellows 

93 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

hate whites, whites hate blacks, and so on. All 
this hatred, you may say, is stirred up by propa- 
ganda, but this is a somewhat shallow explanation. 
Why is propaganda so much more successful when 
it stirs up hatred than when it tries to stir up friendly 
feeling? The reason is clearly that the human heart 
as modern civilization has made it is more prone 
to hatred than to friendship. And it is prone to 
hatred because it is dissatisfied, because it feels 
deeply, perhaps even unconsciously, that it has 
somehow missed the meaning of life, that perhaps 
others, but not wc ourselves, have secured the 
good things which nature offers for man's enjoy- 
ment. The positive sum of pleasures in a modern 
man's life is undoubtedly greater than was to be 
found in more primitive communities, but the 
consciousness of what might be has increased even 
more. Whenever you happen to take your children 
to the Zoo you may observe in the eyes of the apes, 
when they are not performing gymnastic feats or 
cracking nuts, a strange strained sadness. One 
can almost imagine that they feel they ought to 
become men, but cannot discover the secret of how 
to do it. On the road of evolution they have lost 
their way ; their cousins marched on and they were 
left behind. Something of the same strain and 
anguish seems to have entered the soul of civilized 
man. He knows there is something better than 
himself almost within his grasp, yet he does not 
know where to seek it or how to find it. In despair 
94 



ENVY 

he rages against his fellow man, who is equally 
lost and equally unhappy. We have reached a stage 
in evolution which is not the final stage. We must 
pass through it quickly, for if we do not, most of 
us will perish by the way, and the others will be lost 
in a forest of doubt and fear. Envy therefore, evil 
as it is, and terrible as are its effects, is not wholly 
of the devil. It is in part the expression of an heroic 
pain, the pain of those who walk through the 
night blindly, perhaps to a better resting-place, 
perhaps only to death and destruction. To find the 
right road out of this despair civilized man must 
enlarge his heart as he has enlarged his mind. He 
must learn to transcend self, and in so doing to 
acquire the freedom of the Universe. 



95 



CHAPTER VII 
THE SENSE OF SIN 

Concerning the sense of sin we have already in 
Chapter I had occasion to say something, but we 
must now go into it more fully, since it is one of 
the most important of the underlying psychological 
causes of unhappiness in adult life. 

There is a traditional religious psychology of 
sin which no modern psychologist can accept. 
It was supposed, especially by Protestants, that 
conscience reveals to every man when an act to 
which he is tempted is sinful, and that after com- 
mitting such an act he may experience either of 
two painful feelings, one called remorse, in which 
there is no merit, and the other called repentance, 
which is capable of wiping out his guilt. In Protes- 
tant countries even many of those who lost their 
faith continued for a time to accept with greater 
or smaller modifications the orthodox view of sin. 
In our own day, pardy owing to psycho-analysis, 
we have the opposite state of affairs : not only do 
the unorthodox reject the old doctrine of sin, 
but many of those who still consider themselves 
orthodox do so likewise. Conscience has ceased 
to be something mysterious which, because it was 
mysterious, could be regarded as the voice of 
God. We know that conscience enjoins different 
acts in different parts of the world, and that broadly 

96 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

speaking it is everywhere in agreement with tribal 
custom. What, then, is really happening when a 
man's conscience pricks him? 

The word "conscience" covers, as a matter of 
fact, several different feelings ; the simplest of these 
is the fear of being found out. You, reader, have, 
I am sure, lived a completely blameless life, but if 
you will ask someone who has at some time acted 
in a manner for which he would be punished if 
it became known, you will find that, when discovery 
seemed imminent, the person in question repented 
of his crime. I do not say that this would apply 
to the professional thief who expects a certain 
amount of prison as a trade risk, but it applies to 
what may be called the respectable offender, such 
as the Bank Manager who has embezzled in a 
moment of stress, or the clergyman who has been 
tempted by passion into some sensual irregularity. 
Such men can forget their crime when there seems 
little chance of detection, but when they are found 
out, or in grave danger of being so, they wish they 
had been more virtuous, and this wish may give 
them a lively sense of the enormity of their sin. 
Closely allied with this feeling is the fear of becoming 
an outcast from the herd. A man who cheats at 
cards or fails to pay his debts of honour has nothing 
within himself by which to stand up against the 
disapproval of the herd when he is found out. In 
this he is unlike the religious innovator, the anarchist, 
and the revolutionary, who all feel that, whatever 

o 97 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

may be their fate in the present, the future is with 
them and will honour them as much as they are 
execrated in the present. These men, in spite of 
the hostility of the herd, do not feel sinful, but the 
man who entirely accepts the morality of the herd 
while acting against it suffers great unhappiness 
when he loses caste, and the fear of this disaster, 
or the pain of it when it has happened, may easily 
cause him to regard his acts themselves as sinful. 

But the sense of sin in its most important forms 
is something which goes deeper. It is something 
which has its roots in the unconscious, and does 
not appear in consciousness as fear of other people's 
disapproval. In consciousness certain kinds of 
acts are labelled Sin for no reason visible to intro- 
spection. When a man commits these acts he 
feels uncomfortable without quite knowing why. 
He wishes he were the kind of man who could 
abstain from what he believes to be sin. He gives 
moral admiration only to those whom he believes 
to be pure in heart. He recognizes with a greater or 
less degree of regret that it is not for him to be a 
saint; indeed, his conception of saintship is probably 
one which it is nearly impossible to carry out in 
an ordinary everyday life. Consequently he goes 
through life with a sense of guilt, feeling that 
the best is not for him, and that his highest moments 
are those of maudlin penitence. 

The source of all this in practically every case 
is the moral teaching which the man received 

98 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

before he was six years old at the hands of his mother 
or his nurse. He learned before that age that it is 
wicked to swear, and not quite nice to use any 
but the most ladylike language, that only bad men 
drink, and that tobacco is incompatible with the 
highest virtue. He learned that one should never 
tell a lie. And above all he learned that any interest 
in the sexual parts is an abomination. He knew 
these to be the view of his mother, and believed 
them to be those of his Creator. To be affectionately 
treated by his mother, or, if she was neglectful, 
by his nurse, was the greatest pleasure of his life, 
and was only obtainable when he had not been 
known to sin against the moral code. He therefore 
came to associate something vaguely awful with 
any conduct of which his mother or nurse would 
disapprove. Gradually as he grew older he forgot 
where his moral code had come from and what had 
originally been the penalty for disobeying it, but 
he did not throw off the moral code or cease to feel 
that something dreadful was liable to happen to 
him if he infringed it. 

Now very large parts of this infantile moral 
teaching are devoid of all rational foundation and 
such as cannot be applied to the ordinary behaviour 
of ordinary men. A man who uses what is called 
"bad language", for example, is not from a rational 
point of view any worse than a man who does 
not. Nevertheless, practically everybody in trying to 
imagine a saint would consider abstinence from 

99 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

swearing as essential. Considered in the light of 
reason this is simply silly. The same applies to 
alcohol and tobacco. With regard to alcohol the 
feeling does not exist in Southern countries, and 
indeed there is an element of impiety about it, 
since it is known that Our Lord and the Apostles 
drank wine. With regard to tobacco it is easier to 
maintain a negative position, since all the greatest 
saints lived before its use was known. But here also 
no rational argument is possible. The view that no 
saint would smoke is based in the last analysis 
upon the view that no saint would do anything 
solely because it gave him pleasure. This ascetic 
element in ordinary morality has become almost 
unconscious, but it operates in all kinds of ways 
that make our moral code irrational. In a rational 
ethic it will be held laudable to give pleasure to 
anyone, even to oneself, provided there is no 
counter-balancing pain to oneself or to others. 
The ideally virtuous man, if we had got rid of 
asceticism, would be the man who permits the 
enjoyment of all good things whenever there is no 
evil consequence to outweigh the enjoyment. Take 
again the question of lying. I do not deny that there 
is a great deal too much lying in the world, and that 
we should all be the better for an increase of truth- 
fulness, but I do deny, as I think every rational 
person must, that lying is in no circumstances 
justified. I once in the course of a country walk 
saw a tired fox at the last stages of exhaustion still 
too 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

forcing himself to run. A few minutes afterwards 
I saw the hunt. They asked me if I had seen the 
fox, and I said I had. They asked me which way 
he had gone, and I lied to them. I do not think I 
should have been a better man if I had told the 
truth. 

But it is above all in the realm of sex that early 
moral teaching does harm. If a child has been 
conventionally educated by somewhat stern parents 
or nurses, the association between sin and the 
sex organs is so firmly established by the time he is 
six years old that it is unlikely ever to be completely 
undone throughout the rest of his life. This feeling 
is, of course, reinforced by the CEdipus complex, 
since the woman most loved in childhood is one 
with whom all sexual freedoms are impossible. 
The result is that many adult men feel women to 
be degraded by sex, and cannot respect their wives 
unless their wives hate sexual intercourse. But the 
man whose wife is cold will be driven by instinct 
to seek instinctive satisfaction elsewhere. His in- 
stinctive satisfaction, however, even if he momen- 
tarily finds it, will be poisoned by the sense of 
guilt, so that he cannot be happy in any relation 
with a woman, whether in marriage or outside it. 
On the woman's side the same sort of thing happens 
if she has been very emphatically taught to be what 
is called "pure". She instinctively holds herself 
back in her sexual relations with her husband, and 
is afraid of deriving any pleasure from them. In 

ioi 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

the present day, however, there is very much less 
of this on the part of women than there was fifty 
years ago. I should say that at present among 
educated people the sex life of men is more contorted 
and more poisoned by the sense of sin than that of 
women. 

There is beginning to be widespread awareness, 
though not of course on the part of public authori- 
ties, of the evils of traditional sex education in 
regard to the very young. The right rule is simple : 
until a child is nearing the age of puberty teach 
him or her no sexual morality whatever, and 
carefully avoid instilling the idea that there is any- 
thing disgusting in the natural bodily functions. 
As the time approaches when it becomes necessary 
to give moral instruction, be sure that it is rational, 
and that at every point you can give good grounds 
for what you say. But it is not on education that 
I wish to speak in this book. In this book I am 
concerned rather with what the adult can do to 
minimize the evil effects of unwise education in 
causing an irrational sense of sin. 

The problem here is the same as has confronted 
us in earlier chapters, namely that of compelling 
the unconscious to take note of the rational beliefs 
that govern our conscious thought. Men must not 
allow themselves to be swayed by their moods, 
believing one thing at one moment and another 
at another. The sense of sin is especially prominent 
at moments when the conscious will is weakened 

10a 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

by fatigue, by illness, by drink, or by any other 
cause. What a man feels at these moments (unless 
caused by drink) is supposed to be a revelation from 
his higher self. "The devil was sick, the devil a saint 
would be." But it is absurd to suppose that moments 
of weakness give more insight than moments of 
strength. In moments of weakness it is difficult to 
resist infantile suggestions, but there is no reason 
whatsoever for regarding such suggestions as prefer- 
able to the beliefs of the adult man when in full 
possession of his faculties. On the contrary, what a 
man deliberately believes with his whole reason 
when he is vigorous ought to be to him the norm 
as to what he had better believe at all times. It is 
quite possible to overcome infantile suggestions of 
the unconscious, and even to change the contents 
of the unconscious, by employing the right kind of 
technique. Whenever you begin to feel remorse for 
an act which your reason tells you is not wicked, 
examine the causes of your feeling of remorse, and 
convince yourself in detail of their absurdity. 
Let your conscious beliefs be so vivid and emphatic 
that they make an impression upon your unconscious 
strong enough to cope with the impressions made 
by your nurse or your mother when you were an 
infant. Do not be content with an alternation between 
moments of rationality and moments of irrationality. 
Look into the irrationality closely, with a deter- 
mination not to respect it, and not to let it dominate 
you. Whenever it thrusts foolish thoughts or feelings 

103 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

into your consciousness, pull them up by the roots, 
examine them, and reject them. Do not allow your- 
self to remain a vacillating creature, swayed half 
by reason and half by infantile folly. Do not be 
afraid of irreverence towards the memory of those 
who controlled your childhood. They seemed to 
you then strong and wise because you were weak 
and foolish; now that you are neither, it is your 
business to examine their apparent strength and 
wisdom, to consider whether they deserve that 
reverence that from force of habit you still bestow 
upon them. Ask yourself seriously whether the world 
is the better for the moral teaching traditionally 
given to the young. Consider how much of un- 
adulterated superstition goes into the make-up of 
the conventionally virtuous man, and reflect that, 
while all kinds of imaginary moral dangers were 
guarded against by incredibly foolish prohibitions, 
the real moral dangers to which an adult is exposed 
were practically unmentioned. What are the really 
harmful acts to which the average man is tempted? 
Sharp practice in business of the sort not punished 
by law, harshness towards employees, cruelty 
towards wife and children, malevolence towards 
competitors, ferocity in political conflicts — these 
are the really harmful sins that are common among 
respectable and respected citizens. By means of 
these sins a man spreads misery in his immediate 
circle and does his bit towards destroying civiliza- 
tion. Yet these are not the things that make him, 
104 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

when he is ill, regard himself as an outcast who 
has forfeited all claim to divine favour. These are 
not the things that cause him in nightmares to see 
visions of his mother bending reproachful glances 
upon him. Why is his subconscious morality thus 
divorced from reason? Because the ethic believed 
in by those who had charge of his infancy was silly; 
because it was not derived from any study of the 
individual's duty to the community ; because it was 
made up of old scraps of irrational taboos; and 
because it contained within itself elements of mor- 
bidness derived from the spiritual sickness that 
troubled the dying Roman Empire. Our nominal 
morality has been formulated by priests and 
mentally enslaved women. It is time that men who 
have to take a normal part in the normal life of 
the world learned to rebel against this sickly nonsense. 
But if the rebellion is to be successful in bringing 
individual happiness and in enabling a man to live 
consistently by one standard, not to vacillate 
between two, it is necessary that he should think 
and feel deeply about what his reason tells him. 
Most men, when they have thrown off superficially 
the superstitions of their childhood, think that 
there is no more to be done. They do not realize 
that these superstitions are still lurking under- 
ground. When a rational conviction has been 
arrived at, it is necessary to dwell upon it, to follow 
out its consequences, to search out in oneself whatever 
beliefs inconsistent with the new conviction might 

105 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

otherwise survive, and when the sense of sin grows 
strong, as from time to time it will, to treat it not as 
a revelation and a call to higher things, but as a 
disease and a weakness, unless of course it is caused 
by some act which a rational ethic would condemn. 
I am not suggesting that a man should be destitute 
of morality, I am only suggesting that he should be 
destitute of superstitious morality, which is a very 
different thing. 

But even when a man has offended against his 
own rational code, I doubt whether a sense of sin 
is the best method of arriving at a better way of 
life. There is in the sense of sin something abject, 
something lacking in self-respect. No good was ever 
done to anyone by the loss of self-respect. The 
rational man will regard his own undesirable acts 
as he regards those of others, as acts produced by 
certain circumstances, and to be avoided either 
by a fuller realization that they are undesirable, 
or, where this is possible, by avoidance of the 
circumstances that caused them. 

As a matter of fact the sense of sin, so far from 
being a cause of a good life, is quite the reverse. 
It makes a man unhappy and it makes him feel 
inferior. Being unhappy, he is likely to make claims 
upon other people which are excessive and which 
prevent him from enjoying happiness in personal 
relations. Feeling inferior, he will have a grudge 
against those who seem superior. He will find 
admiration difficult and envy easy. He will become 

1 06 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

a generally disagreeable person, and will find him- 
self more and more solitary. An expansive and 
generous attitude towards other people not only 
gives happiness to others, but is an immense source 
of happiness to its possessor, since it causes him 
to be generally liked. But such an attitude- is scarcely 
possible to the man haunted by a sense of sin. It 
is an outcome of poise and self-reliance ; it demands 
what may be called mental integration, by which 
I mean that the various layers of a man's nature, 
conscious, subconscious, and unconscious, work 
together harmoniously and are not engaged in 
perpetual battle. To produce such harmony is 
possible in most cases by wise education, but where 
education has been unwise it is a more difficult 
process. It is the process which the psycho-analysts 
attempt, but I believe that in a very great many 
cases the patient can himself perform the work 
which in more extreme cases requires the help of 
the expert. Do not say: "I have no time for such 
psychological labours; my life is a busy one filled 
with affairs, and I must leave my unconscious to 
its tricks." Nothing so much diminishes not only 
happiness but efficiency as a personality divided 
against itself. The time spent in producing harmony 
between the different parts of one's personality 
is time usefully employed. I do not suggest that 
a man should set apart, say, an hour a day for self- 
examination. This is to my mind by no means the 
best method, since it increases self-absorption, 

107 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

which is part of the disease to be cured, for a 
harmonious personality is directed outward. What 
I suggest is that a man should make up his mind 
with emphasis as to what he rationally believes, 
and should never allow contrary irrational beliefs 
to pass unchallenged or obtain a hold over him, 
however brief. This is a question of reasoning with 
himself in those moments in which he is tempted to 
become infantile, but the reasoning, if it is sufficiently 
emphatic, may be very brief. The time involved, 
therefore, should be negligible. 

There is in many people a dislike of rationality, 
and where this exists the kind of thing that I have 
been saying will seem irrelevant and unimportant. 
There is an idea that rationality, if allowed free 
play, will kill all the deeper emotions. This belief 
appears to me to be due to an entirely erroneous 
conception of the function of reason in human life. 
It is not the business of reason to generate emotions, 
though it may be part of its function to discover 
ways of preventing such emotions as are an obstacle 
to well-being. To find ways of minimizing hatred 
and envy is no doubt part of the function of a 
rational psychology. But it is a mistake to suppose 
that in minimizing these passions we shall at the 
same time diminish the strength of those passions 
which reason does not condemn. In passionate love, 
in parental affection, in friendship, in benevolence, 
in devotion to science or art, there is nothing that 
reason should wish to diminish. The rational man, 

108 



THE SENSE OF SIN 

when he feels any or all of these emotions, will be 
glad that he feels them and will do nothing to lessen 
their strength, for all these emotions are parts of 
the good life, the life, that is, that makes for happi- 
ness both in oneself and in others. There is nothing 
irrational in the passions as such, and many irrational 
people feel only the most trivial passions. No man 
need fear that by making himself rational he will 
make his life dull. On the contrary, since rationality 
consists in the main of internal harmony, the man 
who achieves it is freer in his contemplation of the 
world and in the use of his energies to achieve 
external purposes than is the man who is perpetually 
hampered by inward conflicts. Nothing is so dull 
as to be encased in self, nothing so exhilarating as 
to have attention and energy directed outwards. 

Our traditional morality has been unduly self- 
centred, and the conception of sin is part of this 
unwise focusing of attention upon self. To those 
who have never passed through the subjective 
moods induced by this faulty morality, reason may 
be unnecessary. But to those who have once acquired 
the sickness, reason is necessary in effecting a cure. 
And perhaps the sickness is a necessary stage in 
mental development. I am inclined to think that 
the man who has passed beyond it by the help of 
reason has reached a higher level than the man 
who has never experienced either the sickness or 
the cure. The hatred of reason which is common in 
our time is very largely due to the fact that the 

109 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

operations of reason are not conceived in a sufficiently 
fundamental way. The man divided against himself 
looks for excitement and distraction; he loves strong 
passions, not for sound reasons, but because for the 
moment they take him outside himself and prevent 
the painful necessity of thought. Any passion is to 
him a form of intoxication, and since he cannot 
conceive of fundamental happiness, all relief from 
pain appears to him solely possible in the form of 
intoxication. This, however, is the symptom of a 
deep-seated malady. Where there is no such malady, 
the greatest happiness comes with the most complete 
possession of one's faculties. It is in the moments 
when the mind is most active and the fewest things 
are forgotten that the most intense joys are experi- 
enced. This, indeed, is one of the best touchstones of 
happiness. The happiness that requires intoxication 
of no matter what sort is a spurious and unsatisfying 
kind. The happiness that is genuinely satisfying is 
accompanied by the fullest exercise of our faculties, 
and the fullest realization of the world in which 
we live. 



no 



CHAPTER VIII 
PERSECUTION MANIA 

In its more extreme forms persecution mania is a 
recognized form of insanity. Some people imagine 
that others wish to kill them, or imprison them, or 
to do them some other grave injury. Often the wish 
to protect themselves against imaginary persecutors 
leads them into acts of violence 'which make it 
necessary to restrain their liberty. This, like many 
other forms of insanity, is only an exaggeration of 
a tendency not at all uncommon among people who 
count as normal. I do not piopose to discuss the 
extreme forms, which are a matter for a psychiatrist. 
It is the milder forms that I wish to consider, because 
they are a very frequent cause of unhappiness, and 
because, not having gone so far as to produce 
definite insanity, they are still capable of being 
dealt with by the patient himself, provided he can 
be induced to diagnose his trouble righdy and to 
see that its origin lies within himself and not in the 
supposed hostility or unkindness of others. 

We are all familiar with the type of person, man 
or woman, who, according to his own account, 
is perpetually the victim of ingratitude, unkindness, 
and treachery. People of this kind are often extra- 
ordinarily plausible, and secure warm sympathy from 
those who have not known them long. There is, as 
a rule, nothing inherently improbable about each 

in 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

separate story that they relate. The kind of ill-treat- 
ment of which they complain does undoubtedly 
sometimes occur. What in the end rouses the 
hearer's suspicions is the multiplicity of villains 
whom it has been the sufferer's ill-fortune to meet 
with. In accordance with the doctrine of probability, 
different people living in a given society are likely 
in the course of their lives to meet with about the 
same amount of bad treatment. If one person in 
a given set receives, according to his own account, 
universal ill-treatment, the likelihood is that the 
cause lies in himself, and that he either imagines 
injuries from which in fact he has not suffered, or 
unconsciously behaves in such a way as to arouse 
uncontrollable irritation. Experienced people there- 
fore become suspicious of those who by their own 
account are invariably ill-treated by the world; 
they tend, by their lack of sympathy, to confirm 
these unfortunate people in the view that everyone 
is against them. The trouble, in fact, is a difficult 
one to deal with, since it is inflamed alike by sym- 
pathy and by lack of sympathy. The person inclined 
to persecution mania, when he finds a hard-luck 
story believed, will embellish it until he reaches the 
frontier of credibility ; when, on the other hand, he 
finds it disbelieved, he has merely another example 
of the peculiar hard-heartedness of mankind towards 
himself. The disease is one that can only be dealt 
with by understanding, and this understanding 
must be conveyed to the patient if it is to serve its 
na 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

purpose. My purpose in this chapter is to suggest 
some general reflections by means of which each 
individual can detect in himself the elements of 
persecution mania (from which almost everybody 
suffers in' a greater or less degree), and, having 
detected them, can eliminate them. This is an 
important part of the conquest of happiness, since 
it is quite impossible to be happy if we feel that 
everybody ill-treats us. 

One of the most universal forms of irrationality 
is the attitude taken by practically everybody 
towards malicious gossip. Very few people can resist 
saying malicious things about their acquaintances, 
and even on occasion about their friends ; yet when 
people hear that anything has been said against 
themselves, they are filled with indignant amaze- 
ment. It has apparently never occurred to them 
that, just as they gossip about everyone else, so 
everyone else gossips about them. This is a mild 
form of the attitude which, when exaggerated, 
leads on to persecution mania. We expect every- 
body else to feci towards us that tender love and 
that profound respect which we feel towards our- 
selves. It does not occur to us that we cannot 
expect others to think better of us than we think 
of them, and the reason this does not occur to us 
is that our own merits are great and obvious, whereas 
those of others, if they exist at all, are only visible to 
a very charitable eye. When you hear that so-and-so 
has said something horrid about you, you remember 

h 113 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

the ninety-nine times when you have refrained 
from uttering the most just and well-deserved 
criticism of him, and forget the hundredth time 
when in an unguarded moment you have declared 
what you believe to be the truth about him. Is this 
the reward, you feel, for all your long forbearance? 
Yet from his point of view your conduct appears 
exactly what his appears to you ; he knows nothing 
of the times when you have not spoken, he knows 
only of the hundredth time when you did speak. 
If we were all given by magic the power to read 
each other's thoughts, I suppose the first effect 
would be that almost all friendships would be 
dissolved; the second effect, however, might be 
excellent, for a world without any friends would be 
felt to be intolerable, and we should learn to like 
each other without needing a veil of illusion to con- 
ceal from ourselves that we did not think each 
other absolutely perfect. We know that our friends 
have their faults, and yet are on the whole agreeable 
people whom we like. We find it, however, intolerable 
that they should have the same attitude towards us. 
We expect them to think that, unlike the rest of 
mankind, we have no faults. When we are compelled 
to admit that we have faults, we take this obvious 
fact far too seriously. Nobody should expect to be 
perfect, or be unduly troubled by the fact that he 
is not. 

Persecution mania is always rooted in a too 
exaggerated conception of our own merits. I am, 

«»4 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

we will say, a playwright ; to every unbiased person it 
must be obvious that I am the most brilliant play- 
wright of the age. Nevertheless, for some reason, 
my plays are seldom performed, and when they are, 
they are not successful. What is the explanation of 
this strange state of affairs? Obviously that managers, 
actors, and critics have combined against me for 
one reason or another. The reason, of course, is 
highly creditable to myself: I have refused to kow- 
tow to the great ones of the theatrical world ; I have 
not flattered the critics; my plays contain home 
truths which are unbearable to those whom they 
hit. And so my transcendent merit languishes un- 
recognized. 

Then there is the inventor who has never been 
able to get anyone to examine the merits of his 
invention; manufacturers are set in their ways and 
will not consider any innovation, while the few who 
are progressive keep inventors of their own, who 
succeed in warding off the intrusions of unauthorized 
genius; the learned societies, strangely enough, 
lose one's manuscripts or return them unread; 
individuals to whom one appeals are unaccountably 
unresponsive. How is such a state of affairs to be 
explained? Obviously there is a close corporation 
of men who wish to divide among themselves 
the plums to be obtained by means of invention ; 
the man who does not belong to this close corpora- 
tion will not be listened to. 

Then there is the man who has a genuine grievance 

"5 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

founded upon actual fact, but who generalizes in 
the light of his experience and arrives at the con- 
clusion that his own misfortune affords the key to 
the universe; he discovers, let us say, some scandal 
about the Secret Service which it is to the interest 
of the Government to keep dark. He can obtain 
hardly any publicity for his discovery, and the most 
apparently high-minded men refuse to lift a finger 
to remedy the evil which fills him with indignation. 
So far the facts are as he says they are. But his 
rebuffs have made such an impression upon him 
that he believes all powerful men to be occupied 
wholly and solely in covering up the crimes to which 
they owe their power. Cases of this kind are par- 
ticularly obstinate, owing to the partial truth of 
their outlook; the thing that has touched them 
personally has made, as is natural, more impression 
upon them than the much larger number of matters 
of which they have had no direct experience. This 
gives them a wrong sense of proportion, and causes 
them to attach undue importance to facts which are 
perhaps exceptional rather than typical. 

Another not uncommon victim of persecution 
mania is a certain type of philanthropist who is 
always doing good to people against their will, 
and is amazed and horrified that they display no 
gratitude. Our motives in doing good are seldom 
as pure as we imagine them to be. Love of power is 
insidious; it has many disguises, and is often the 
source of the pleasure we derive from doing what we 

116 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

believe to be good to other people. Not infrequently, 
yet another element enters in. "Doing good" to 
people generally consists in depriving them of some 
pleasure: drink, or gambling, or idleness, or what 
not. In this case there is an element which is typical 
of much social morality, namely envy of those who 
are in a position to commit sins from which we have 
to abstain if we are to retain the respect of our 
friends. Those who vote, let us say, for a law against 
cigarette smoking (such laws exist, or existed, 
in several American States) are obviously non- 
smokers to whom the pleasure which others derive 
from tobacco is a source of pain. If they expect 
those who were previously cigarette fiends to come 
in a deputation and thank them for emancipation 
from this odious vice, it is possible that they may be 
disappointed. They may then begin to reflect that 
they have given their lives for the public good, and 
that those who have most reason for thanking them 
for their beneficent activities appear to be the least 
aware of any occasion for gratitude. 

One used to find the same kind of attitude on the 
part of mistresses towards domestic servants whose 
morals they safeguarded. But in these days the 
servant problem has become so acute that this 
form of kindness to maids has become less common. 

In the higher walks of politics the same sort of 
thing occurs. The statesman who has gradually 
concentrated all power within himself in order 
that he may be able to carry out the high and noble 

"7 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

aims which have led him to eschew comfort and 
enter the arena of public life, is amazed at the 
ingratitude of the people when they turn against 
him. It never occurs to him that his work may 
have had anything but a public motive, or that the 
pleasure of controlling affairs may have in any 
degree inspired his activities. The phrases which are 
customary on the platform and in the Party Press 
have gradually come to him to seem to express 
truths, and he mistakes the rhetoric of partisanship 
for a genuine analysis of motives. Disgusted and 
disillusioned, he retires from the world after the 
world has retired from him, and regrets that he 
ever attempted so thankless a task as the pursuit 
of the public good. 

These illustrations suggest four general maxims, 
which will prove an adequate preventive of perse- 
cution mania if their truth is sufficiently realized. 
The first is: remember that your motives are not 
always as altruistic as they seem to yourself. The 
second is: don't over-estimate your own merits. 
The third is: don't expect others to take as much 
interest in you as you do yourself. And the fourth 
is: don't imagine that most people give enough 
thought to you to have any special desire to perse- 
cute you. I shall say a few words about each of these 
maxims in turn. 

Suspicion of one's own motives is especially 
necessary for the philanthropist and the executive; 
such people have a vision of how the world, or some 

118 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

part of it, should be, and they feel, sometimes 
rightly, sometimes wrongly, that in realizing their 
vision they will be conferring a boon upon man- 
kind or some section of it. They do not, however, 
adequately realize that the individuals affected 
by their operations have each an equal right to 
his own view as to the sort of world he wants. A 
man of the executive type is quite sure that his 
vision is right, and that any contrary one is wrong. 
But his subjective certainty affords no proof that 
he is objectively right. Moreover, his belief is very 
often only a camouflage for the pleasure that he 
derives from contemplating changes of which he 
is the cause. And in addition to love of power there 
is another motive, namely vanity, which operates 
strongly in such cases. The high-minded idealist 
who stands for Parliament — on this matter I speak 
from experience — is astonished by the cynicism of 
the electorate which assumes that he only desires 
the glory of writing the letters "M.P." after his 
name. When the contest is over and he has time 
to think, it occurs to him that perhaps after all 
the cynical electors were in the right. Idealism 
causes simple motives to wear strange disguises, 
and therefore some dash of realistic cynicism does 
not come amiss in our public men. Conventional 
morality inculcates a degree of altruism of which 
human nature is scarcely capable, and those who 
pride themselves upon their virtue often imagine 
that they attain this unattainable ideal. The immense 

119 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

majority of even the noblest persons' actions have 
self-regarding motives, nor is this to be regretted, 
since, if it were otherwise, the human race could not 
survive. A man who spent his time seeing that others 
were fed and forgot to feed himself would perish. 
He may, of course, take nourishment solely in order 
to provide himself with the necessary strength 
to plunge again into the battle against evil, but it 
is doubtful whether food eaten with this motive 
could be adequately digested, since the flow of 
saliva would be insufficiently stimulated. It is 
better therefore that a man should eat because he 
enjoys his food than that the time he spends at his 
meals should be solely inspired by a desire for 
the public good. 

And what applies to eating applies to everything 
else. Whatever is to be done can only be done 
adequately by the help of a certain zest, and zest 
is difficult without some self-regarding motive. 
I should include among self-regarding motives, 
from this point of view, those that concern persons 
biologically connected with oneself, such as the 
impulse to the defence of wife and children against 
enemies. This degree of altruism is part of normal 
human nature, but the degree inculcated in con- 
ventional ethics is not, and is very rarely attained 
genuinely. People who wish to have a high opinion 
of their own moral excellence have therefore to 
persuade themselves that they have achieved a 
degree of unselfishness that it is very unlikely that 

120 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

they have achieved, and hence the endeavour 
after saintliness comes to be connected with self- 
deception of a kind that easily leads on to persecution 
mania. 

The second of our four maxims, to the effect that 
it is unwise to over-estimate your own merits, is 
covered, so far as morals are concerned, by what 
we have already said. But merits other than moral 
should equally not be over-estimated. The play- 
wright whose plays never succeed should consider 
calmly the hypothesis that they are bad plays; 
he should not reject this out of hand as obviously 
untenable. If he finds that it fits the facts, he should, 
as an inductive philosopher, adopt it. It is true that 
there are in history cases of unrecognized merit, 
but they are far less numerous than the cases of 
recognized demerit. If a man is a genius whom the 
age will not recognize, he is quite right to persist 
in his course in spite of lack of recognition. If, on 
the other hand, he is an untalcnted person puffed 
up with vanity, he will do well not to persist. There 
is no way of knowing to which of these two categories 
one belongs if one is afflicted with the impulse to 
produce unrecognized masterpieces. If you belong 
to the one category, your persistence is heroic ; if to 
the other, ludicrous. When you have been dead 
a hundred years, it will be possible to guess to 
which category you belonged. In the meantime, 
there is a test, not perhaps infallible, but yet of 
considerable value, which you may apply yourself 

121 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

if you suspect that you are a genius while your 
friends suspect that you are not. The test is this: 
do you produce because you feel an urgent compul- 
sion to express certain ideas or feelings, or are you 
actuated by the desire for applause? In the genuine 
artist the desire for applause, while it usually exists 
strongly, is secondary, in the sense that the artist 
wishes to produce a certain kind of work, and 
hopes that that work may be applauded, but will 
not alter his style even if no applause is forthcoming. 
The man, on the other hand, to whom the desire 
for applause is the primary motive, has no force 
within himself urging him to a particular kind of 
expression, and could therefore just as well do work 
of some wholly different kind. Such a man, if he 
fails to win applause by his art, had better give it 
up. And, speaking more generally, whatever your 
line in life may be, if you find that others do not 
rate your abilities as highly as you do yourself, do 
not be too sure that it is they who are mistaken. 
If you allow yourself to think this, you may easily 
fall into the belief that there is a conspiracy to 
prevent the recognition of your merit, and this 
belief is pretty sure to be the source of an unhappy 
life. To recognize that your merit is not so great 
as you had hoped maybe more painful for a moment, 
but it is a pain which has an end, beyond which 
a happy life again becomes possible. 

Our third maxim was not to expect too much 
of others. It used to be customary for invalid ladies 

1 93 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

to expect at least one of their daughters to sacrifice 
themselves completely in performing the duties of 
a nurse, even to the extent of forgoing marriage. 
This is to expect of another a degree of altruism 
which is contrary to reason, since the loss to the 
altruist is greater than the gain to the egoist. In 
all your dealings with other people, especially with 
those who are nearest and dearest, it is important 
and not always easy to remember that they see life 
from their own angle and as it touches their own 
ego, not from your angle and as it touches yours. 
No person should be expected to distort the main 
lines of his life for the sake of another individual. 
On occasion there may exist such a strong affection 
that even the greatest sacrifices become natural, 
but if they are not natural they should not be made, 
and no person should be held blameworthy for 
not making them. Very often the conduct that 
people complain of in others is not more than the 
healthy reaction of natural egoism against the 
grasping rapacity of a person whose ego extends 
beyond its proper limits. 

The fourth maxim that we mentioned consists 
of realizing that other people spend less time in 
thinking about you than you do yourself. The 
insane victim of persecution mania imagines that 
all sorts of people, who, in fact, have their own avo- 
cations and interests, are occupied morning, noon, 
and night in an endeavour to work a mischief to the 
poor lunatic. In like manner, the comparatively 

183 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

sane victim of persecution mania sees in all 
kinds of actions a reference to himself which does 
not, in fact, exist. This idea, of course, is flattering 
to his vanity. If he were a great enough man, it 
might be true. The actions of the British Govern- 
ment for many years were mainly concerned to 
thwart Napoleon. But when a person of no special 
importance imagines that others are perpetually 
thinking about him, he is on the road towards 
insanity. You make a speech, let us say, at some 
public dinner. Photographs of some of the other 
speakers appear in the picture papers, but there is 
no picture of you. How is this to be accounted for? 
Obviously not because the other speakers were 
considered more important; it must be because the 
editors of the papers had given orders that you were 
to be ignored. And why should they have given 
such orders? Obviously because they feared you on 
account of your great importance. In this way the 
omission of your picture is transformed from a 
slight into a subtle compliment. But self-deception 
of this kind cannot lead to any solid happiness. In 
the back of your mind you will know that the facts 
are otherwise, and in order to conceal this from your- 
self as far as possible, you will have to invent more 
and more fantastic hypotheses. The strain of trying 
to believe these will, in the end, become very great. 
And since, moreover, they involve the belief that 
you are the object of widespread hostility, they will 
only safeguard your self-esteem by inflicting the 
134 



PERSECUTION MANIA 

very painful feeling that you are at odds with the 
world. No satisfaction based upon self-deception 
is solid, and, however unpleasant the truth may be, 
it is better to face it once for all, to get used to it, 
and to proceed to build your life in accordance 
with it. 



185 



CHAPTER IX 
FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

Very few people can be happy unless on the whole 
their way of life and their outlook on the world is 
approved by those with whom they have social 
relations, and more especially by those with whom 
they live. It is a peculiarity of modern communities 
that they are divided into sets which differ pro- 
foundly in their morals and in their beliefs. This 
state of affairs began with the Reformation, or 
perhaps one should say with the Renaissance, and 
has grown more pronounced ever since. There were 
Protestants and Catholics, who differed not only 
in theology but on many more practical matters. 
There were aristocrats who permitted various kinds 
of action that were not tolerated among the 
bourgeoisie. Then there came to be latitudinarians 
and free-thinkers who did not recognize the duties 
of religious observance. In our own day throughout 
the Continent of Europe there is a profound division 
between socialists and others, which covers not only 
politics but almost every department of life. In 
English-speaking countries the divisions are very 
numerous. In some sets art is admired, while in 
others it is thought to be of the devil, at any rate 
if it is modern. In some sets devotion to the Empire 
is the supreme virtue, in others it is considered a 
vice, and in yet others a form of stupidity. Con- 
is6 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

vcntional people consider adultery one of the worst 
of crimes, but large sections of the population 
regard it as excusable if not positively laudable. 
Among Catholics divorce is totally forbidden, while 
most non-Catholics accept it as a necessary allevia- 
tion of matrimony. 

Owing to all these differences of outlook a person 
of given tastes and convictions may find himself 
practically an outcast while he lives in one set, 
although in another set he would be accepted as 
an entirely ordinary human being. A very great 
deal of unhappiness, especially among the young, 
arises in this way. A young man or young woman 
somehow catches ideas that are in the air, but finds 
that these ideas are anathema in the particular 
milieu in which he or she lives. It easily seems to 
the young as if the only milieu with which they 
are acquainted were representative of the whole 
world. They can scarcely believe that in another 
place or another set the views which they dare not 
avow for fear of being thought utterly perverse 
would be accepted as the ordinary commonplaces 
of the age. Thus through ignorance of the world a 
great deal of unnecessary misery is endured, some- 
times only in youth, but not infrequently throughout 
life. This isolation is not only a source of pain, it 
also causes a great dissipation of energy in the 
unnecessary task of maintaining mental indepen- 
dence against hostile surroundings, and in ninety- 
nine cases out of a hundred produces a certain 

187 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

timidity in following out ideas to their logical 
conclusions. The Bronte sisters never met any 
congenial people until after their books had been 
published. This did not affect Emily, who was 
heroic and in the grand manner, but it certainly 
did affect Charlotte, whose outlook, in spite of 
her talents, remained always to a large extent 
that of a governess. Blake, like Emily Bronte, lived 
in extreme mental isolation, but like her was great 
enough to overcome its bad effects, since he never 
doubted that he was right and his critics wrong. 
His attitude towards public opinion is expressed 
in the lines : 

The only man that e'er I knew 

Who did not make me almost spew 

Was Fuseli : he was both Turk and Jew. 

And so, dear Christian friends, how do you do? 

But there are not many who have this degree of 
force in their inner life. To almost everybody 
sympathetic surroundings are necessary to happiness. 
To the majority, of course, the surroundings in 
which they happen to find themselves are sympa- 
thetic. They imbibe current prejudices in youth, 
and instinctively adapt themselves to the beliefs and 
customs which they find in existence around them. 
But to a large minority, which includes practically 
all who have any intellectual or artistic merit, 
this attitude of acquiescence is impossible. A per- 
son born, let us say, in some small country town 
finds himself from early youth surrounded by hos- 

128 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

tility to everything that is necessary for mental 
excellence. If he wishes to read serious books, 
other boys despise him, and teachers tell him that 
such works are unsettling. If he cares for art, his 
contemporaries think him unmanly, and his elders 
think him immoral. If he desires any career, however 
respectable, which has not been common in the 
circle to which he belongs, he is told that he is 
setting himself up, and that what was good enough 
for his father ought to be good enough for him. 
If he shows any tendency to criticize his parents' 
religious tenets or political affiliations, he is likely 
to find himself in serious trouble. For all these 
reasons, to most young men and young women of 
exceptional merit adolescence is a time of great 
unhappiness. To their more ordinary companions 
it may be a time of gaiety and enjoyment, but for 
themselves they want something more serious, 
which they can find neither among their elders nor 
among their contemporaries in the particular 
social setting in which chance has caused them to 
be born. 

When such young people go to a University they 
probably discover congenial souls and enjoy a few 
years of great happiness. If they are fortunate, 
they may succeed, on leaving the University, in 
obtaining some kind of work that gives them still 
the possibility of choosing congenial companions; 
an intelligent man who lives in a city as large as 
London or New York can generally find some 

i 129 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

congenial set in which it is not necessary to practise 
any constraint or hypocrisy. But if his work obliges 
him to live in some smaller place, and more par- 
ticularly if it necessitates retention of the respect of 
ordinary people, as is the case, for example, with a 
doctor or a lawyer, he may find himself throughout 
his whole life practically compelled to conceal his 
real tastes and convictions from most of the people 
that he meets in the course of his day. This is 
especially true in America because of the vastness 
of the country. In the most unlikely places, north, 
south, east, and west, one finds lonely individuals 
who know from books that there are places where 
they would not be lonely, but who have no chance 
to live in such places, and only the rarest oppor- 
tunity of congenial conversation. Real happiness 
in such circumstances is impossible to those who are 
built on a less magnificent scale than Blake and 
Emily Bronte. If it is to become possible, some 
way must be found by which the tyranny of public 
opinion can be either lessened or evaded, and 
by which members of the intelligent minority can 
come to know each other and enjoy each other's 
society. 

In a good many cases unnecessary timidity makes 
the trouble worse than it need be. Public opinion 
is always more tyrannical towards those who 
obviously fear it than towards those who feel in- 
different to it. A dog will bark more loudly and 

bite more readily when people are afraid of him 
130 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

than when they treat him with contempt, and the 
human herd has something of this same character- 
istic. If you show that you are afraid of them, you 
give promise of good hunting, whereas if you 
show indifference, they begin to doubt their own 
power and therefore tend to let you alone. I am 
not, of course, thinking of extreme foi ms of defiance. 
If you hold in Kensington the views that are con- 
ventional in Russia, or in Russia the views that are 
conventional in Kensington, you must accept the 
consequences. I am thinking, not of such extremes, 
but of much milder lapses from conventionality, 
such as failure to dress correctly or to belong to 
some Church or to abstain from reading intelligent 
books. Such lapses, if they are done with gaiety 
and insouciance, not defiantly but spontaneously, 
will come to be tolerated even in the most con- 
ventional society. Gradually it may become possible 
to acquire the position of licensed lunatic, to 
whom things are permitted which in another man 
would be thought unforgivable. This is largely 
a matter of a certain kind of good nature and 
friendliness. Conventional people are roused to 
fury by departures from convention, largely because 
they regard such departures as a criticism of them- 
selves. They will pardon much unconventionality 
in a man who has enough jollity and friendliness 
to make it clear, even to the stupidest, that he is 
not engaged in criticizing them. 
This method of escaping crnsure is, however, 

131 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

impossible to many of those whose tastes or opinions 
cause them to be out of sympathy with the herd. 
Their lack of sympathy makes them uncomfortable 
and causes them to have a pugnacious attitude, 
even if outwardly they conform or manage to avoid 
any sharp issue. People who are not in harmony 
with the conventions of their own set tend there- 
fore to be prickly and uncomfortable and lacking 
in expansive good humour. These same people, 
transported into another set where their outlook 
is not thought strange, will seem to change their 
character entirely. From being serious, shy and 
retiring they may become gay and self-confident; 
from being angular they may become smooth and 
easy; from being self-centred they may become 
sociable and extravert. 

Wherever possible, therefore, young people who 
find themselves out of harmony with their sur- 
roundings should endeavour in the choice of a 
profession to select some career which will give 
them a chance of congenial companionship, even 
if this should entail a considerable loss of income. 
Often they hardly know that this is possible, since 
their knowledge of the world is very limited, and 
they may easily imagine that the prejudices to which 
they have become accustomed at home are world 
wide. This is a matter in which older men should 
be able to give much assistance to the young, since 
a considerable experience of mankind is essential. 

It is customary in these days of psycho-analysis 

133 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

to assume that, when any young person is out of 
harmony with his environment, the cause must lie 
in some psychological disorder. This is to my mind 
a complete mistake. Suppose, for example, that a 
young person has parents who believe the doctrine 
of evolution to be wicked. Nothing except intelligence 
is required in such a case to cause him to be out of 
sympathy with them. To be out of harmony with 
one's surroundings is, of course, a misfortune, 
but it is not always a misfortune to be avoided at 
all costs. Where the environment is stupid or 
prejudiced or cruel, it is a sign of merit to be out of 
harmony with it. And to some degree these charac- 
teristics exist in almost every environment. Galileo 
and Kepler had "dangerous thoughts" (as they 
are called in Japan), and so have the most intelli- 
gent men of our own day. It is not desirable that the 
social sense should be so strongly developed as to 
cause such men to fear the social hostility which 
their opinions may provoke. What is desirable is 
to find ways of making this hostility as slight and as 
ineffective as possible. 

In the modern world the most important part of 
this problem arises in youth. If a man is once 
launched upon the right career and in the right 
surroundings, he can in most cases escape social 
persecution, but while he is young and his merits 
are still untested, he is liable to be at the mercy 
of ignorant people who consider themselves capable 
of judging in matters about which they know 

'33 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

nothing, and who are outraged at the suggestion 
that so young a person may know better than they 
do with all their experience of the world. Many 
people who have ultimately escaped from the 
tyranny of ignorance have had so hard a fight and 
so long a time of repression that in the end they 
are embittered and their energy is impaired. There 
is a comfortable doctrine that genius will always 
make its way, and on the strength of this doctrine 
many people consider that the persecution of 
youthful talent cannot do much harm. But there 
is no ground whatever for accepting this doctrine. 
It is like the theory that murder will out. Obviously 
all the murders we know of have been discovered, 
but who knows how many there may be which have 
never been heard of? In like manner all the men of 
genius that we have ever heard of have triumphed 
over adverse circumstances, but that is no reason 
for supposing that there were not innumerable 
others who succumbed in youth. Moreover, it is 
not a question only of genius, but also of talent, 
which is just as necessary to the community. And it 
is not only a question of emerging somehow, but 
also of emerging unembittered and with unimpaired 
energy. For all these reasons the way of youth should 
not be made too hard. 

While it is desirable that the old should treat 
with respect the wishes of the young, it is not 
desirable that the young should treat with respect 
the wishes of the old. The reason is simple, namely 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

that in either case it is the lives of the young that 
are concerned, not the lives of the old. When the 
young attempt to regulate the lives of the old, as, 
for example, by objecting to the remarriage of 
a widowed parent, they are quite as much in 
the wrong as are the old who attempt to regulate 
the lives of the young. Old and young alike, as soon 
as years of discretion have been reached, have a 
right to their own choices, and if necessary to their 
own mistakes. Young people are ill-advised if they 
yield to the pressure of the old in any vital matter. 
Suppose, for example, that you are a young person 
who wishes to go on the stage, and that your parents 
oppose your wish, either on the ground that the 
stage is immoral or on the ground that it is socially 
inferior. They may bring every kind of pressure to 
bear; they may tell you that they will cast you off 
if you ignore their commands ; they may say that 
you will certainly repent within a few years ; they 
may mention whole strings of horrid examples of 
young persons who have been rash enough to do 
what you contemplate doing and came to a bad 
end in consequence. They may of course be right 
in thinking that the stage is not the career for you ; 
it may be that you have no talent for acting, or 
that you have a bad voice. If this is the case, however, 
you will soon discover it from theatrical people, 
and there will still be plenty of time to adopt a 
different career. The arguments of parents should 
not be a sufficient reason for relinquishing the 

>35 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

attempt. If, in spite of all they say, you carry out 
your intention, they will soon come round, much 
sooner in fact than either you or they suppose. 
If on the other hand you find professional opinion 
discouraging, that is another matter, for professional 
opinion must always be treated with respect by 
beginners. 

I think that in general, apart from expert opinion, 
there is too much respect paid to the opinions of 
others, both in great matters and in small ones. One 
should as a rule respect public opinion in so far as is 
necessary to avoid starvation and to keep out of 
prison, but anything that goes beyond this is volun- 
tary submission to an unnecessary tyranny, and is 
likely to interfere with happiness in all kinds of 
ways. Take, for example, the matter of expenditure. 
Very many people spend money in ways quite 
different from those that their natural tastes would 
enjoin, merely because they feel that the respect 
of their neighbours depends upon their possession 
of a good car and their ability to give good dinners. 
As a matter of fact, any man who can obviously 
afford a car but genuinely prefers travel or a good 
library will in the end be much more respected 
than if he behaved exactly like everyone else. 
There is, of course, no point in deliberately flouting 
public opinion; this is still to be under its domina- 
tion, though in a topsy-turvy way. But to be genuinely 
indifferent to it is both a strength and a source of 
happiness. And a society composed of men and 

136 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

women who do not bow too much to the conventions 
is a far more interesting society than one in which 
all behave alike. Where each person's character is 
developed individually, differences of type are pre- 
served, and it is worth while to meet new people, 
because they are not mere replicas of those whom 
one has met already. This has been one of the 
advantages of aristocracy, since where status de- 
pended upon birth behaviour was allowed to be 
erratic. In the modern world we are losing this 
source of social freedom, and therefore a more 
deliberate realization of the dangers of uniformity 
has become desirable. I do not mean that people 
should be intentionally eccentric, which is just as 
uninteresting as being conventional. I mean only 
that people should be natural, and should follow 
their spontaneous tastes in so far as these are not 
definitely anti-social. 

In the modern world, owing to the swiftness of 
locomotion, people are less dependent than they 
used to be upon their geographically nearest 
neighbours. Those who have cars can regard as 
a neighbour any person living within twenty miles. 
They have therefore a much greater power than 
was formerly the case of choosing their companions. 
In any populous neighbourhood a man must be 
very unfortunate if he cannot find congenial souls 
within twenty miles. The idea that one should 
know one's immediate neighbours has died out in 
large centres of population, but still lingers in small 

'37 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

towns and in the country. It has become a foolish 
idea, since there is no need to be dependent upon 
immediate neighbours for society. More and more 
it becomes possible to choose our companions on 
account of congeniality rather than on account of 
mere propinquity. Happiness is promoted by 
associations of persons with similar tastes and 
similar opinions. Social intercourse may be expected 
to develop more and more along these lines, and 
it may be hoped that by these means the loneliness 
that now afflicts so many unconventional people 
will be gradually diminished almost to vanishing 
point. This will undoubtedly increase their happi- 
ness, but it will of course diminish the sadistic 
pleasure which the conventional at present derive 
from having the unconventional at their mercy. 
I do not think, however, that this is a pleasure which 
we need be greatly concerned to preserve. 

Fear of public opinion, like every other form of 
fear, is oppressive and stunts growth. It is difficult 
to achieve any kind of greatness while a fear of this 
kind remains strong, and it is impossible to acquire 
that freedom of spirit in which true happiness 
consists, for it is essential to happiness that our way 
of living should spring from our own deep impulses 
and not from the accidental tastes and desires of 
those who happen to be our neighbours, or even 
our relations. Fear of immediate neighbours is 
no doubt less than it was, but there is a new kind of 
fear, namely the fear of what newspapers may say. 

138 



FEAR OF PUBLIC OPINION 

This is quite as terrifying as anything connected 
with mediaeval witch-hunts. When the newspaper 
chooses to make a scapegoat of some perhaps quite 
harmless person, the results may be very terrible. 
Fortunately, as yet this is a fate which most people 
escape through their obscurity, but as publicity 
gets more and more perfect in its methods, there 
will be an increasing danger in this novel form of 
social persecution. This is too grave a matter to be 
treated with disdain by the individual who is its 
victim, and whatever may be thought of the great 
principle of the freedom of the Press, I think the 
line will have to be drawn more sharply than it is 
by the existing libel laws, and anything will have 
to be forbidden that makes life intolerable for 
innocent individuals, even if they should happen 
to have done or said things which, published 
maliciously, can cause them to become unpopular. 
The only ultimate cure for this evil is, however, 
an increase of toleration on the part of the public. 
The best way to increase toleration is to multiply 
the number of individuals who enjoy real happiness 
and do not therefore find their chief pleasure in the 
infliction of pain upon their fellow-men. 



139 



PART II 
CAUSES OF HAPPINESS 



CHAPTER X 
IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

So far we have been considering the unhappy man; 
we now have the pleasanter task of considering the 
happy man. From the conversation and the books 
of some of my friends I have been almost led to 
conclude that happiness in the modern world has 
become an impossibility. I find, however, that this 
view tends to be dissipated by introspection, foreign 
travel, and the conversation of my gardener. The 
unhappiness of my literary friends I have considered 
in an earlier chapter; in the present chapter I 
wish to make a survey of the happy people that I 
have come across in the course of my life. 

Happiness is of two sorts, though, of course, there 
are intermediate degrees. The two sorts I mean 
might be distinguished as plain and fancy, or animal 
and spiritual, or of the heart and of the head. The 
designation to be chosen among these alternatives 
depends, of course, upon the thesis to be proved. 
I am at the moment not concerned to prove any 
thesis, but merely to describe. Perhaps the simplest 
way to describe the difference between the two sorts 
of happiness is to say that one sort is open to any 
human being, and the other only to those who can 
read and write. When I was a boy I knew a man 
bursting with happiness whose business was digging 
wells. He was of enormous height and of incredible 

i43 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

muscles ; he could neither read nor write, and when 
in the year 1885 he got a vote for Parliament, he 
learnt for the first time that such an institution 
existed. His happiness did not depend upon intel- 
lectual sources; it was not based upon belief in 
natural law, or the perfectibility of the species, or 
the public ownership of public utilities, or the 
ultimate triumph of the Seventh Day Adventists, 
or any of the other creeds which intellectuals con- 
sider necessary to their enjoyment of life. It was 
based upon physical vigour, a sufficiency of work, 
and the overcoming of not insuperable obstacles 
in the shape of rock. The happiness of my gardener 
is of the same species; he wages a perennial war 
against rabbits, of which he speaks exactly as 
Scotland Yard speaks of Bolsheviks; he considers 
them dark, designing and ferocious, and is of opinion 
that they can only be met by means of a cunning 
equal to their own. Like the heroes of Valhalla 
who spent every day hunting a certain wild boar, 
which they killed every evening but which miracu- 
lously came to life again in the morning, my gardener 
can slay his enemy one day without any fear that 
the enemy will have disappeared the next day. 
Although well over seventy, he works all day and 
bicycles sixteen hilly miles to and from his work, 
but the fount of joy is inexhaustible, and it is "they 
rabbits" that supply it. 

But, you will say, these simple delights are not 
open to superior people like ourselves. What joy 

144 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

can we experience in waging war on such puny 
creatures as rabbits? The argument, to my mind, is 
a poor one. A rabbit is very much larger than a 
yellow-fever bacillus, and yet a superior person 
can find happiness in making war upon the latter. 
Pleasures exactly similar to those of my gardener 
so far as their emotional content is concerned are 
open to the most highly educated people. The 
difference made by education is only in regard to the 
activities by which these pleasures are to be obtained. 
Pleasures of achievement demand difficulties such 
that beforehand success seems doubtful although in 
the end it is usually achieved. This is perhaps the 
chief reason why a not excessive estimate of one's 
own powers is a source of happiness. The man who 
underestimates himself is perpetually being surprised 
by success, whereas the man who overestimates 
himself is just as often surprised by failure. The 
former kind of surprise is pleasant, the latter un- 
pleasant. It is therefore wise to be not unduly 
conceited, though also not too modest to be enter- 
prising. 

Of the more highly educated sections of the 
community, the happiest in the present day are the 
men of science. Many of the most eminent of them 
are emotionally simple, and obtain from their work 
a satisfaction so profound that they can derive 
pleasure from eating and even marrying. Artists 
and literary men consider it de rigueur to be un- 
happy in their marriages, but men of science quite 

k 145 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

frequently remain capable of old-fashioned "domestic 
bliss. The reason of this is that the higher parts 
of their intelligence are wholly absorbed by their 
work, and are not allowed to intrude into regions 
where they have no functions to perform. In their 
work they are happy because in the modern world 
science is progressive and powerful, and because 
its importance is not doubted either by themselves 
or by laymen. They have therefore no necessity 
for complex emotions, since the simpler emotions 
meet with no obstacles. Complexity in emotions 
is like foam in a river. It is produced by obstacles 
which break the smoothly flowing current. But so 
long as the vital energies are unimpeded, they 
produce no ripple on the surface, and their strength 
is not evident to the unobservant. 

All the conditions of happiness are realized in 
the life of the man of science. He has an activity 
which utilizes his abilities to the full, and he achieves 
results which appear important not only to himself 
but to the general public, even when it cannot 
in the smallest degree understand them. In this 
he is more fortunate than the artist. When the 
public cannot understand a picture or a poem, they 
conclude that it is a bad picture or a bad poem. 
When they cannot understand the theory of rela- 
tivity they conclude (rightly) that their education 
has been insufficient. Consequently Einstein is 
honoured while the best painters are left to starve 
in garrets, and Einstein is happy while the painters 

146 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

are unhappy. Very few men can be genuinely 
happy in a life involving continual self-assertion 
against the scepticism of the mass of mankind, 
unless they can shut themselves up in a coterie 
and forget the cold outer world. The man of science 
has no need of a coterie, since he is thought well 
of by everybody except his colleagues. The artist, 
on the contrary, is in the painful situation of having 
to choose between being despised and being 
despicable. If his powers are of the first order, he 
must incur one or the other of these misfortunes 
— the former if he uses his powers, the latter if he 
does not. This has not been the case always and 
everywhere. There have been times when even 
good artists, even when they were young, were 
thought well of. Julius II, though he might ill- 
treat Michael Angelo, never supposed him incap- 
able of painting pictures. The modern millionaire, 
though he may shower wealth upon elderly artists 
after they have lost their powers, never imagines 
that their work is as important as his own. Perhaps 
these circumstances have something to do with 
the fact that artists are on the average less happy 
than men of science. 

It must, I think, be admitted that the most 
intelligent young people in Western countries tend 
to have that kind of unhappiness that comes of 
finding no adequate employment for their best 
talents. This, however, is not the case in Eastern 
countries. The intelligent young at the present 

147 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

day are probably happier in Russia than anywhere 
eke in the world. They have there a new world to 
create, and an ardent faith in accordance with 
which to create it. The old have been executed, 
starved, exiled, or in some other way disinfected, 
so that they cannot, as in every Western country, 
compel the young to choose between doing harm 
and doing nothing. To the sophisticated Occi- 
dental the faith of the young Russian may seem 
crude, but, after all, what is there to be said against 
it? He is creating a new world; the new world is 
to his liking; the new world will almost certainly, 
when created, make the average Russian happier 
than he was before the Revolution. It may not be 
a world in which the sophisticated Western intel- 
lectual would be happy, but the sophisticated 
Western intellectual does not have to live in it. 
By any pragmatic test, therefore, the faith of young 
Russia is justified, and to condemn it as crude can 
have no justification except on a basis of theory. 

In India, China, and Japan, external circumstances 
of a political sort interfere with the happiness of 
the young intelligentsia, but there is no such internal 
obstacle as exists in the West. There are activities 
which appear important to the young, and, in so 
far as these activities succeed, the young are happy. 
They feel that they have an important part to play 
in the national life, and aims to pursue which, 
though difficult, are not impossible to realize. 
Cynicism such as one finds very frequently among 

148 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

the most highly educated young men and women 
of the West results from the combination of comfort 
with powerlessness. Powerlessness makes people 
feel that nothing is worth doing, and comfort 
makes the painfulness of this feeling just endurable. 
Throughout the East the University student can 
hope for more influence upon public opinion than 
he can have in the modern West, but he has much 
less opportunity than in the West of securing a sub- 
stantial income. Being neither powerless nor com- 
fortable, he becomes a reformer or a revolutionary, 
not a cynic. The happiness of the reformer or 
revolutionary depends upon the course of public 
affairs, but probably even while he is being executed 
he enjoys more real happiness than is possible for 
the comfortable cynic. I remember a young Chinese 
visitor to my school who was going home to found 
a similar school in a reactionary part of China. 
He expected the result to be that his head would 
be cut off. Nevertheless he enjoyed a quiet happiness 
that I could only envy. 

I do not wish to suggest, however, that these 
high-flown kinds of happiness are the only possible 
ones. They are in fact open only to a minority, 
since they require a kind of ability and a width of 
interest which cannot be very common. It is not 
only eminent scientists who can derive pleasure 
through work, nor is it only leading statesmen who 
can derive pleasure through advocacy of a cause. 
The pleasure of work is open to anyone who can! 

149 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

develop some specialized skill, provided that he 
can get satisfaction from the exercise of his skill 
without demanding universal applause. I knew a 
man who had lost the use of both legs in early youth, 
but he had remained serenely happy throughout 
a long life ; he had achieved this by writing a work 
in five volumes on rose blight, on which I always 
understood he was the leading expert. I have not 
had the pleasure of knowing any large number of 
conchologists, but from those who have I have 
always understood that the study of shells brings 
contentment to those who engage in it. I knew a 
man once who was the best compositor in the world, 
and was sought out by all those who devoted 
themselves to inventing artistic types; he derived 
joy, not so much from the very genuine respect 
in which he was held by persons whose respect was 
not lightly bestowed, as from the actual delight in 
the exercise of his craft, a delight not wholly unlike 
that which good dancers derive from dancing. 
I have known also compositors who were experts 
in setting up mathematical type, or Nestorian 
script, or cuneiform, or anything else that was out 
of the way and difficult. I did not discover whether 
these men's private lives were happy, but in their 
working hours their constructive instincts were 
fully gratified. 

It is customary to say that in our machine age 
there is less room than formerly for the craftsman's 
joy in skilled work. I am not at all sure that this 

150 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

is true : the skilled workman nowadays works, it is 
true, at quite different things from those that 
occupied the attention of the mediaeval guilds, 
but he is still very important and quite essential 
in the machine economy. There are those who make 
scientific instruments and delicate machines, there 
are designers, there are aeroplane mechanics, 
chauffeurs, and hosts of others who have a trade 
in which skill can be developed to almost any extent. 
The agricultural labourer and the peasant in 
comparatively primitive communities is not, so 
far as I have been able to observe, nearly as happy 
as a chauffeur or an engine-driver. It is true that 
the work of the peasant who cultivates his own land 
is varied; he ploughs, he sows, he reaps. But he is 
at the mercy of the elements, and is very conscious 
of his dependence, whereas the man who works 
a modern mechanism is conscious of power, and 
acquires the sense that man is the master, not the 
slave, of natural forces. It is true, of course, that 
work is very uninteresting to the large body of 
mere machine-minders who repeat some mechanical 
operation over and over again with the minimum 
of variation, but the more uninteresting the work 
becomes, the more possible it is to get it performed 
by a machine. The ultimate goal 'of machine 
production — from which, it is true, we are as yet 
far removed — is a system in which everything 
uninteresting is done by machines, and human 
beings are reserved for the work involving variety 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

and initiative. In such a world the work will be less 
boring and less depressing than it has been at any 
time since the introduction of agriculture. In taking 
to agriculture mankind decided that they would 
submit to monotony and tedium in order to diminish 
the risk of starvation. When men obtained their 
food by hunting, work was a joy, as one can see 
from the fact that the rich still pursue these ancestral 
occupations for amusement. But with the intro- 
duction of agriculture mankind entered upon a 
long period of meanness, misery, and madness, 
from which they are only now being freed by the 
beneficent operation of the machine. It is all very 
well for sentimentalists to speak of contact with 
the soil and the ripe wisdom of Hardy's philosophic 
peasants, but the one desire of every young man in 
the countryside is to find work in towns where he 
can escape from the slavery of wind and weather 
and the solitude of dark winter evenings into the 
reliable and human atmosphere of the factory and 
the cinema. Companionship and co-operation are 
essential elements in the happiness of the average 
man, and these are to be obtained in industry far 
more fully than in agriculture. 

Belief in a cause is a source of happiness to large 
numbers of people. I am not thinking only of 
revolutionaries, socialists, nationalists in oppressed 
countries, and such; I am thinking also of many 
humbler kinds of belief. The men I have known who 
believed that the English were the lost ten tribes 

15a 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

were almost invariably happy, while as for those 
who believed that the English were only the tribes 
of Ephraim and Manasseh, their bliss knew no 
bounds. I am not suggesting that, the reader should 
adopt this creed, since I cannot advocate any 
happiness based upon what seem to me to be false 
beliefs. For the same reason I cannot urge the reader 
to believe that men should live exclusively upon 
nuts, although, so far as my observation goes, this 
belief invariably ensures perfect happiness. But it 
is easy to find some cause which is in no degree 
fantastic, and those whose interest in any such cause 
is genuine are provided with an occupation for 
their leisure hours and a complete antidote to the 
feeling that life is empty. 

Not so very far removed from the devotion to 
obscure causes is absorption in a hobby. One of 
the most eminent of living mathematicians divides 
his time equally between mathematics and stamp- 
collecting. I imagine that the latter affords conso- 
lation at the moments when he can make no 
progress with the former. The difficulty of proving 
propositions in the theory of numbers is not the 
only sorrow that stamp-collecting can cure, nor are 
stamps the only things that can be collected. Con- 
sider what a vast field of ecstasy opens before the 
imagination when one thinks of old china, snuff- 
boxes, Roman coins, arrow-heads, and flint imple- 
ments. It is true that many of us are too "superior" 
for these simple pleasures. We have all experienced 

'53 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

them in boyhood, but have thought them, for some 
reason, unworthy of a grown man. This is a complete 
mistake; any pleasure that does no harm to other 
people is to be valued. For my part, I collect rivers : 
I derive pleasure from having gone down the 
Volga and up the Yangtse, and regret very much 
having never seen the Amazon or the Orinoco. 
Simple as these emotions are, I am not ashamed of 
them. Or consider again the passionate joy of the 
baseball fan : he turns to his newspaper with avidity, 
and the radio affords him the keenest thrills. I 
remember meeting for the first time one of the lead- 
ing literary men of America, a man whom I had 
supposed from his books to be filled with melan- 
choly. But it so happened that at that moment the 
most crucial baseball results were coming through 
on the radio; he forgot me, literature, and all the 
other sorrows of our sublunary life, and yelled 
with joy as his favourites achieved victory. Ever 
since this incident I have been able to read his 
books without feeling depressed by the misfortunes 
of his characters. 

Fads and hobbies, however, are in many cases, 
perhaps most, not a source of fundamental happi- 
ness, but a means of escape from reality, of forgetting 
for the moment some pain too difficult to be faced. 
Fundamental happiness depends more than any- 
thing eke upon what may be called a friendly 
interest in persons and things. 

A friendly interest in persons is a form of affec- 

154 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

tionateness, but not the form which is grasping and 
possessive and seeking always an emphatic response. 
This latter form is very frequently a source of 
unhappiness. The kind that makes for happiness 
is the kind that likes to observe people and finds 
pleasure in their individual traits, that wishes to 
afford scope for the interests and pleasures of those 
with whom it is brought into contact without 
desiring to acquire power over them or to secure 
their enthusiastic admiration. The person whose 
attitude towards others is genuinely of this kind 
will be a source of happiness and a recipient of 
reciprocal kindness. His relations with others, 
whether slight or serious, will satisfy both his inter- 
ests and his affections; he will not be soured by 
ingratitude, since he will seldom suffer it and will 
not notice when he does. The same idiosyncrasies 
which would get on another man's nerves to the 
point of exasperation will be to him a source of 
gentle amusement. He will achieve without effort 
results which another man, after long struggles, 
will find to be unattainable. Being happy in himself, 
he will be a pleasant companion, and this in turn 
will increase his happiness. But all this must be 
genuine; it must not spring from an idea of self- 
sacrifice inspired by a sense of duty. A sense of 
duty is useful in work, but offensive in personal 
relations. People wish to be liked, not to be en- 
dured with patient resignation. To like many 
people spontaneously and without effort is per- 

155 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

haps the greatest of all sources of personal hap- 
piness. 

I spoke also in the last paragraph of what I call a 
friendly interest in things. This phrase may perhaps 
seem forced ; it may be said that it is impossible to 
feel friendly to things. Nevertheless, there is something 
analogous to friendliness in the kind of interest 
that a geologist takes in rocks, or an archeeologist 
in ruins, and this interest ought to be an element 
in our attitude to individuals or societies. It is possible 
to have an interest in things which is hostile rather 
than friendly. A man might collect facts concerning 
the habitats of spiders because he hated spiders and 
wished to live where they were few. This kind of 
interest would not afford the same satisfaction as 
the geologist derives from his rocks. An interest 
in impersonal things, though perhaps less valuable 
as an ingredient in everyday happiness than a 
friendly attitude towards our fellow creatures, is 
nevertheless very important. The world is vast and 
our own powers are limited. If all our happiness is 
bound up entirely in our personal circumstances 
it is difficult not to demand of life more than it 
has to give. And to demand too much is the surest 
way of getting even less than is possible. The man 
who can forget his worries by means of a genuine 
interest in, say, the Council of Trent, or the life 
history of stars, will find that, when he returns from 
his excursion into the impersonal world, he has 
acquired a poise and calm which enable him to 

156 



IS HAPPINESS STILL POSSIBLE? 

deal with his worries in the best way, and he will 
in the meantime have experienced a genuine even 
if temporary happiness. 

The secret of happiness is this : let your interests 
be as wide as possible, and let your reactions to 
the things and persons that interest you be as far 
as possible friendly rather than hostile. 

This preliminary survey of the possibilities of 
happiness will be expanded in subsequent chapters, 
together with suggestions as to ways of escaping 
from psychological sources of misery. 



W 



CHAPTER XI 
ZEST 

In this chapter I propose to deal with what seems 
to me the most universal and distinctive mark of 
happy men, namely zest. 

Perhaps the best way to understand what is meant 
by zest will be to consider the different ways in 
which men behave when they sit down to a meal. 
There are those to whom a meal is merely a bore; 
no matter how excellent the food may be, they feel 
that it is uninteresting. They have had excellent 
food before, probably at almost every meal they 
have eaten. They have never known what it was 
to go without a meal until hunger became a raging 
passion, but have come to regard meals as merely 
conventional occurrences, dictated by the fashions 
of the society in which they live. Like everything 
else, meals are tiresome, but it is no use to make a 
fuss, because nothing else will be less tiresome. 
Then there are the invalids who eat from a sense 
of duty, because the doctor has told them that it 
is necessary to take a little nourishment in order 
to keep up their strength. Then there are the epi- 
cures, who start hopefully, but find that nothing 
has been quite so well cooked as it ought to have 
been. Then there are the gormandizers, who fall 
upon their food with eager rapacity, eat too much, 
and grow plethoric and stertorous. Finally there 

158 



ZEST 

are those who begin with a sound appetite, are 
glad of their food, eat until they have had enough, 
and then stop. Those who are set down before the 
feast of life have similar attitudes towards the good 
things which it offers. The happy man corresponds 
to the last of our eaters. What hunger is in relation 
to food, zest is in relation to life. The man who is 
bored with his meals corresponds to the victim of 
Byronic unhappiness. The invalid who eats from a 
sense of duty corresponds to the ascetic, the 
gormandizer to the voluptuary. The epicure cor- 
responds to the fastidious person who condemns half 
the pleasures of life as unaesthetic. Oddly enough, 
all these types, with the possible exception of the 
gormandizer, feel contempt for the man of healthy 
appetite and consider themselves his superior. 
It seems to them vulgar to enjoy food because you 
are hungry or to enjoy life because it offers a variety 
of interesting spectacles and surprising experiences. 
From the height of their disillusionment they look 
down upon those whom they despise as simple 
souls. For my part I have no sympathy with this 
outlook. All disenchantment is to me a malady, 
which, it is true, certain circumstances may render 
inevitable, but which none the less, when it occurs, 
is to be cured as soon as possible, not to be regarded 
as a higher form of wisdom. Suppose one man likes 
strawberries and another does not ; in what respect 
is the latter superior? There is no abstract and 
impersonal proof either that strawberries are good 

159 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

or that they are not good. To the man who likes 
them they are good ; to the man who dislikes them 
they are not. But the man who likes them has 
a pleasure which the other does not have; to that 
extent his life is more enjoyable and he is better 
adapted to the world in which both must live. 
What is true in this trivial instance is equally true 
in more important matters. The man who enjoys 
watching football is to that extent superior to the 
man who does not. The man who enjoys reading is 
still more superior to the man who does not, since 
opportunities for reading are more frequent than 
opportunities for watching football. The more 
things a man is interested in, the more opportunities 
of happiness he has, and the less he is at the mercy of 
fate, since if he loses one thing he can fall back upon 
another. Life is too short to be interested in every- 
thing, but it is good to be interested in as many 
things as are necessary to fill our days. We are all 
prone to the malady of the introvert, who, with 
the manifold spectacle of the world spread out 
before him, turns away and gazes only upon the 
emptiness within. But let us not imagine that there 
is anything grand about the introvert's unhappiness. 

There were once upon a time two sausage machines, 
exquisitely constructed for the purpose of turning 
pig into the most delicious sausages. One of these 
retained his zest for pig and produced sausages 
innumerable ; the other said : "What is pig to me? 
My own works are far more interesting and wonderful 

160 



ZEST 

than any pig." He refused pig and set to work to 
study his inside. When bereft of its natural food, 
his inside ceased to function, and the more he 
studied it, the more empty and foolish it seemed to 
him to be. All the exquisite apparatus by which 
the delicious transformation had hitherto been 
made stood still, and he was at a loss to guess what 
it was capable of doing. This second sausage machine 
was like the man who has lost his zest, while the 
first was like the man who has retained it. The mind 
is a strange machine which can combine the materials 
offered to it in the most astonishing ways, but 
without materials from the external world it is 
powerless, and unlike the sausage machine it must 
seize its materials for itself, since events only become 
experiences through the interest that we take in 
them: if they do not interest us, we are making 
nothing of them. The man, therefore, whose 
attention is turned within finds nothing worthy of 
his notice, whereas the man whose attention is turned 
outward can find within, in those rare moments 
when he examines his soul, the most varied and 
interesting assortment of ingredients being dissected 
and recombined into beautiful or instructive 
patterns. 

The forms of zest are innumerable. Sherlock 
Holmes, it may be remembered, picked up a hat 
which he happened to find lying in the street. 
After looking at it for a moment he remarked that 
its owner had come down in the world as the result 

l 161 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

of drink, and that his wife was no longer so fond of 
him as she used to be. Life could never be boring 
to a mart: to whom casual objects offered such a 
wealth of interest. Think of the different things that 
may be noticed in the course of a country walk. 
One man may be interested in the birds, another 
in the vegetation, another in the geology, yet 
another in the agriculture, and so on. Any one of 
these things is interesting if it interests you, and, 
other things being equal, the man who is interested 
in any one of them is a man better adapted to the 
world than the man who is not interested. 

How extraordinarily different, again, are the 
attitudes of different people to their fellow-men. 
One man, in the course of a long train journey, 
will fail entirely to observe any of his fellow travellers, 
while another will have summed them all up, 
analysed their characters, made a shrewd guess 
at their circumstances, and perhaps even ascertained 
the most secret histories of several of them. People 
differ just as much in what they feel towards others 
as in what they ascertain about them. Some men 
find almost everybody boring, others quickly and 
easily develop a friendly feeling towards those 
with whom they are brought in contact, unless 
there is some definite reason for feeling otherwise. 
Take again such a matter as travel : some men will 
travel through many countries, going always to the 
best hotels, eating exactly the same food as they 
would eat at home, meeting the same idle rich whom 

16a 



ZEST 

they would meet at home, conversing on the same 
topics upon which they converse at their own dinner- 
table. When they return, their only feeling is one 
of relief at having done with the boredom of 
expensive locomotion. Other men wherever they go 
see what is characteristic, make the acquaintance 
of people who typify the locality, observe whatever 
is of interest either historically or socially, eat the 
food of the country, learn its manners and its 
language, and come home with a new stock of 
pleasant thoughts for winter evenings. 

In all these different situations the man who has 
the zest for life has the advantage over the man 
who has none. Even unpleasant experiences have 
their uses to him. I am glad to have smelt a Chinese 
crowd and a Sicilian village, though I cannot 
pretend that my pleasure was very great at the 
moment. Adventurous men enjoy shipwrecks, 
mutinies, earthquakes, conflagrations, and all kinds 
of unpleasant experiences, provided they do not 
go so far as to impair health. They say to themselves 
in an earthquake, for example, "So that is what an 
earthquake is like", and it gives them pleasure 
to have their knowledge of the world increased by 
this new item. It would not be true to say that such 
men are not at the mercy of fate, for if they should 
lose their health they would be very likely to lose 
their zest at the same time, though this is by no 
means certain. I have known men die at the end 
of years of slow torture, and yet retain their zest 

163 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

almost till the last moment. Some forms of ill-health 
destroy zest, others do not. I do not know whether 
the biochemists are able as yet to distinguish 
between these kinds. Perhaps when biochemistry 
has made further advances we shall all be able to 
take tablets that will ensure our feeling an interest 
in everything, but until that day comes we are 
compelled to depend upon common-sense observa- 
tion of life to judge what are the causes that enable 
some men to take an interest in everything, while 
compelling others to take an interest in nothing. 

Zest is sometimes general, sometimes specialized. 
It may be very specialized indeed. Readers of 
Borrow may remember a character who occurs in 
Romany Rye. He had lost his wife, to whom he was 
devoted, and felt for a time that life had grown 
utterly barren. But he became interested in Chinese 
inscriptions on teapots and tea-chests, and by the 
aid of a French Chinese grammar, after learning 
French for the purpose, gradually managed to 
decipher them, thereby acquiring a new interest in 
life, though he never used his Chinese knowledge 
for other purposes. I have known men who were 
entirely absorbed in the endeavour to find out all 
about the Gnostic heresy, and other men whose 
principal interest lay in collating the manuscripts 
and early editions of Hobbes. It is quite impossible 
to guess in advance what will interest a man, but 
most men are capable of a keen interest in something 
or other, and when once such an interest has been 

164 



ZEST 

aroused their life becomes free from tedium. Very 
specialized interests are, however, a less satisfactory 
source of happiness than a general zest for life, 
since they can hardly fill the whole of a man's time, 
and there is always the danger that he may come 
to know all there is to know about the particular 
matter that has become his hobby. 

It will be remembered that among our different 
types at the banquet we included the gormandizer, 
whom we were not prepared to praise. The reader 
may think that the man with zest whom wc have 
been praising does not differ in any definable way 
from the gormandizer. The time has come when 
we must try to make the distinction between the 
two types more definite. 

The ancients, as everyone knows, regarded modera- 
ation as one of the essential virtues. Under the 
influence of romanticism and the French Revolu- 
tion this view was abandoned by many, and 
overmastering passions were admired, even if, like 
those of Byron's heroes, they were of a destruc- 
tive and anti-social kind. The ancients, however, 
were clearly in the right. In the good life there 
must be a balance between different activities, 
and no one of them must be carried so far as to 
make the others impossible. The gormandizer 
sacrifices all other pleasures to that of eating, 
and by so doing diminishes the total happiness of 
his life. Many other passions besides eating may be 
carried to a like excess. The Empress Josephine 

165 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

was a gormandizer in regard to clothes. At first 
Napoleon used to pay her dressmaker's bills, 
though with continually increasing protest. At last 
he told her that she really must learn moderation, 
and that in future he would only pay her bilk 
when the amount seemed reasonable. When her 
next dressmaker's bill came in, she was for a moment 
at her wits' end, but presently she bethought herself 
of a scheme. She went to the War Minister and 
demanded that he should pay her bill out of the 
funds provided for the war. Since he knew that 
she had the power to get him dismissed, he did 
so, and the French lost Genoa in consequence. 
So at least some books say, though I am not prepared 
to vouch for the exact truth of the story. For our 
purpose it is equally apt whether true or an exag- 
geration, since it serves to show how far the passion 
for clothes may carry a woman who has the oppor- 
tunity to indulge it. Dipsomaniacs and nympho- 
maniacs are obvious examples of the same kind 
of thing. The principle in these matters is fairly 
obvious. All our separate tastes and desires have 
to fit into the general framework of life. If they are 
to be a source of happiness they must be compatible 
with health, with the affection of those whom we 
love, and with the respect of the society in which 
we live. Some passions can be indulged to almost 
any extent without passing beyond these limits, 
others cannot. The man, let us say, who loves 
chess, if he happens to be a bachelor with inde- 
166 



ZEST 

pendent means, need not restrict his passion in 
any degree, whereas if he has a wife and children 
and no independent means, he will have to restrict 
it very severely. The dipsomaniac and the gor- 
mandizer, even if they have no social ties, are 
unwise from a self-regarding point of view, since 
their indulgence interferes with health, and gives 
them hours of misery in return for minutes of 
pleasure. Certain things form a framework within 
which any separate passion must live if it is not to 
become a source of misery. Such things are health, 
the general possession of one's faculties, a sufficient 
income to provide for necessaries, and the most 
essential social duties, such as those towards wife 
and children. The man who sacrifices these things 
for chess is essentially as bad as the dipsomaniac. 
The only reason we do not condemn him so severely 
is that he is much less common, and that only 
a man of somewhat rare abilities is likely to be 
carried away by absorption in so intellectual a 
game. The Greek formula of moderation practically 
covers these cases. The man who likes chess suffi- 
ciently to look forward throughout his working day 
to the game that he will play in the evening is 
fortunate, but the man who gives up work in order 
to play chess all day has lost the virtue of modera- 
tion. It is recorded that Tolstoy, in his younger 
and unregenerate days, was awarded the military 
cross for valour in the field, but when the time 
came for him to be presented with it, he was so 

167 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

absorbed in a game of chess that he decided not to 
go. We can hardly find fault with Tolstoy on this 
account, since to him it might well be a matter of 
indifference whether he won military decorations 
or not, but in a lesser man such an act would have 
been one of folly. 

As a limitation upon the doctrine that has just 
been set forth, it ought to be admitted that some 
performances are considered so essentially noble as 
to justify the sacrifice of everything else on their 
behalf. The man who loses his life in the defence 
of his country is not blamed if thereby his wife and 
children are left penniless. The man who is engaged 
in experiments with a view to some great scientific 
discovery or invention is not blamed afterwards 
for the poverty that he has made his family endure, 
provided that his efforts are crowned with ultimate 
success. If, however, he never succeeds in making 
the discovery or the invention that he was attempt- 
ing, public opinion condemns him as a crank, 
which seems unfair, since no one in such an enter- 
prise can be sure of success in advance. During the 
first millennium of the Christian era a man who 
abandoned his family for a saintly life was praised, 
though nowadays it would be held that he ought 
to make some provision for them. 

I think there is always some deep-seated psycho- 
logical difference between the gormandizer and the 
man of healthy appetite. The man in whom one 
desire runs to excess at the expense of all others 

1 68 



ZEST 

is usually a man with some deep-seated trouble, 
who is seeking to escape from a spectre. In the case 
of the dipsomaniac this is obvious: men drink in 
order to forget. If they had no spectres in their lives, 
they would not find drunkenness more agreeable 
than sobriety. As the legendary Chinaman said: 
"Me no drinkee for drinkee, me drinkee for 
drunkee." This is typical of all excessive and one- 
sided passions. It is not pleasure in the object itself 
that is sought, but oblivion. There is, however, a very 
great difference according as oblivion is sought in 
a sottish manner or by the exercise of faculties 
in themselves desirable. Borrow's friend who taught 
himself Chinese in order to be able to endure the 
loss of his wife was seeking oblivion, but he sought 
it in an activity that had no harmful effects, but 
on the contrary improved his intelligence and his 
knowledge. Against such forms of escape there 
is nothing to be said. It is otherwise with the man 
who seeks oblivion in drinking or gambling or 
any other form of unprofitable excitement. There 
are, it is true, border-line cases. What should we 
say of the man who runs mad risks in aeroplanes 
or on mountain tops, because life has become 
irksome to him? If his risks serve any public object, 
we may admire him, but if not, we shall have to 
place him only slightly above the gambler and 
drunkard. 

Genuine zest, not the sort that is really a search 
for oblivion, is part of the natural make-up of 

169 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

human beings except in so far as it has been de- 
stroyed by unfortunate circumstances. Young chil- 
dren are interested in everything that they see and 
hear; the world is full of surprises to them, and 
they are perpetually engaged with ardour in the 
pursuit of knowledge, not, of course, of scholastic 
knowledge, but of the sort that consists in acquiring 
familiarity with the objects that attract their 
attention. Animals, even when adult, retain their 
zest provided they are in health. A cat in an un- 
familiar room will not sit down until it has sniffed 
at every corner on the off-chance that there may 
be a smell of mouse somewhere. The man who has 
never been fundamentally thwarted will retain 
his natural interest in the external world, and so 
long as he retains it he will find life pleasant unless 
his liberty is unduly curtailed. Loss of zest in 
civilized society is very largely due to the restrictions 
upon liberty which are essential to our way of life. 
The savage hunts when he is hungry, and in so 
doing is obeying a direct impulse. The man who 
goes to his work every morning at a certain hour 
is actuated fundamentally by the same impulse, 
namely the need to secure a living, but in his case 
the impulse does not operate directly and at the 
moment when it is felt: it operates indirectly 
through abstractions, beliefs and volitions. At the 
moment when the man starts off to his work he is 
not feeling hungry, since he has just had his break- 
fast. He merely knows that hunger will recur, and 
170 



ZEST 

that going to his work is a means of satisfying 
future hunger. Impulses are irregular, whereas 
habits, in a civilized society, have to be regular. 
Among savages, even collective enterprises, in so 
far as they exist, are spontaneous and impulsive. 
When the tribe is going to war the tom-tom rouses 
military ardour, and herd excitement inspires each 
individual to the necessary activity. Modern enter- 
prises cannot be managed in this way. When a 
train has to be started at a given moment it is 
impossible to inspire the porters, the engine-driver, 
and the signalman by means of barbaric music. 
They must each do their job merely because it 
has to be done ; their motive, that is to say, is indirect : 
they have no impulse towards the activity, but 
only towards the ultimate reward of the activity. 
A great deal of social life has the same defect. 
People converse with each other, not from any 
wish to do so, but because of some ultimate benefit 
that they hope to derive from co-operation. At 
every moment of life the civilized man is hedged 
about by restrictions of impulse : if he happens to 
feel cheerful he must not sing or dance in the street, 
while if he happens to feel sad he must not sit on 
the pavement and weep, for fear of obstructing 
pedestrian traffic. In youth his liberty is restricted 
at school, in adult life it is restricted throughout 
his working hours. All this makes zest more difficult 
to retain, for the continual restraint tends to produce 

weariness and boredom. Nevertheless, a civilized 

171 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

society is impossible without a very considerable 
degree of restraint upon spontaneous impulse, 
since spontaneous impulse will only produce the 
simplest forms of social co-operation, not those 
highly complex forms which modern economic 
organization demands. In order to rise above 
these obstacles to zest a man needs health and 
superabundant energy, or else, if he has that good 
fortune, work that he finds interesting on its own 
account. Health, so far as statistics can show, has 
been steadily improving in all civilized countries 
during the last hundred years, but energy is more 
difficult to measure, and I am doubtful whether 
physical vigour in moments of health is as great 
as it was formerly. The problem here is to a great 
extent a social problem, and as such I do not 
propose to discuss it in the present volume. The 
problem has, however, a personal and psychological 
aspect which we have already discussed in connec- 
tion with fatigue. Some men retain their zest in 
spite of the handicaps of civilized life, and many 
men could do so if they were free from the inner 
psychological conflicts upon which a great part of 
their energy is expended. Zest demands energy 
more that sufficient for the necessary work, and 
this in turn demands the smooth working of the 
psychological machine. Of the causes promoting 
the smooth working I shall have more to say in 
later chapters. 

In women, less nowadays than formerly, but still 

172 



ZEST 

to a very large extent, zest has been greatly dimin- 
ished by a mistaken conception of respectability. 
It was thought undesirable that women should take 
an obvious interest in men, or that they should 
display too much vivacity in public. In learning 
not to be interested in men they learned very 
frequently to be interested in nothing, or at any 
rate in nothing except a certain kind of correct 
behaviour. To teach an attitude of inactivity and 
withdrawal towards life is clearly to teach something 
very inimical to zest, and to encourage a certain 
kind of absorption in self which is characteristic 
of highly respectable women, especially when 
they are uneducated. They do not have the interest 
in sport that average men have, they care nothing 
about politics, towards men their attitude is one of 
prim aloofness, towards women their attitude is 
one of veiled hostility based upon the conviction 
that other women are less respectable than they 
are themselves. They boast that they keep them- 
selves to themselves; that is to say, their lack of 
interest in their fellow creatures appears to them in 
the light of a virtue. For this, of course, they are 
not to blame; they are only accepting the moral 
teaching that has been current for thousands of 
years where women are concerned. They are, 
however, victims, much to be pitied, of a system of 
repression whose iniquity they have failed to per- 
ceive. To such women all that is ungenerous appears 
good and all that is generous appears evil. In their 

173 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

own social circle they do what they can to kill 
joy, in politics they love repressive legislation. 
Fortunately the type is growing less common, but 
it is still far more prevalent than is supposed by 
those who live in emancipated circles. I recommend 
anyone who doubts this statement to go the round 
of a number of lodging-houses seeking a lodging, 
and to take note of the landladies that he will 
meet during his search. He will find that they are 
living by a conception of female excellence which 
involves as an essential part the destruction of all 
zest for life, and that their minds and hearts are 
dwarfed and stunted as a result. Between male 
and female excellence rightly conceived there is 
no difference, or at any rate no difference such as 
tradition inculcates. For women as for men zest 
is the secret of happiness and well-being. 



174 



CHAPTER XII 
AFFECTION 

One of the chief causes of lack of zest is the feeling 
that one is unloved, whereas conversely the feeling 
of being loved promotes zest more than anything 
else does. A man may have the feeling of being 
unloved for a variety of reasons. He may consider 
himself such a dreadful person that no one could 
possibly love him; he may in childhood have had 
to accustom himself to receiving less love than fell 
to the share of other children ; or he may in fact 
be a person whom nobody loves. But in this latter 
event the cause probably lies in a lack of self-confi- 
dence due to early misfortune. The man who feels 
himself unloved may take various attitudes as a 
result. He may make desperate efforts to win 
affection, probably by means of exceptional acts 
of kindness. In this, however, he is very likely to 
be unsuccessful, since the motive of the kindnesses 
is easily perceived by their beneficiaries, and human 
nature is so constructed that it gives affection most 
readily to those who seem least to demand it. The 
man, therefore, who endeavours to purchase affec- 
tion by benevolent actions becomes disillusioned 
by experience of human ingratitude. It never 
occurs to him that the affection which he is trying 
to buy is of far more value than the material benefits 
which he offers as its price, and yet the feeling that 

»75 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

this is so is at the basis of his actions. Another 
man, observing that he is unloved, may seek revenge 
upon the world, either by stirring up wars and 
revolutions, or by a pen dipped in gall, like Dean 
Swift. This is an heroic reaction to misfortune, 
requiring a force of character sufficient to enable 
a man to pit himself against the rest of the world. 
Few men are able to reach such heights; the great 
majority, both of men and women, if they feel 
themselves unloved, sink into a timid despair 
relieved only by occasional gleams of envy and 
malice. As a rule, the lives of such people become 
extremely self-centred, and the absence of affection 
gives them a sense of insecurity from which they 
instinctively seek to escape by allowing habit to 
dominate their lives utterly and completely. For 
those who make themselves the slaves of unvarying 
routine are generally actuated by fear of a cold 
outer world, and by the feeling that they will not 
bump into it if they walk along the same paths 
that they have walked along on previous days. 

Those who face life with a feeling of security are 
much happier than those who face it with a feeling 
of insecurity, at any rate so long as their sense of 
security does not lead them to disaster. And in 
a very great many cases, though not in all, a sense 
of security will itself help a man to escape dangers 
to which another would succumb. If you are walking 
over a chasm on a narrow plank, you are much 
more likely to fall if you feel fear than if you do not. 

176 



AFFECTION 

And the same thing applies to the conduct of life. 
The fearless man may, of course, meet with sudden 
disaster, but it is likely that he will pass unscathed 
through many difficult situations in which a timid 
man would come to grief. This useful kind of 
self-confidence has, of course, innumerable forms. 
One man is confident on mountains, another on the 
sea, and yet another in the air. But general self- 
confidence towards life comes more than anything 
else from being accustomed to receive as much of 
the right sort of affection as one has need for. And 
it is this habit of mind considered as a source of 
zest that I wish to speak about in the present chapter. 
It is affection received, not affection given, that 
causes this sense of security, though it arises most 
of all from affection which is reciprocal. Strictly 
speaking, it is not only affection but also admiration 
that has this effect. Persons whose trade is to secure 
public admiration, such as actors, preachers, speakers, 
and politicians, come to depend more and more 
upon applause. When they receive their due meed 
of public approbation their life is full of zest; when 
they do not, they become discontented and self- 
centred. The diffused good will of a multitude does 
for them what is done for others by the more 
concentrated affection of the few. The child whose 
parents are fond of him accepts their affection as 
a law of nature. He does not think very much about 
it, although it is of great importance to his happiness. 
He thinks about the world, about the adventures 

m 177 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

that come his way and the more marvellous adven- 
tures that will come his way when he is grown up. 
But behind all these external interests there is the 
feeling that he will be protected from disaster by 
parental affection. The child from whom for any 
reason parental affection is withdrawn is likely to 
become timid and unadventurous, filled with fears 
and self-pity, and no longer able to meet the world 
in a mood of gay exploration. Such a child may set 
to work at a surprisingly early age to meditate on 
life and death and human destiny. He becomes an 
introvert, melancholy at first, but seeking ultimately 
the unreal consolations of some system of philosophy 
or theology. The world is a higgledy-piggledy 
place, containing things pleasant and things un- 
pleasant in haphazard sequence. And the desire to 
make an intelligible system or pattern out of it is 
at bottom an outcome of fear, in fact a kind of 
agoraphobia or dread of open spaces. Within the 
four walls of his library the timid student feels safe. 
If he can persuade himself that the universe is equally 
tidy, he can feel almost equally safe when he has 
to venture forth into the streets. Such a man, if he 
had received more affection, would have feared 
the real world less, and would not have had to 
invent an ideal world to take its place in his beliefs. 

By no means all affection, however, has this 
effect in encouraging adventurousness. The affection 
given must be itself robust rather than timid, desiring 
excellence even more than safety on the part of its 

»78 



AFFECTION 

object, though of course by no means indifferent to 
safety. The timid mother or nurse, who is perpetually 
warning children against disasters that may occur, 
who thinks that every dog will bite and that every 
cow is a bull, may produce in them a timidity 
equal to her own, and may cause them to feel that 
they are never safe except in her immediate neigh- 
bourhood. To the unduly possessive mother this 
feeling on the part of a child may be agreeable : she 
may desire his dependence upon herself more than 
his capacity to cope with the world. In that case her 
child is probably worse off in the long run than he 
would be if he were not loved at all. The habits 
of mind formed in early years are likely to persist 
through life. Many people when they fall in love 
look for a little haven of refuge from the world, 
where they can be sure of being admired when they 
are not admirable, and praised when they are not 
praiseworthy. To many men home is a refuge from 
the truth : it is their fears and their timidities that 
make them enjoy a companionship in which these 
feelings are put to rest. They seek from their wives 
what they obtained formerly from an unwise mother, 
and yet they are surprised if their wives regard them 
as grown-up children. 

To define the best kind of affection is not alto- 
gether easy, since clearly there will be some pro- 
tective element in it. We do not feel indifferent to 
the hurts of people whom we love. I think, however, 
that apprehension of misfortune, as opposed to 

«79 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

sympathy with a misfortune that has actually 
occurred, should play as small a part as possible 
in affection. Fear for others is only a shade better 
than fear for ourselves. Moreover, it is very often 
a camouflage for possessiveness. It is hoped that by 
rousing their fears a more complete empire over 
them can be obtained. This, of course, is one of 
the reasons why men have liked timid women, 
since by protecting them they came to own them. 
The amount of solicitude of which a person can be 
the object without damage to himself depends upon 
his character : a person who is hardy and adventurous 
can endure a great deal without damage, whereas 
a timid person should be encouraged to expect 
little in this way. 

Affection received has a twofold function. We 
have spoken of it hitherto in connection with 
security, but in adult life it has an even more 
essential biological purpose, namely parenthood. 
To be unable to inspire sex love is a grave misfortune 
to any man or woman, since it deprives him or 
her of the greatest joys that life has to offer. This 
deprivation is almost sure sooner or later to destroy 
zest and produce introversion. Very frequently, 
however, previous misfortunes in childhood have 
produced defects of character which are the cause 
of failure to obtain love in later years. This is perhaps 
more true where men are concerned than it is as 
regards women, for on the whole women tend to 

love men for their character while men tend to love 
180 



AFFECTION 

women for their appearance. In this respect, it 
must be said, men show themselves the inferiors 
of women, for the qualities that men find pleasing 
in women are on the whole less desirable than those 
that women find pleasing in men. I am not at all 
sure, however, that it is easier to acquire a good 
character than a good appearance ; at any rate, the 
steps necessary for the latter are better understood 
and more readily pursued by women than are 
the steps necessary for the former by men. 

We have been speaking hitherto of the affection 
of which a person is the object. I wish now to speak 
of the affection that a person gives. This also is 
of two different kinds, one of which is perhaps the 
most important expression of a zest for life, while 
the other is an expression of fear. The former seems 
to me wholly admirable, while the latter is at best 
a consolation. If you are sailing in a ship on a fine 
day along a beautiful coast, you admire the coast 
and feel pleasure in it. This pleasure is one derived 
entirely from looking outward, and has nothing 
to do with any desperate need of your own. If, 
on the other hand, your ship is wrecked and you 
swim towards the coast, you acquire for it a new 
kind of love : it represents security against the waves, 
and its beauty or ugliness becomes an unimportant 
matter. The better sort of affection corresponds to 
the feeling of the man whose ship is secure, the less 
excellent sort corresponds to that of the shipwrecked 
swimmer. The first of these kinds of affection is 

181 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

only possible in so far as a man feels safe, or at any 
rate is indifferent to such dangers as beset him; 
the latter kind, on the contrary, is caused by the 
feeling of insecurity. The feeling caused by in- 
security is much more subjective and self-centred 
than the other, since the loved person is valued for 
services rendered, not for intrinsic qualities. I do 
not, however, wish to suggest that this kind of 
affection has no legitimate part to play in life. In 
fact, almost all real affection contains something 
of both kinds in combination, and in so far as affec- 
tion does really cure the sense of insecurity, it sets 
a man free to feel again that interest in the world 
which in moments of danger and fear is obscured. 
But while recognizing the part that such affection 
has to play in life, we must still hold that it is less 
excellent than the other kind, since it depends 
upon fear, and fear is an evil, and also because it 
is more self-centred. In the best kind of affection 
a man hopes for a new happiness rather than for 
escape from an old unhappiness. 

The best type of affection is reciprocally life- 
giving; each receives affection with joy and gives 
it without effort, and each finds the whole world 
more interesting in consequence of the existence 
of this reciprocal happiness. There is, however, 
another kind, by no means uncommon, in which 
one person sucks the vitality of the other, one 
receives what the other gives, but gives almost 
nothing in return. Some very vital people belong 

1 8a 



AFFECTION 

to this bloodsucking type. They extract the vitality 
from one victim after another, but while they 
prosper and grow interesting, those upon whom 
they live grow pale and dim and dull. Such people 
use others as means to their own ends, and never 
consider them as ends in themselves. Fundamentally 
they are not interested in those whom for the 
moment they think they love; they are interested 
only in the stimulus to their own activities, perhaps 
of a quite impersonal sort. Evidently this springs 
from some defect in their nature, but it is one 
not altogether easy either to diagnose or to cure. 
It is a characteristic frequently associated with 
great ambition, and is rooted, I should say, in an 
unduly one-sided view of what makes human 
happiness. Affection in the sense of a genuine re- 
ciprocal interest of two persons in each other, not 
solely as means to each other's good, but rather as 
a combination having a common good, is one of 
the most important elements of real happiness, 
and the man whose ego is so enclosed within steel 
walls that this enlargement of it is impossible misses 
the best that life has to offer, however successful 
he may be in his career. Ambition which excludes 
affection from its purview is generally the result of 
some kind of anger or hatred against the human 
race, produced by unhappiness in youth, by injus- 
tices in later life, or by any of the causes which 
lead to persecution mania. A too powerful ego is 
a prison from which a man must escape if he is 

183 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

to enjoy the world to the full. A capacity for genuine 
affection is one of the marks of the man who has 
escaped from this prison of self. To receive affection 
is by no means enough; affection which is received 
should liberate the affection which is to be given, 
and only where both exist in equal measure does 
affection achieve its best possibilities. 

Obstacles, psychological and social, to the 
blossoming of reciprocal affection are a grave evil, 
from which the world has always suffered and still 
suffers. People are slow to give admiration for fear 
it should be misplaced; they are slow to bestow 
affection for fear that they should be made to suffer 
either by the person upon whom they bestow it or 
by a censorious world. Caution is enjoined both 
in the name of morality and in the name of worldly 
wisdom, with the result that generosity and adven- 
turousness are discouraged where the affections 
are concerned. All this tends to produce timidity 
and anger against mankind, since many people 
miss throughout life what is really a fundamental 
need, and to nine out of ten an indispensable con- 
dition of a happy and expansive attitude towards 
the world. It is not to be supposed that those who 
are what is called immoral are in this respect 
superior to those who are not. In sex relations there 
is very often almost nothing that can be called real 
affection; not infrequently there is even a funda- 
mental hostility. Each is trying not to give himself 
or herself away, each is preserving fundamental 
184 



AFFECTION 

loneliness, each remains intact and therefore un- 
fructified. In such experiences there is no funda- 
mental value. I do not say that they should be 
carefully avoided, since the steps necessary to this 
end would be likely to interfere also with the occa- 
sions where a more valuable and profound affection 
could grow up. But I do say that the only sex 
relations that have real value are those in which 
there is no reticence and in which the whole per- 
sonality of both becomes merged in a new collective 
personality. Of all forms of caution, caution in 
love is perhaps the most fatal to true happiness. 



185 



CHAPTER XIII 
THE FAMILY 

Of all the institutions that have come down to us 
from the past none is in the present day so dis- 
organized and derailed as the family. Affection of 
parents for children and of children for parents 
is capable of being one of the greatest sources 
of happiness, but in fact at the present day the 
relations of parents and children are, in nine cases 
out of ten, a source of unhappiness to both parties, 
and in ninety-nine cases out of a hundred a source 
of unhappiness to at least one of the two parties. 
This failure of the family to provide the funda- 
mental satisfaction which in principle it is capable 
of yielding is one of the most deep-seated causes 
of the discontent which is prevalent in our age. 
The adult who wishes to have a happy relation with 
his own children or to provide a happy life for them 
must reflect deeply upon parenthood, and, having 
reflected, must act wisely . The subject of the family is 
far too vast to be dealt with in this volume except 
in relation to our own special problem, namely the 
conquest of happiness. And even in relation to that 
problem we can deal with it only in so far as ameliora- 
tion lies within the power of each individual without 
alterations in the social structure. 
This is, of course, a very grave limitation, for the 

causes of family unhappiness in our day are of the 
186 



THE FAMILY 

most diverse sorts, psychological, economic, social, 
educational, and political. Where the well-to-do 
sections of the community are concerned, two causes 
have combined to make women feel parenthood 
a burden far heavier than it was ever felt to be in 
former times. These two causes are, on the one 
hand, the opening of careers to single women; 
on the other hand, the decay of domestic service. 
In old days women were driven into marriage by 
the intolerable conditions of life for the spinster. 
The spinster had to live at home in economic 
dependence, first upon her father, and then upon 
some reluctant brother. She had no occupations 
to fill her days and no liberty to enjoy herself outside 
the sheltered walls of the family mansion. She had 
neither the opportunity nor the inclination for 
sexual adventure, which she herself profoundly 
believed to be an abomination except within 
marriage. If, in spite of all safeguards, she lost her 
virtue through the wiles of some designing fascinator, 
her situation was pitiable in the extreme. It is de- 
lineated quite accurately in The Vicar of Wakefield: 

The only art her guilt to cover, 
To hide her shame from ev'ry eye, 
To give repentance to her lover 
And wring his bosom is — to die. 

The modern spinster does not consider death 
necessary in these circumstances. If she has had 
a good education, she has no difficulty in making 
a comfortable living, and is therefore independent 

187 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

of parental approval. Since parents have lost their 
economic power over their daughters, they have 
become much more chary of expressing moral dis- 
approval of them ; there is not much use in scolding a 
person who won't stay to be scolded. The unmarried 
young woman of the professional classes is therefore 
able nowadays, provided she is not below the 
average in intelligence and attractiveness, to enjoy 
a thoroughly agreeable life so long as she can keep 
free from the desire for children. But if this desire 
overwhelms her, she is compelled to marry, and 
almost certainly to lose her job. She sinks to a much 
lower level of comfort than that to which she has 
been accustomed, since her husband's income is 
very likely no larger than that which she was 
previously earning, and has to provide for a family 
instead of only a single woman. After having 
enjoyed independence, she finds it galling to have 
to look to another for every penny of necessary 
expenditure. For all these reasons such women 
hesitate to embark upon maternity. 

A woman who nevertheless does take the plunge 
finds herself, as compared with the women of 
former generations, confronted with a new and 
appalling problem, namely the paucity and bad 
quality of domestic service. In consequence of this, 
she becomes tied to her house, compelled to perform 
herself a thousand trivial tasks quite unworthy of 
her ability and training, or, if she does not perform 
them herself, to ruin her temper by scolding the 

188 



THE FAMILY 

maids who neglect them. In regard to the physical 
care of her children, if she has taken pains to become 
well-informed in this matter, she finds that it is 
impossible, without grave risk of disaster, to entrust 
the children to nurses, or even to leave to others 
the most elementary precautions in regard to 
cleanliness and hygiene, unless she can afford a 
nurse who has had an expensive training at some 
institute. Weighed down by a mass of trivial detail, 
she is fortunate indeed if she does not soon lose all 
her charm and three-quarters of her intelligence. 
Too often through the mere performance of neces- 
sary duties such women become wearisome to their 
husbands and a nuisance to their children. When 
the evening comes and her husband returns from 
his work, the woman who talks about her day-time 
troubles is a bore, and the woman who does not 
is absent-minded. In relation to her children, the 
sacrifices that she has made in order to have them 
are so present to her mind that she is almost sure 
to demand more reward than it is desirable to ex- 
pect, while the constant habit of attending to trivial 
details will have made her fussy and small-minded. 
This is the most pernicious of all the injustices 
that she has to suffer : that in consequence of doing 
her duty by her family she has lost their affection, 
whereas if she had neglected them and remained gay 
and charming they would probably have loved her. 1 

1 This whole problem as it affects the professional classes is treated 
with remarkable insight and constructive ability in The Retreat from 
Parenthood, by Jean Aylin. 

189 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

These troubles are essentially economic, and so 
Is another which is almost equally grave. I mean 
the difficulties in regard to housing which result 
from the concentration of populations in large cities. 
In the Middle Ages cities were as rural as the country 
is now. Children still sing the nursery rhyme: 

Upon Paul's steeple stands a tree 

As full of apples as may be, 

The little boys of London town 

They run with sticks to knock them down. 

And then they run from hedge to hedge 

Until they come to London Bridge. 

Paul's steeple is gone, and I do not know at what 
date the hedges disappeared between St. Paul's 
and London Bridge. It is many centuries since the 
little boys of London town could enjoy such pleasures 
as this rhyme suggests, but until not so very long 
ago the bulk of the population lived in the country. 
The towns were not very vast; it was easy to get 
out of them, and by no means uncommon to find 
gardens attached to many houses in them. Nowadays 
there is in England an immense preponderance 
of the urban over the rural population. In America 
this preponderance is as yet slight, but it is very 
rapidly increasing. Cities like London and New 
York are so large that it takes a very long time to 
get out of them. Those who live in the city usually 
have to be content with a flat, to which, of course, 
not a square inch of soil is attached, and in which 
people of moderate means have to be content with 
190 



THE FAMILY 

the absolute minimum of space. If there are young 
children, life in a flat is difficult. There is no room 
for them to play, and there is no room for their 
parents to get away from their noise. Consequently 
professional men tend more and more to live in the 
suburbs. This is undoubtedly desirable from the 
point of view of the children, but it adds considerably 
to the fatigue of the man's life, and greatly diminishes 
the part which he can play in the family. 

Such large economic problems, however, it is not 
my intention to discuss, since they lie outside the 
problem with which we are concerned, namely 
what the individual can here and now do to find 
happiness. We come nearer to this problem when 
we pass to the psychological difficulties which exist 
in the present age in the relations of parents and 
children. These are really part of the problems raised 
by democracy. In old days there were masters and 
slaves: the masters decided what was to be done, 
and on the whole liked their slaves, since their 
slaves ministered to their happiness. The slaves 
may possibly have hated their masters, though this 
did not happen nearly so universally as democratic 
theory would have us suppose. But even if they did 
hate their masters, their masters remained unaware 
of this fact, and the masters at any rate were happy. 
With the general acceptance of democratic theory 
all this was changed: slaves who had acquiesced 
before ceased to acquiesce; masters who had for- 
merly had no doubts as to their rights became 

igi 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

hesitant and uncertain. Friction arose and caused 
unhappiness on both sides. I am not saying all this 
as an argument against democracy, for the troubles 
in question are only such as are inevitable in any 
important transition. But it is no use to blink the 
fact that, while this transition is in progress, it 
makes the world uncomfortable. 

The change in the relation between parents and 
children is a particular example of the general 
spread of democracy. Parents are no longer sure of 
their rights as against their children; children no 
longer feel that they owe respect to their parents. 
The virtue of obedience, which was formerly exacted 
without question, has become unfashionable, and 
rightly so. Psycho-analysis has terrified educated 
parents with the fear of the harm they may unwit- 
tingly do their children. If they kiss them, they may 
produce an CEdipus complex ; if they do not they 
may produce a fury of jealousy. If they order the 
children to do things they may be producing a 
sense of sin; if they do not, the children acquire 
habits which the parents think undesirable. When 
they see their baby sucking his thumb, they draw 
all kinds of terrifying inferences, but they are quite 
at a loss as to what to do to stop him. Parenthood, 
which used to be a triumphant exercise of power, 
has become timid, anxious, and filled with con- 
scientious doubts. The old simple joys are lost, and 
that at the very moment when, owing to the new 
freedom of single women, the mother has had to 

192 



THE FAMILY 

sacrifice much more than formerly in deciding upon 
maternity. In these circumstances conscientious 
mothers ask too little of their children, and un- 
conscientious mothers ask too much. Conscientious 
mothers restrain their natural affection and become 
shy; unconscientious mothers seek in their children 
a compensation for the joys that they have had 
to forgo. In the one case the child's affections are 
starved, in the other they are over-stimulated. In 
neither case is there any of that simple and natural 
happiness that the family at its best can provide. 

In view of all these troubles, is it any wonder that 
the birth-rate declines? The decline of the birth-rate 
in the population at large has reached a point 
which shows that the population will soon begin 
to dwindle, but among the well-to-do classes this 
point has long ago been passed, not only in one 
country, but in practically all the most highly 
civilized countries. There are not very many 
statistics available as to the birth-rate among the 
well-to-do, but two facts may be quoted from Jean 
Ayling's book alluded to above. It appears that in 
Stockholm in the years 1919 to 1922 the fertility 
of professional women was only one-third of that 
of the population at large, and that among the four 
thousand graduates of Wellesley College, U.S. A., 
in the period 1896 to 191 3 the total number of 
children is about three thousand, whereas to prevent 
an actual dwindling of the stock there should have 
been eight thousand children none of whom had 

n >93 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

died young. There can be no doubt that the civiliza- 
tion produced by the white races has this singular 
characteristic, that in proportion as men and women 
absorb it, they become sterile. The most civilized 
are the most sterile; the least civilized are the most 
fertile; and between the two there is a continual 
gradation. At present the most intelligent sections 
of the Western nations are dying out. Within a 
very few years the Western nations as a whole will 
be diminishing in numbers except in so far as their 
stocks are replenished by immigration from less 
civilized regions. And as soon as the immigrants 
acquire the civilization of the country of their 
adoption they in turn will become comparatively 
sterile. It is clear that a civilization which has this 
characteristic is unstable; unless it can be induced 
to reproduce its numbers, it must sooner or later 
die out and give place to some other civilization 
in which the urge towards parenthood has retained 
enough strength to prevent the population from 
declining. 

Official moralists in every Western country have 
endeavoured to treat this problem by means of 
exhortations and sentimentality. On the one hand, 
they say that it is the duty of every married couple 
to have as many children as God wills, regardless 
of any prospect that such children may have of 
health and happiness. On the other hand, male 
divines prate about the sacred joys of motherhood 
and pretend that a large family of diseased and 

«94 



THE FAMILY 

poverty-stricken infants is a source of happiness. 
The State joins in with the argument that an ade- 
quate crop of cannon fodder is necessary, for how 
can all these exquisite and ingenious weapons of 
destruction function adequately unless there are 
sufficient populations left for them to destroy? 
Strange to say, the individual parent, even if he 
accepts these arguments as applied to others, 
remains entirely deaf to them as applied to himself. 
The psychology of the divines and the patriots is 
at fault. The divines may succeed so long as they 
can successfully threaten hell-fire, but it is only a 
minority of the population that now takes this 
threat seriously. And no threat short of this is ade- 
quate to control behaviour in a matter so essentially 
private. As for the State, its argument is altogether 
too ferocious. People may agree that others ought 
to provide cannon fodder, but they are not attracted 
by the prospect of having their own children used 
in this way. All that the State can do, therefore, 
is to endeavour to keep the poor in ignorance, an 
effort which, as the statistics show, is singularly 
unsuccessful except in the most backward of Western 
countries. Very few men or women will have 
children from a sense of public duty, even if it were 
far clearer than it is that any such public duty 
exists. When men and women have children, they 
do so either because they believe that children will 
add to their happiness, or because they do not 
know how to prevent them. The latter reason 

J95 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

still operates very powerfully, but it is steadily 
diminishing in potency. And nothing that either 
the State or the Churches can do will prevent this 
diminution from continuing. It is necessary, there- 
fore, if the white races are to survive, that parent- 
hood should again become capable of yielding 
happiness to parents. 

When one considers human nature apart from 
the circumstances of the present day, it is clear, I 
think, that parenthood is psychologically capable 
of providing the greatest and most enduring happi- 
ness that life has to offer. This, no doubt, is more 
true of women than of men, but it is more true of 
men than most moderns are inclined to suppose. 
It is taken for granted in almost all literature 
before the present age. Hecuba cares more for her 
children than for Priam ; MacDuff cares more for 
his children than for his wife. In the Old Testament 
both men and women are passionately concerned 
to leave descendants; in China and Japan this 
attitude has persisted down to our own day. It will 
be said that this desire is due to ancestor worship. 
I think, however, that the contrary is the truth, 
namely that ancestor worship is a reflection of the 
interest people take in the persistence of their 
family. Reverting to the professional women whom 
we were considering a moment ago, it is clear that 
the urge to have children must be very powerful, 
for otherwise none of them would make the sacrifices 
required in order to satisfy it. For my own part, 

196 



THE FAMILY 

speaking personally, I have found the happiness of 
parenthood greater than any other that I have 
experienced. I believe that when circumstances 
lead men or women to forgo this happiness, a 
very deep need remains ungratified, and that this 
produces a dissatisfaction and listlessness of which 
the cause may remain quite unknown. To be happy 
in this world, especially when youth is past, it is 
necessary to feel oneself not merely an isolated 
individual whose day will soon be over, but part of 
the stream of life flowing on from the first germ to 
the remote and unknown future. As a conscious 
sentiment, expressed in set terms, this involves no 
doubt a hyper-civilized and intellectual outlook 
upon the world, but as a vague instinctive emotion 
it is primitive and natural, and it is its absence that 
is hyper-civilized. A man who is capable of some 
great and remarkable achievement which sets its 
stamp upon future ages may gratify this feeling 
through his work, but for men and women who 
have no exceptional gifts, the only way to do so 
is through children. Those who have allowed their 
procreative impulses to become atrophied have 
separated themselves from the stream of life, and in 
so doing have run a grave risk of becoming desiccated. 
For them, unless they are exceptionally impersonal, 
death ends all. The world that shall come after them 
does not concern them, and because of this their 
doings appear to themselves trivial and unimportant. 
To the man or woman who has children and 

'97 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

grandchildren and loves them with a natural 
affection, the future is important, at any rate to the 
limit of their lives, not only through morality or 
through an effort of imagination, but naturally 
and instinctively. And the man whose interests 
have been stretched to this extent beyond his per- 
sonal life is likely to be able to stretch them still 
further. Like Abraham, he will derive satisfaction 
from the thought that his seed arc to inherit the 
promised land even if this is not to happen for many 
generations. And through such feelings he is saved 
from the sense of futility which otherwise deadens 
all his emotions. 

The basis of the family is, of course, the fact 
that parents feel a special kind of affection towards 
their own children, different from that which they 
feel towards each other or towards other children. 
It is true that some parents feel little or no parental 
affection, and it is also true that some women are 
capable of feeling an affection for children not their 
own almost as strong as that which they could 
feel for their own. Nevertheless, the broad fact 
remains that parental affection is a special kind 
of feeling which the normal human being expe- 
riences towards his or her own children, but not 
towards any other human being. This emotion 
is one which we inherit from our animal ancestors. 
In this respect Freud seems to me not sufficiently 
biological in his outlook, for anyone who will 

observe an animal mother with her young can sec 
198 



THE FAMILY 

that her behaviour towards them follows an entirely 
different pattern from her behaviour towards the 
male with whom she has sex relations. And this 
same different and instinctive pattern, though in a 
modified and less definite form, exists among human 
beings. If it were not for this special emotion there 
would be almost nothing to be said for the family 
as an institution, since children might equally well 
be left to the care of professionals. As things are, 
however, the special affection which parents have for 
children, provided their instincts are not atrophied, 
is of value both to the parents themselves and 
to the children. The value of parental affection to 
children lies largely in the fact that it is more 
reliable than any other affection. One's friends 
like one for one's merits, one's lovers for one's 
charms; if the merits or the charms diminish, 
friends and lovers may vanish. But it is in times of 
misfortune that parents are most to be relied upon, 
in illness, and even in disgrace if the parents are 
of the right sort. We all feel pleasure when we are 
admired for our merits, but most of us are sufficiently 
modest at heart to feel that such admiration is 
precarious. Our parents love us because we are 
their children, and this is an unalterable fact, so 
that we feel more safe with them than with anyone 
else. In times of success this may seem unimportant, 
but in times of failure it affords a consolation and a 
security not to be found elsewhere. 
In all human relations it is fairly easy to secure 

'99 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

happiness for one party, but much more difficult 
to secure it for both. The gaoler may enjoy guard- 
ing the prisoner; the employer may enjoy brow- 
beating the employee ; the ruler may enjoy governing 
his subjects with a firm hand ; and the old-fashioned 
father no doubt enjoyed instilling virtue into his 
son by means of the rod. These, however, are one- 
sided pleasures ; to the other party in the transaction 
the situation is less agreeable. We have come to 
feel that there is something unsatisfactory about 
these one-sided delights: we believe that a good 
human relation should be satisfying to both parties. 
This applies more particularly to the relations of 
parents and children, with the result that parents 
obtain far less pleasure from children than they did 
formerly, while children reciprocally suffer less at 
the hands of their parents than they did in bygone 
generations. I do not think there is any real reason 
why parents should derive less happiness from their 
children than they did in former times, although 
undoubtedly this is the case at present. Nor do I 
think that there is any reason why parents should 
fail to increase the happiness of their children. But 
this requires, as do all those equal relationships at 
which the modern world aims, a certain delicacy 
and tenderness, a certain reverence for another 
personality, which are by no means encouraged by 
the pugnacity of ordinary life. Let us consider the 
happiness of parenthood, first in its biological 
essence, and then as it may become in a parent 
200 



THE FAMILY 

inspired by that kind of attitude towards other 
personalities which we have been suggesting as 
essential to a world that believes in equality. 

The primitive root of the pleasure of parenthood 
is two-fold. On the one hand there is the feeling of 
part of one's own body externalized, prolonging 
its life beyond the death of the rest of one's body, 
and possibly in its turn externalizing part of itself 
in the same fashion, and so securing the immortality 
of the germ-plasm. On the other hand there is an 
intimate blend of power and tenderness. The new 
creature is helpless, and there is an impulse to supply 
its needs, an impulse which gratifies not only the 
parent's love towards the child, but also the parent's 
desire for power. So long as the infant is felt to be 
helpless, the affection which is bestowed upon it 
does not feel unselfish, since it is in the nature of 
protection to a vulnerable portion of oneself. But 
from a very early age there comes to be a conflict 
between love of parental power and desire for the 
child's good, for, while power over the child is to a 
certain extent decreed by the nature of things, it 
is nevertheless desirable that the child should as 
soon as possible learn to be independent in as 
many ways as possible, which is unpleasant to the 
power impulse in a parent. Some parents never 
become conscious of this conflict, and remain tyrants 
until the children are in a position to rebel. Others, 
however, become conscious of it, and thus find 
themselves a prey to conflicting emotions. In this 

201 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

conflict their parental happiness is lost. After all 
the care that they have bestowed on the child, 
they find to their mortification that he turns out 
quite different from what they had hoped. They 
wanted him to be a soldier, and they find him a 
pacifist, or, like Tolstoy, they wanted him to be 
a pacifist, and he joins the Black Hundreds. 
But it is not only in these later developments that 
the difficulty is felt. If you feed an infant who is 
already capable of feeding himself, you are putting 
love of power before the child's welfare, although 
it seems to you that you are only being kind in 
saving him trouble. If you make him too vividly 
aware of dangers, you are probably actuated by a 
desire to keep him dependent upon you. If you give 
him demonstrative affection to which you expect 
a response, you are probably endeavouring to 
grapple him to you by means of his emotions. In 
a thousand ways, great and small, the possessive 
impulse of parents will lead them astray, unless 
they are very watchful or very pure in heart. Modern 
parents, aware of these dangers, sometimes lose 
confidence in handling their children, and become 
therefore even less able to be of use to them than 
if they permitted themselves spontaneous mistakes, 
for nothing causes so much worry in a child's mind 
as lack of certainty and self-confidence on the part 
of an adult. Better than being careful, therefore, is 
to be pure in heart. The parent who genuinely 
desires the child's welfare more than his or her 
aoa 



THE FAMILY 

power over the child will not need textbooks on 
psycho-analysis to say what should and what should 
not be done, but will be guided aright by impulse. 
And in that case the relation of parent and child 
will be harmonious from first to last, causing no 
rebellion in the child and no feeling of frustration 
in the parent. But this demands on the part of 
the parent from the first a respect for the personality 
of the child — a respect which must be not merely a 
matter of principle, whether moral or intellectual, 
but something deeply felt with almost mystical 
conviction to such a degree that possessiveness 
and oppression become utterly impossible. It is 
of course not only towards children that an attitude 
of this sort is desirable: it is very necessary in 
marriage, and in friendship also, though in friendship 
it is less difficult. In a good world it would pervade 
the political relations between groups of human 
beings, though this is so distant a hope that we need 
not linger over it. But universal as is the need for 
this kind of gentleness, it is needed most of all 
where children are concerned, because of their 
helplessness, and because their small size and 
feeble strength cause vulgar souls to despise them. 

But to return to the problems with which this 
book is concerned, the full joy of parenthood in the 
modern world is only to be obtained by those who 
can deeply feel this attitude of respect towards the 
child of which I have been speaking. For to them 
there will be no irksome restraint upon their love of 

80S 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

power, and no need to dread the bitter disillusion- 
ment which despotic parents experience when their 
children acquire freedom. And to the parent who 
has this attitude there is more joy in parenthood 
than ever was possible to the despot in the hey-day 
of parental power. For the love that has been 
purged by gentleness of all tendency towards 
tyranny can give a joy more exquisite, more tender, 
more capable of transmuting the base metal of 
daily life into the pure gold of mystic ecstasy, than 
any emotion that is possible to the man still fighting 
and struggling to maintain his ascendancy in this 
slippery world. 

While I attach a very high value to the parental 

emotion, I do not draw the inference, which is 

too commonly drawn, that mothers should do as 

much as possible themselves for their children. 

There is a convention on this subject which was 

all very well in the days when nothing was known 

about the care of children except the unscientific 

odds and ends that old women handed on to younger 

ones. Nowadays there is a great deal in the care of 

children which is best done by those who have made 

a special study of some department of this subject. 

In relation to that part of their education which is 

called "education" this is recognized. A mother is 

not expected to teach her son the calculus, however 

much she may love him. So far as the acquisition 

of book-learning is concerned, it is recognized that 

children can acquire it better from those who have 

204. 



THE FAMILY 

it than from a mother who does not have it. But in 
regard to many other departments in the care of 
children this is not recognized, because the experience 
required is not yet recognized. Undoubtedly cer- 
tain things are better done by the mother, but as 
the child gets older, there will be an increasing 
number of things better done by someone else. 
If this were generally recognized, mothers would 
be saved a great deal of labour which is irksome 
to them, because it is not that in which they have 
professional competence. A woman who has acquired 
any kind of professional skill ought, both for her 
own sake and for that of the community, to be 
free to continue to exercise this skill in spite of 
motherhood. She may be unable to do so during 
the later months of pregnancy and during lactation, 
but a cliild over nine months old ought not to form 
an insuperable barrier to its mother's professional 
activities. Whenever society demands of a mother 
sacrifices to her child which go beyond reason, the 
mother, if she is not unusually saintly, will expect 
from her child compensations exceeding those she 
has a right to expect. The mother who is conven- 
tionally called self-sacrificing is, in a great majority 
of cases, exceptionally selfish towards her children, 
for, important as parenthood is as an element in 
life, it is not satisfying if it is treated as the whole 
of life, and the unsatisfied parent is likely to be 
an emotionally grasping parent. It is important, 

therefore, quite as much in the interests of the 

205 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

children as in those of the mother, that motherhood 
should not cut her off from all other interests and 
pursuits. If she has a real vocation for the care of 
children and that amount of knowledge which will 
enable her to care adequately for her own children, 
her skill ought to be more widely used, and she 
ought to be engaged professionally in the care of 
some group of children which may be expected to 
include her own. It is right that parents, provided 
they fulfil the minimum requirements insisted upon 
by the State, should have a say as to how their 
children are cared for and by whom, so long as 
they do not go outside the ranks of qualified persons. 
But there should be no convention demanding 
that every mother should do herself what some 
other woman can do better. Mothers who feel 
baffled and incompetent when faced with their 
children, as many mothers do, should have no 
hesitation in having their children cared for by 
women who have an aptitude for this work and 
have undergone the necessary training. There is 
no heaven-sent instinct which teaches women the 
right thing to do by their children, and solicitude 
when it goes beyond a point is a camouflage for 
possessiveness. Many a child is psychologically 
ruined by ignorant and sentimental handling on 
the part of its mother. It has always been recognized 
that fathers cannot be expected to do very much for 
their children, and yet children are quite as apt to 
love their fathers as to love their mothers. The 
206 



THE FAMILY 

relation of the mother to the child will have in 
future to resemble more and more that which at 
present the father has, if women's lives are to be 
freed from unnecessary slavery and children are 
to be allowed to profit by the scientific knowledge 
which is accumulating as to the care of their minds 
and bodies in early years. 



107 



CHAPTER XIV 
WORK 

Whether work should be placed among the causes 
of happiness or among the causes of unhappiness 
may perhaps be regarded as a doubtful question. 
There is certainly much work which is exceedingly 
irksome, and an excess of work is always very 
painful. I think, however, that, provided work is 
not excessive in amount, even the dullest work is 
to most people less painful than idleness. There 
are in work all grades, from mere relief of tedium 
up to the profoundest delights, according to the 
nature of the work and the abilities of the worker. 
Most of the work that most people have to do is 
not in itself interesting, but even such work has 
certain great advantages. To begin with, it fills 
a good many hours of the day without the need of 
deciding what one shall do. Most people, when 
they are left free to fill their own time according 
to their own choice, are at a loss to think of anything 
sufficiently pleasant to be worth doing. And whatever 
they decide on, they are troubled by the feeling that 
something else would have been pleasanter. To be 
able to fill leisure intelligently is the last product 
of civilization, and at present very few people have 
reached this level. Moreover, the exercise of choice 
is in itself tiresome. Except to people with unusual 

initiative it is positively agreeable to be told what 

208 



WORK 

to do at each hour of the day, provided the orders 
are not too unpleasant. Most of the idle rich suffer 
unspeakable boredom as the price of their freedom 
from drudgery. At times they may find relief by 
hunting big game in Africa, or by flying round the 
world, but the number of such sensations is limited, 
especially after youth is past. Accordingly, the more 
intelligent rich men work nearly as hard as if they 
were poor, while rich women for the most part keep 
themselves busy with innumerable trifles of whose 
earth-shaking importance they are firmly persuaded. 

Work, therefore, is desirable, first and foremost, 
as a preventive of boredom, for the boredom that 
a man feels when he is doing necessary though 
uninteresting work is as nothing in comparison with 
the boredom that he feels when he has nothing to 
do with his days. With this advantage of work 
another is associated, namely that it makes holidays 
much more delicious when they come. Provided a 
man does not have to work so hard as to impair 
his vigour, he is likely to find far more zest in his 
free time than an idle man could possibly find. 

The second advantage of most paid work and of 
some unpaid work is that it gives chances of success 
and opportunities for ambition. In most work 
success is measured by income, and while our 
capitalistic society continues, this is inevitable. 
It is only where the best work is concerned that 
this measure ceases to be the natural one to apply. 
The desire that men feel to increase their income 

o 309 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

is quite as much a desire for success as for the extra 
comforts that a higher income can procure. However 
dull work may be, it becomes bearable if it is a 
means of building up a reputation, whether in the 
world at large or only in one's own circle. Continuity 
of purpose is one of the most essential ingredients 
of happiness in the long run, and for most men this 
comes chiefly through their work. In this respect 
those women whose lives are occupied with house- 
work are much less fortunate than men, or than 
women who work outside the home. The domesti- 
cated wife does not receive wages, has no means of 
bettering herself, is taken for granted by her husband 
(who sees practically nothing of what she does), 
and is valued by him not for her house-work but for 
quite other qualities. Of course, this does not apply 
to those women who are sufficiently well-to-do to 
make beautiful houses and beautiful gardens and 
become the envy of their neighbours; but such 
women are comparatively few, and for the great 
majority house-work cannot bring as much satisfac- 
tion as work of other kinds brings to men and to 
professional women. 

The satisfaction of killing time and of affording 
some outlet, however modest, for ambition, belongs 
to most work, and is sufficient to make even a man 
whose work is dull happier on the average than a 
man who has no work at all. But when work is 
interesting, it is capable of giving satisfaction of a 
far higher order than mere relief from tedium. The 

aio 



WORK 

kinds of work in which there is some interest may 
be arranged in a hierarchy. I shall begin with those 
which are only mildly interesting and end with 
those that are worthy to absorb the whole energies 
of a great man. 

Two chief elements make work interesting : first, 
the exercise of skill, and second, construction. 

Every man who has acquired some unusual 
skill enjoys exercising it until it has become a 
matter of course, or until he can no longer improve 
himself. This motive to activity begins in early 
childhood : a boy who can stand on his head becomes 
reluctant to stand on his feet. A great deal of work 
gives the same pleasure that is to be derived from 
games of skill. The work of a lawyer or a politician 
must contain in a more delectable form a great 
deal of the same pleasure that is to be derived from 
playing bridge. Here, of course, there is not only 
the exercise of skill but the outwitting of a skilled 
opponent. Even where this competitive element 
is absent, however, the performance of difficult 
feats is agreeable. A man who can do stunts in an 
aeroplane finds the pleasure so great that for the 
sake of it he is willing to risk his life. I imagine 
that an able surgeon, in spite of the painful circum- 
stances in which his work is done, derives satisfac- 
tion from the exquisite precision of his operations. 
The same kind of pleasure, though in a less intense 
form, is to be derived from a great deal of work of 
a humbler kind. I have even heard of plumbers 

211 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

who enjoyed their work, though I have never had 
the good fortune to meet one. All skilled work 
can be pleasurable, provided the skill required is 
either variable or capable of indefinite improvement. 
If these conditions are absent, it will cease to be 
interesting when a man has acquired his maximum 
skill. A man who runs three-mile races will cease 
to find pleasure in this occupation when he passes 
the age at which he can beat his own previous 
record. Fortunately there is a very considerable 
amount of work in which new circumstances call 
for new skill and a man can go on improving, at 
any rate until he has reached middle age. In soma 
kinds of skilled work, such as politics, for example,] 
it seems that men are at their best between sixty 
and seventy, the reason being that in such occupa- 
tions a wide experience of other men is essential. 
For this reason successful politicians are apt to be 
happier at the age of seventy than any other men 
of equal age. Their only competitors in this respect 
are the men who are the heads of big businesses. 

There is, however, another element possessed by 
the best work, which is even more important as a 
source of happiness than is the exercise of skill. 
This is the element of constructiveness. In some 
work, though by no means in most, something is 
built up which remains as a monument when the 
work is completed. We may distinguish construc- 
tion from destruction by the following criterion. In 
construction the initial state of affairs is comparatively 

312 



WORK 

haphazard, while the final state of affairs embodies 
a purpose ; in destruction the reverse is the case : the 
initial state of affairs embodies a purpose, while the 
final state of affairs is haphazard, that is to say, 
all that is intended by the destroyer is to produce 
a state of affairs which does not embody a certain 
purpose. This criterion applies in the most literal 
and obvious case, namely the construction and 
destruction of buildings. In constructing a building 
a previously made plan is carried out, whereas in 
destroying it no one decides exactly how the materials 
are to lie when the demolition is complete. Destruc- 
tion is of course necessary very often as a preliminary 
to subsequent construction; in that case it is part 
of a whole which is constructive. But not infre- 
quently a man will engage in activities of which 
the purpose is destructive without regard to any 
construction that may come after. Frequently he 
will conceal this from himself by the belief that he 
is only sweeping away in order to build afresh, but 
it is generally possible to unmask this pretence, 
when it is a pretence, by asking him what the 
subsequent construction is to be. On this subject 
it will be found that he will speak vaguely and 
without enthusiasm, whereas on the preliminary 
destruction he has spoken precisely and with zest. 
This applies to not a few revolutionaries and 
militarists and other apostles of violence. They 
are actuated, usually without their own knowledge, 
by hatred; the destruction of what they hate is 

913 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

their real purpose, and they are comparatively 
indifferent to the question what is to come after it. 
Now I cannot deny that in the work of destruction 
as in the work of construction there may be joy. 
It is a fiercer joy, perhaps at moments more intense, 
but it is less profoundly satisfying, since the result 
is one in which little satisfaction is to be found. 
You kill your enemy, and when he is dead your 
occupation is gone, and the satisfaction that you 
derive from victory quickly fades. The work of 
construction, on the other hand, when completed, 
is delightful to contemplate, and moreover is never 
so fully completed that there is nothing further to 
do about it. The most satisfactory purposes are those 
that lead on indefinitely from one success to another 
without ever coming to a dead end; and in this 
respect it will be found that construction is a greater 
source of happiness than destruction. Perhaps it 
would be more correct to say that those who find 
satisfaction in construction find in it greater satis- 
faction than the lovers of destruction can find in 
destruction, for if once you have become filled 
with hate you will not easily derive from construc- 
tion the pleasure which another man would derive 
from it. 

At the same time few things are so likely to cure 
the habit of hatred as the opportunity to do construc- 
tive work of an important kind. 

The satisfaction to be derived from success in a 
great constructive enterprise is one of the most 

"4 



WORK 

massive that life has to offer, although unfortunately 
in its highest forms it is only open to men of excep- 
tional ability. Nothing can rob a man of the happiness 
of successful achievement in an important piece of 
work, unless it be the proof that after all his work 
was bad. There are many forms of such satisfaction. 
The man who by a scheme of irrigation has caused 
the wilderness to blossom like the rose enjoys it in 
one of its most tangible forms. The creation of an 
organization may be a work of supreme importance. 
So is the work of those few statesmen who have 
devoted their lives to producing order out of chaos, 
of whom Lenin is the supreme type in our day. 
The most obvious examples axe artists and men of 
science. Shakespeare says of his verse : "So long as 
men can breathe, or eyes can see, so long lives 
this." And it cannot be doubted that the thought 
consoled him for misfortune. In his sonnets he 
maintains that the thought of his friend reconciled 
him to life, but I cannot help suspecting that the 
sonnets he wrote to his friend were even more 
effective for this purpose than the friend himself. 
Great artists and great men of science do work 
which is in itself delightful ; while they are doing it, 
it secures them the respect of those whose respect is 
worth having, which gives them the most funda- 
mental kind of power, namely power over men's 
thoughts and feelings. They have also the most 
solid reasons for thinking well of themselves. This 
combination of fortunate circumstances ought, 

215 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

one would think, to be enough to make any man 
happy. Nevertheless it is not so. Michael Angelo, 
for example, was a profoundly unhappy man and 
maintained (not, I am sure, with truth) that he 
would not have troubled to produce works of art 
if he had not had to pay the debts of his impe- 
cunious relations. The power to produce great art 
is very often, though by no means always, associated 
with a temperamental unhappiness, so great that 
but for the joy which the artist derives from his 
work he would be driven to suicide. We cannot 
therefore maintain that even the greatest work must 
make a man happy; we can only maintain that it 
i must make him less unhappy. Men of science, 
however, are far less often temperamentally unhappy 
than artists are, and in the main the men who do 
great work in science are happy men, whose happi- 
ness is derived primarily from their work. 

One of the causes of unhappiness among intel- 
lectuals in the present day is that so many of them, 
especially those whose skill is literary, find no oppor- 
tunity for the independent exercise of their talents, 
but have to hire themselves out to rich corporations 
directed by Philistines, who insist upon their pro- 
ducing what they themselves regard as pernicious 
nonsense. If you were to inquire among journalists 
either in England or America whether they believed 
in the policy of the newspaper for which they worked, 
you would find, I believe, that only a small minority 

do so ; the rest, for the sake of a livelihood, prostitute 
ai6 



WORK 

their skill to purposes which they believe to be 
harmful. Such work cannot bring any real satis- 
faction, and in the course of reconciling himself to 
the doing of it a man has to make himself so cynical 
that he can no longer derive whole-hearted satis- 
faction from anything whatever. I cannot condemn 
men who undertake work of this sort, since starva- 
tion is too serious an alternative, but I think that 
where it is possible to do work that is satisfactory 
to a man's constructive impulses without entirely 
starving, he will be well advised from the point of 
view of his own happiness if he chooses it in pre- 
ference to work much more highly paid but not 
seeming to him worth doing on its own account. 
Without self-respect genuine happiness is scarcely 
possible. And the man who is ashamed of his work 
can hardly achieve self-respect. 

The satisfaction of constructive work, though it 
may, as things are, be the privilege of a minority, 
can nevertheless be the privilege of a quite large 
minority. Any man who is his own master in his 
work can feel it; so can any man whose work 
appears to him useful and requires considerable 
skill. The production of satisfactory children is a 
difficult constructive work capable of affording 
profound satisfaction. Any woman who has achieved 
this can feel that as a result of her labour the world 
contains something of value which it would not 
otherwise contain. 

Human beings differ profoundly in regard to the 

217 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

tendency to regard their lives as a whole. To some 
men it is natural to do so, and essential to happi- 
ness to be able to do so with some satisfaction. 
To others life is a series of detached incidents without 
directed movement and without unity. I think the 
former sort are more likely to achieve happiness 
than the latter, since they will gradually build up 
those circumstances from which they can derive 
contentment and self-respect, whereas the others 
will be blown about by the winds of circumstance 
now this way, now that, without ever arriving at 
any haven. The habit of viewing life as a whole 
is an essential part both of wisdom and of true 
morality, and is one of the things which ought to 
be encouraged in education. Consistent purpose is 
not enough to make life happy, but it is an almost 
indispensable condition of a happy life. And con- 
sistent purpose embodies itself mainly in work. 



918 



CHAPTER XV 
IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

In this chapter I wish to consider not those 
major interests about which a man's life is built, 
but those minor interests which fill his leisure and 
afford relaxation from the tenseness of his more 
serious pre-occupations. In the life of the average 
man his wife and children, his work and his financial 
position occupy the main part of his anxious and 
serious thought. Even if he has extra-matrimonial 
love affairs, they probably do not concern him as 
profoundly in themselves as in their possible effects 
upon his home life. The interests which are bound 
up with his work I am not for the present regarding 
as impersonal interests. A man of science, for 
example, must keep abreast of research in his own 
line. Towards such research his feelings have the 
warmth and vividness belonging to something 
intimately concerned with his career, but if he reads 
about research in some quite other science with 
which he is not professionally concerned he reads 
in quite a different spirit, not professionally, less 
critically, more disinterestedly. Even if he has to 
use his mind in order to follow what is said, his 
reading is nevertheless a relaxation, because it is 
not connected with his responsibilities. If the book 
interests him, his interest is impersonal in a sense 
which cannot be applied to the books upon bis own 

219 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

subject. It is such interests lying outside the main 
activities of a man's life that I wish to speak about 
in the present chapter. 

One of the sources of unhappiness, fatigue, and 
nervous strain is inability to be interested in anything 
that is not of practical importance in one's own 
life. The result of this is that the conscious mind 
gets no rest from a certain small number of matters, 
each of which probably involves some anxiety and 
some element of worry. Except in sleep the conscious 
mind is never allowed to he fallow while subconscious 
thought matures its gradual wisdom. The result 
is excitability, lack of sagacity, irritability, and a 
loss of sense of proportion. All these are both causes 
and effects of fatigue. As a man gets more tired, his 
external interests fade, and as they fade he loses 
the relief which they afford him and becomes still 
more tired. This vicious circle is only too apt to 
end in a breakdown. What is restful about external 
interests is the fact that they do not call for any 
action. Making decisions and exercising volition 
are very fatiguing, especially if they have to be 
done hurriedly and without the help of the sub- 
conscious. Men who feel that they must "sleep on 
it" before coming to an important decision are 
profoundly right. But it is not only in sleep that 
the subconscious mental processes can work. They 
can work also while a man's conscious mind is 
occupied elsewhere. The man who can forget his 
work when it is over and not remember it until 

S30 



IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

it begins again next day is likely to do his work 
far better than the man who worries about it 
throughout the intervening hours.. And it is very 
much easier to forget work at the times when it 
ought to be forgotten if a man has many interests 
other than his work than it is if he has not. It is, 
however, essential that these interests should not 
exercise those very faculties which have been 
exhausted by his day's work. They should not 
involve will and quick decision, they should not, 
like gambling, involve any financial element, and 
they should as a rule not be so exciting as to produce 
emotional fatigue and preoccupy the subconscious 
as well as the conscious mind. 

A great many amusements fulfil all these con- 
ditions. Watching games, going to the theatre, 
playing golf, are all irreproachable from this point 
of view. For a man of a bookish turn of mind read- 
ing unconnected with his professional activities is 
very satisfactory. However important a worry may 
be, it should not be thought about throughout 
the whole of the waking hours. 
f In this respect there is a great difference between 
men and women. Men on the whole find it very 
much easier to forget their work than women do. 
In the case of women whose work is in the home 
this is natural, since they do not have the change 
of place that a man has when he leaves the office 
to help them to acquire a new mood. But if I am 
not mistaken, women whose work is outside the 

391 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

home differ from men in this respect almost as much 
as those who work at home. They find it, that is 
to say, very difficult to be interested in anything 
that has for them no practical importance. Their 
purposes govern their thoughts and their activities, 
and they seldom become absorbed in some wholly 
irresponsible interest. I do not of course deny that 
exceptions exist, but I am speaking of what seems 
to me to be the usual rule. In a woman's college, 
for example, the women teachers, if no man is 
present, talk shop in the evening, while in a man's 
college the men do not. This characteristic appears 
to women as a higher degree of conscientiousness 
than that of men, but I do not think that in the 
long run it improves the quality of their work. And 
it tends to produce a certain narrowness of outlook 
leading not infrequently to a kind of fanaticism. 

All impersonal interests, apart from their impor- 
tance as relaxation, have various other uses. To 
begin with, they help a man to retain his sense of 
proportion. It is very easy to become so absorbed 
in our own pursuits, our own circle, our own type 
of work, that we forget how small a part this is of 
the total of human activity and how many things 
in the world are entirely unaffected by what we do. 
Why should one remember this? you may ask. 
There are several answers. In the first place, it is 
good to have as true a picture of the world as is 
compatible with necessary activities. Each of us 
is in the world for no very long time, and within 

223 



IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

the few years of his life has to acquire whatever he 
is to know of this strange planet and its place 
in the universe. To ignore our opportunities for 
knowledge, imperfect as they are, is like going to the 
theatre and not listening to the play. The world is 
full of things that are tragic or comic, heroic or 
bizarre or surprising, and those who fail to be 
interested in the spectacle that it offers are forgoing 
one of the privileges that life has to offer. 

Then again a sense of proportion is very valuable 
and at times very consoling. We are all inclined to 
get unduly excited, unduly strained, unduly im- 
pressed with the importance of the little corner of 
the world in which we live, and of the little moment 
of time comprised between our birth and death. 
In this excitement and over-estimation of our own 
importance there is nothing desirable. True, it 
may make us work harder, but it will not make us 
work better. A little work directed to a good end is 
better than a great deal of work directed to a bad 
end, though the apostles of the strenuous life seem 
to think otherwise. Those who care much for their 
work are always in danger of falling into fanaticism, 
which consists essentially in remembering one or 
two desirable things while forgetting all the rest, 
and in supposing that in the pursuit of these one or 
two any incidental harm of other sorts is of little 
account. Against this fanatical temper there is no 
better prophylactic than a large conception of the 
life of man and his place in the universe. This 

as>3 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

may seem a very big thing to invoke in such a 
connection, but apart from this particular use it 
is in itself a thing of great value. 

It is one of the defects of modern higher education 
that it has become too much a training in the 
acquisition of certain kinds of skill, and too little an 
enlargement of the mind and heart by an impartial 
survey of the world. You become absorbed, let us 
say, in a political contest, and work hard for the 
victory of your own party. So far, so good. But it 
may happen in the course of the contest that some 
opportunity of victory presents itself which involves 
the use of methods calculated to increase hatred, 
violence and suspicion in the world. For example, 
you may find that the best road to victory is to insult 
some foreign nation. If your mental purview is 
limited to the present, or if you have imbibed the 
doctrine that what is called efficiency is the only 
thing that matters, you will adopt such dubious 
means. Through them you will be victorious in 
your immediate purpose, while the more distant 
consequences may be disastrous. If, on the other 
hand, you have as part of the habitual furniture 
of your mind the past ages of man, his slow and 
partial emergence out of barbarism, and the brevity 
of his total existence in comparison with astrono- 
mical epochs — if, I say, such thoughts have moulded 
your habitual feelings, you will realize that the 
momentary battle upon which you are engaged 
cannot be of such importance as to risk a backward 

824 



IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

step towards the darkness out of which we have 
been slowly emerging. Nay, more, if you suffer 
defeat in your immediate objective, you will be 
sustained by the same sense of its momentariness 
that made you unwilling to adopt degrading 
weapons. You will have, beyond your immediate 
activities, purposes that are distant and slowly un- 
folding, in which you are not an isolated indi- 
vidual but one of the great army of those who have 
led mankind towards a civilized existence. If you 
have attained to this outlook, a certain deep happi- 
ness will never leave you, whatever your personal 
fate may be. Life will become a communion with 
the great of all ages, and personal death no more 
than a negligible incident. 

If I had the power to organize higher education 
as I should wish it to be, I should seek to substitute 
for the old orthodox religions — which appeal to 
few among the young, and those as a rule 
the least intelligent and the most obscurantist 
— something which is perhaps hardly to be called 
religion, since it is merely a focusing of attention 
upon well-ascertained facts. I should seek to make 
young people vividly aware of the past, vividly 
realizing that the future of man will in all likelihood 
be immeasurably longer than his past, profoundly 
conscious of the minuteness of the planet upon which 
we live and of the fact that life on this planet is 
only a temporary incident; and at the same time 
with these facts which tend to emphasize the insig- 

P 885 



THE CONQUEST G F HAPPINESS 

nificance of the individual I should present quite 
another set of facts designed to impress upon the 
mind of the young the greatness of which the indi- 
vidual is capable, and the knowledge that through- 
out all the depths of stellar space nothing of equal 
value is known to us. Spinoza long ago wrote of 
human bondage and human freedom ; his form and 
his language make his thought difficult of access to 
all but students of philosophy, but the essence of what 
I wish to convey differs little from what he has said. 
A man who has once perceived, however tempor- 
arily and however briefly, what makes greatness of 
soul, can no longer be happy if he allows himself 
to be petty, self-seeking, troubled by trivial mis- 
fortunes, dreading what fate may have in store 
for him. The man capable of greatness of soul will 
open wide the windows of his mind, letting the winds 
blow freely upon it from every portion of the 
universe. He will see himself and life and the world 
as truly as our human limitations will permit; 
realizing the brevity and minuteness of human life, 
he will realize also that in individual minds is 
concentrated whatever of value the known universe 
contains. And he will see that the man whose mind 
mirrors the world becomes in a sense as great as 
the world. In emancipation from the fears that 
beset the slave of circumstance he will experience a 
profound joy, and through all the vicissitudes of 
his outward life he will remain in the depths of his 
being a happy man. 
as6 



IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

Leaving these large speculations and returning 
to our more immediate subject, namely the value of 
impersonal interests, there is another consideration 
which makes them a great help towards happiness. 
Even in the most fortunate lives there are times 
when things go wrong. Few men except bachelors 
have never quarrelled with their wives ; few parents 
have not endured grave anxiety owing to the illnesses 
of their children; few business men have avoided 
times of financial stress ; few professional men have 
not known periods when failure stared them in 
the face. At such times a capacity to become inter- 
ested in something outside the cause of anxiety 
is an immense boon. At such times, when in spite 
of anxiety there is nothing to be done at the moment, 
one man will play chess, another will read detective 
stories, a third will become absorbed in popular 
astronomy, a fourth will console himself by reading 
about the excavations at Ur of the Chaldees. Any 
one of these four is acting wisely, whereas the man 
who does nothing to distract his mind and allows 
his trouble to acquire a complete empire over him 
is acting unwisely and making himself less fit to 
cope with his troubles when the moment for action 
arrives. Very similar considerations apply to irre- 
parable sorrows such as the death of some person 
deeply loved. No good is done to anyone by allowing 
oneself to become sunk in grief on such an occasion. 
Grief is unavoidable and must be expected, but 
everything that can be done should be done to 

887 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

minimize it. It is mere sentimentality to aim, as 
some do, at extracting the very uttermost drop of 
misery from misfortune. I do not of course deny 
that a man may be broken by sorrow, but I do say 
that every man should do his utmost to escape this 
fate, and should seek any distraction, however trivial, 
provided it is not in itself harmful or degrading. 
Among those that I regard as harmful and degrading 
I include such things as drunkenness and drugs, 
of which the purpose is to destroy thought, at least 
for the time being. The proper course is not to 
destroy thought but to turn it into new channels, 
or at any rate into channels remote from the present 
misfortune. It is difficult to do this if life has hitherto 
been concentrated upon a very few interests and 
those few have now become suffused with sorrow. 
To bear misfortune well when it comes, it is wise 
to have cultivated in happier times a certain width 
of interests, so that the mind may find prepared 
for it some undisturbed place suggesting other 
associations and other emotions than those which 
are making the present difficult to bear. 

A man of adequate vitality anr 1 zest will surmount 
all misfortunes by the emergence after each blow 
of an interest in life and the world which cannot 
be narrowed down so much as to make one loss 
fatal. To be defeated by one loss or even by several 
is not something to be admired as a proof of sensi- 
bility, but something to be deplored as a failure in 
vitality. All our affections are at the mercy of death, 

aa6 



IMPERSONAL INTERESTS 

which may strike down those whom we love at any 
moment. It is therefore necessary that our lives 
should not have that narrow intensity which puts 
the whole meaning and purpose of our life at the 
mercy of accident. 

For all these reasons the man who pursues happi- 
ness wisely will aim at the possession of a number of 
subsidiary interests in addition to those central ones 
upon which his life is built. 



829 



CHAPTER XVI 
EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

The golden mean is an uninteresting doctrine, and 
I can remember when I was young rejecting it 
with scorn and indignation, since in those days 
it was heroic extremes that I admired. Truth, 
however, is not always interesting, and many things 
are believed because they are interesting although, 
in fact, there is little other evidence in their favour. 
The golden mean is a case in point: it may be an 
uninteresting doctrine, but in a very great many 
matters it is a true one. 

One respect in which it is necessary to preserve 
the golden mean is as regards the balance between 
effort and resignation. Both doctrines have had 
extreme advocates. The doctrine of resignation has 
been preached by saints and mystics; the doctrine 
of effort has been preached by efficiency experts 
and muscular Christians. Each of these opposing 
schools has had a part of the truth, but not the whole. 
I want in this chapter to try and strike the balance, 
and I shall begin with the case in favour of effort. 

Happiness is not, except in very rare cases, some- 
thing that drops into the mouth, like a ripe fruit, 
by the mere operation of fortunate circumstances. 
That is why I have called this book The Conquest 
of Happiness. For in a world so full of avoidable 
and unavoidable misfortunes, of illness and psycho- 



EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

logical tangles, of struggle and poverty and ill will, 
the man or woman who is to be happy must find 
ways of coping with the multitudinous causes of 
unhappiness by which each individual is assailed. 
In some rare cases no great effort may be required. 
A man of easy good nature, who inherits an ample 
fortune and enjoys good health together with 
simple tastes, may slip through life comfortably and 
wonder what all the fuss is about; a good-looking 
woman of an indolent disposition, if she happens 
to marry a well-to-do husband who demands no 
exertion from her, and if after marriage she does 
not mind growing fat, may equally enjoy a certain 
lazy comfort, provided she has good luck as regards 
her children. But such cases are exceptional. Most 
people are not rich ; many people are not born 
good-natured; many people have uneasy passions 
which make a quiet and well-regulated life seem 
intolerably boring; health is a blessing which no 
one can be sure of preserving; marriage is not 
invariably a source of bliss. For all these reasons, 
happiness must be, for most men and women, an 
achievement rather than a gift of the gods, and in 
this achievement effort, both inward and outward, 
must play a great part. The inward effort may 
include the effort of necessary resignation ; for the 
present, therefore, let us consider only outward 
effort. 

In the case of any person, whether man or woman, 
who has to work for a living, the need of effort in 

231 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

this respect is too obvious to need emphasizing. 
The Indian fakir, it is true, can make a living without 
effort by merely offering a bowl for the alms of the 
faithful, but in Western countries the authorities 
do not view with a favourable eye this method of 
obtaining an income. Moreover, the climate makes 
it less pleasant than in hotter and dryer countries: 
in the winter-time, at any rate, few people are so 
lazy as to prefer idleness out of doors to work in 
heated rooms. Resignation alone, therefore, is not 
in the West one of the roads to fortune. 

To a very large percentage of men in Western 
countries, more than a bare living is necessary to 
happiness, since they desire the feeling of being 
successful. In some occupations, such, for example, 
as scientific research, this feeling can be obtained 
by men who do not earn a large income, but in 
the majority of occupations income has become 
the measure of success. At this point we touch upon 
a matter in regard to which an element of resignation 
is desirable in most cases, since in a competitive 
world conspicuous success is possible only for a 
minority. 

Marriage is a matter in regard to which effort 
may or may not be necessary, according to circum- 
stances. Where one sex is in the minority, as men are 
in England and women are in Australia, members 
of that sex require, as a rule, little effort in order to 
marry as they wish. For members of the sex which 
is in the majority, however, the opposite is the case. 

33a 



EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

The amount of effort and thought expended in 
this direction by women where they are in the 
majority is obvious to anyone who will study the 
advertisements in women's magazines. Men, where 
they are in a majority, frequently adopt more 
expeditious methods, such as skill with the revolver. 
This is natural, since a majority of men occurs 
most frequently on the border-line of civilization. 
I do not know what men would do if a discriminating 
pestilence caused them to become a majority in 
England ; they might have to revert to the manners 
of gallants in a bygone age. 

The amount of effort involved in the successful 
rearing of children is so evident that probably no 
one would deny it. Countries which believe in resig- 
nation and what is mistakenly called a "spiritual" 
view of life are countries with a high infant 
mortality. Medicine, hygiene, asepsis, suitable diet, 
are things not achieved without mundane preoccu- 
pations; they require energy and intelligence 
directed to the material environment. Those who 
think that matter is an illusion are apt to think 
the same of dirt, and by so thinking to cause their 
children to die. 

Speaking more generally, one may say that some 
kind of power forms the normal and legitimate aim 
of every person whose natural desires are not 
atrophied. The kind of power that a man desires 
depends upon his predominant passions; one 
man desires power over the actions of men, another 

233 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

desires power over their thoughts, a third power 
over their emotions. One man desires to change 
the material environment, another desires the 
sense of power that comes from intellectual mastery. 
Every kind of public work involves desire for some 
kind of power, unless it is undertaken solely with 
a view to the wealth obtainable by corruption. 
The man who is actuated by purely altruistic 
suffering caused by the spectacle of human misery 
will, if his suffering is genuine, desire power to 
alleviate misery. The only man totally indifferent 
to power is the man totally indifferent to his fellow- 
men. Some form of desire for power is therefore 
to be accepted as part of the equipment of the kind 
of men out of whom a good community can be 
made. And every form of desire for power involves, 
so long as it is not thwarted, a correlative form of 
effort. To the mentality of the West this conclusion 
may seem a commonplace, but there are not a few 
in Western countries who coquette with what is 
called "the wisdom of the East" just at the moment 
when the East is abandoning it. To them perhaps 
what we have been saying may appear questionable, 
and if so, it has been worth saying. 

Resignation, however, has also its part to play 
in the conquest of happiness, and it is a part no less 
essential than that played by effort. The wise man, 
though he will not sit down under preventable 
misfortunes, will not waste time and emotion 
upon such as are unavoidable, and even such as 
«S4 



EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

are in themselves avoidable he will submit to if 
the time and labour required to avoid them would 
interfere with the pursuit of some more important 
object. Many people get into a fret or a fury over 
every little thing that goes wrong, and in this way 
waste a great deal of energy that might be more 
usefully employed. Even in the pursuit of really 
important objects it is unwise to become so deeply 
involved emotionally that the thought of possible 
failure becomes a constant menace to peace of mind. 
Christianity taught submission to the will of God, 
and even for those who cannot accept this phraseo- 
logy there should be something of the same kind 
pervading all their activities. Efficiency in a practical 
task is not proportional to the emotion that we put 
into it; indeed, emotion is sometimes an obstacle 
to efficiency. The attitude required is that of doing 
one's best while leaving the issue to fate. Resignation 
is of two sorts, one rooted in despair, the other in 
unconquerable hope. The first is bad; the second 
is good. The man who has suffered such funda- 
mental defeat that he has given up hope of serious 
achievement may learn the resignation of despair, 
and, if he does, he will abandon all serious activity. 
He may camouflage his despair by religious phrases, 
or by the doctrine that contemplation is the true 
end of man. but whatever disguise he may adopt 
to conceal his inward defeat, he will remain essen- 
tially useless and fundamentally unhappy. The man 
whose resignation is based on unconquerable hope 

»S5 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

acts in quite a different way. Hope which is to 
be unconquerable must be large and impersonal. 
Whatever my personal activities, I may be defeated 
by death, or by certain kinds of diseases ; I may be 
overcome by my enemies; I may find that I have 
embarked upon an unwise course which cannot 
lead to success. In a thousand ways the failure of 
purely personal hopes may be unavoidable, but 
if personal aims have been part of larger hopes for 
humanity, there is not the same utter defeat when 
failure comes. The man of science who desires to 
make great discoveries himself may fail to do so, 
or may have to abandon his work owing to a blow 
on the head, but if he desires profoundly the progress 
of science and not merely his personal contribution 
to this object, he will not feel the same despair 
as would be felt by a man whose research had purely 
egoistic motives. The man who is working for some 
much needed reform may find all his efforts side- 
tracked by a war, and may be forced to realize 
that what he has worked for will not come about in 
his lifetime. But he need not on that account sink 
into complete despair, provided that he is interested 
in the future of mankind apart from his own partici- 
pation in it. 

The cases we have been considering are those in 
which resignation is most difficult; there are a 
number of others in which it is much easier. These 
are the cases in which only subsidiary purposes 
suffer a check, while the major purposes of life 

236 



EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

continue to offer a prospect of success. A man, for 
example, who is engaged in important work shows a 
failure in the desirable kind of resignation if he is 
distracted by matrimonial unhappiness ; if his work 
is really absorbing, he should regard such incidental 
troubles in the way in which one regards a wet 
day, that is to say, as a nuisance about which it 
would be foolish to make a fuss. 

Some people are unable to bear with patience 
even those minor troubles which make up, if we 
permit them to do so, a very large part of life. They 
are furious when they miss a train, transported with 
rage if their dinner is badly cooked, sunk in despair 
if the chimney smokes, and vowing vengeance 
against the whole industrial order when their 
clothes fail to return from the sanitary steam 
laundry. The energy that such people waste on 
trivial troubles would be sufficient, if more wisely 
directed, to make and unmake empires. The wise 
man fails to observe the dust that the housemaid 
has not dusted, the potato that the cook has not 
cooked, and the soot that the sweep has not swept. 
I do not mean that he takes no steps to remedy these 
matters, provided he has time to do so ; I mean only 
that he deals with them without emotion. Worry 
and fret and irritation are emotions which serve no 
purpose. Those who feel them strongly may say that 
they are incapable of overcoming them, and I am 
not sure that they can be overcome by anything 
short of that fundamental resignation of which we 

«37 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

spoke earlier. The same kind of concentration upon 
large impersonal hopes which enables a man to 
bear personal failure in his work, or the troubles 
of an unhappy marriage, will also make it possible 
for him to be patient when he misses a train or 
drops his umbrella in the mud. If he is of a fretful 
disposition, I am not sure that anything less than 
this will cure him. 

The man who has become emancipated from 
the empire of worry will find life a much more 
cheerful affair than it used to be while he was 
perpetually being irritated. Personal idiosyncrasies 
of acquaintances, which formerly made him wish 
to scream, will now seem merely amusing. When 
Mr. A. for the three hundred and forty-seventh 
time relates the anecdote of the Bishop of Tierra 
del Fuego, he amuses himself by noting the score, 
and feels no inclination to attempt a vain diversion 
by an anecdote of his own. When his boodace 
breaks just as he is in a hurry to catch an early 
morning train, he reflects, after the appropriate 
expletives, that in the history of the cosmos the event 
in question has no very great importance. When 
he is interrupted in a proposal of marriage by a 
visit of a tedious neighbour, he considers that all 
mankind have been liable to this disaster, with the 
exception of Adam, and that even he had his troubles. 
There is no limit to what can be done in the way of 
finding consolation from minor misfortunes by means 
of bizarre analogies and quaint parallels. Every 

938 



EFFORT AND RESIGNATION 

civilized man or woman has, I suppose, some picture 
of himself or herself, and is annoyed when anything 
happens that seems to spoil this picture. The best 
cure is to have not only one picture, but a whole 
gallery, and to select the one appropriate to the 
incident in question. If some of the portraits are a 
trifle laughable, so much the better; it is not wise 
to see oneself all day long as a hero of high tragedy. 
I do not suggest that one should see oneself always 
as a clown in comedy, for those who do this are even 
more irritating; a little tact is required in choosing 
a r61e appropriate to the situation. Of course, if 
you can forget yourself and not play a part at all 
that is admirable. But if playing a part has become 
second nature, consider that you act in repertory, 
and so avoid monotony. 

Many active people are of opinion that the 
slightest grain of resignation, the faintest gleam of 
humour, would destroy the energy with which they 
do their work and the determination by which, as 
they believe, they achieve success. These people, 
in my opinion, are mistaken. Work that is worth 
doing can be done even by those who do not deceive 
themselves either as to its importance or as to the 
ease with which it can be done. Those who can 
only do their work when upheld by self-deception 
had better first take a course in learning to endure 
the truth before continuing their career, since sooner 
or later the need of being sustained by myths will 
cause their work to become harmful instead of 

239 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

beneficial. It is better to do nothing than to do harm. 
Half the useful work in the world consists of combat- 
ing the harmful work. A little time spent in learning 
to appreciate facts is not time wasted, and the work 
that will be done afterwards is far less likely to be 
harmful than the work done by those who need a 
continual inflation of their ego as a stimulant to 
their energy. A certain kind of resignation is involved 
in willingness to face the truth about ourselves; 
this kind, though it may involve pain in the first 
moments, affords ultimately a protection — indeed 
the only possible protection — against the disap- 
pointments and disillusionment^ to which the self- 
deceiver is liable. Nothing is more fatiguing nor, 
in the long run, more exasperating than the daily 
effort to believe things which daily become more 
incredible. To be done with this effort is an indis- 
pensable condition of secure and lasting happiness. 



240 



CHAPTER XVII 
THE HAPPY MAN 

Happiness, as is evident, depends partly upon 
external circumstances and partly upon oneself. 
We have been concerned in this volume with the 
part which depends upon oneself, and we have 
been led to the view that so far as this part is con- 
cerned the recipe for happiness is a very simple one. 
It is thought by many, among whom I think we 
must include Mr. Krutch, whom we considered 
in an earlier chapter, that happiness is impossible 
without a creed of a more or less religious kind. 
It is thought by many who are themselves unhappy 
that their sorrows have complicated and highly 
intellectualized sources. I do not believe that such 
things are genuine causes of either happiness or 
unhappiness; I think they are only symptoms. 
The man who is unhappy will, as a rule, adopt 
an unhappy creed, while the man who is happy 
will adopt a happy creed; each may attribute his 
happiness or unhappiness to his beliefs, while the 
real causation is the other way round. Certain things 
are indispensable to the happiness of most men, 
but these are simple things: food and shelter, 
health, love, successful work and the respect of one's 
own herd. To some people parenthood also is 
essential. Where these things are lacking, only the 
exceptional man can achieve happiness, but where 

Q 241 



THE CONQ.UEST OF HAPPINESS 

they are enjoyed, or can be obtained by well-directed 
effort, the man who is still unhappy is suffering 
from some psychological maladjustment which, if 
it is very grave, may need the services of a psychia- 
trist, but can in ordinary cases be cured by the 
patient himself, provided he sets about the matter 
in the right way. Where outward circumstances 
are not definitely unfortunate, a man should be 
able to achieve happiness, provided that his passions 
and interests are directed outward, not inward. 
It should be our endeavour therefore, both in 
education and in attempts to adjust ourselves to 
the world, to aim at avoiding self-centred passions 
and at acquiring those affections and those interests 
which will prevent our thoughts from dwelling 
perpetually upon ourselves. It is not the nature of 
most men to be happy in a prison, and the passions 
which shut us up in ourselves constitute one of the 
worst kinds of prisons. Among such passions some 
of the commonest are fear, envy, the sense of sin, 
self-pity and self-admiration. In all these our desires 
are centred upon ourselves: there is no genuine 
interest in the outer world, but only a concern lest 
it should in some way injure us or fail to feed our 
ego. Fear is the principal reason why men are so 
unwilling to admit facts and so anxious to wrap 
themselves round in a warm garment of myth. But 
the thorns tear the warm garment and the cold 
blasts penetrate through the rents, and the man 
who has become accustomed to its warmth suffers 
243 



THE HAPPY MAN 

far more from these blasts than a man who has 
hardened himself to them from the first. Moreover, 
those who deceive themselves generally know at 
bottom that they are doing so, and live in a state 
of apprehension lest some untoward event should 
force unwelcome realizations upon them. 

One of the great drawbacks to self-centred 
passions is that they afford so little variety in life. 
The man who loves only himself cannot, it is true, 
be accused of promiscuity in his affections, but he 
is bound in the end to suffer intolerable boredom 
from the invariable sameness of the object of his 
devotion. The man who suffers from a sense of sin 
is suffering from a particular kind of self-love. 
In all this vast universe the thing that appears to 
him of most importance is that he himself should 
be virtuous. It is a grave defect in certain forms of 
traditional religion that they have encouraged this 
particular kind of self-absorption. 

The happy man is the man who lives objectively, 
who has free affections and wide interests, who 
secures his happiness through these interests and 
affections and through the fact that they, in turn, 
make him an object of interest and affection to 
many others. To be the recipient of affection is a 
potent cause of happiness, but the man who demands 
affection is not the man upon whom it is bestowed. 
The man who receives affection is, speaking broadly, 
the man who gives it. But it is useless to attempt to 
give it as a calculation, in the way in which one 

»43 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

might lend money at interest, for a calculated 
affection is not genuine and is not felt to be so by 
the recipient. 

What then can a man do who is unhappy because 
he is encased in self? So long as he continues to 
think about the causes of his unhappiness, he con- 
tinues to be self-centred and therefore does not get 
outside the vicious circle ; if he is to get outside it, 
it must be by genuine interests, not by simulated 
interests adopted merely as a medicine. Although 
this difficulty is real, there is nevertheless much 
that he can do if he has rightly diagnosed his trouble. 
If, for example, his trouble is due to a sense of sin, 
conscious or unconscious, he can first persuade his 
conscious mind that he has no reason to feel sinful, 
and then proceed, by the kind of technique that we 
have considered in earlier chapters, to plant this 
rational conviction in his unconscious mind, con- 
cerning himself meanwhile with some more or 
less neutral activity. If he succeeds in dispelling 
the sense of sin, it is probable that genuinely objective 
interests will arise spontaneously. If his trouble is 
self-pity, he can deal with it in the same manner 
after first persuading himself that there is nothing 
extraordinarily unfortunate in his circumstances. 
If fear is his trouble, let him practise exercises 
designed to give courage. Courage in war has been 
recognized from time immemorial as an important 
virtue, and a great part of the training of boys and 
young men has been devoted to producing a type 
844 



THE HAPPY MAN 

of character capable of fearlessness in battle. But 
moral courage and intellectual courage have been 
much less studied; they also, however, have their 
technique. Admit to yourself every day at least 
one painful truth; you will find this quite as useful 
as the Boy Scout's daily kind action. Teach yourself 
to feel that life would still be worth living even if 
you were not, as of course you are, immeasurably 
superior to all your friends in virtue and in intelli- 
gence. Exercises of this sort prolonged through 
several years will at last enable you to admit facts 
without flinching, and will, in so doing, free you 
from the empire of fear over a very large field. 

What the objective interests are to be that will 
arise in you when you have overcome the disease 
of self-absorption must be left to the spontaneous 
workings ofyour nature and of externalcircumstances. 
Do not say to yourself in advance, "I should be 
happy if I could become absorbed in stamp-col- 
lecting", and thereupon set to work to collect 
stamps, for it may well happen that you will fail 
altogether to find stamp-collecting interesting. Only 
what genuinely interests you can be of any use to 
you, but you may be pretty sure that genuine objec- 
tive interests will grow up as soon as you have 
learnt not to be immersed in self. 

The happy life is to an extraordinary extent 
the same as the good life. Professional moralists 
have made too much of self-denial, and in so 
doing have put the emphasis in the wrong place. 

245 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

Conscious self-denial leaves a man self-absorbed 
and vividly aware of what he has sacrificed; in 
consequence it fails often of its immediate object 
and almost always of its ultimate purpose. What is 
needed is not self-denial, but that kind of direction 
of interest outward which will lead spontaneously 
and naturally to the same acts that a person absorbed 
in the pursuit of his own virtue could only perform 
by means of conscious self-denial. I have written 
in this book as a hedonist, that is to say, as one who 
regards happiness as the good, but the acts to be 
recommended from the point of view of the hedonist 
are on the whole the same as those to be recom- 
mended by the sane moralist. The moralist, however, 
is too apt, though this is not, of course, universally 
true, to stress the act rather than the state of mind. 
The effects of an act upon the agent will be widely 
different, according to his state of mind at the 
moment. If you see a child drowning and save it 
as the result of a direct impulse to bring help, you 
will emerge none the worse morally. If, on the 
other hand, you say to yourself, "It is the part of 
virtue to succour the helpless, and I wish to be a 
virtuous man, therefore I must save this child", 
you will be an even worse man afterwards than 
you were before. What applies in this extreme 
case applies in many other instances that are less 
obvious. 

There is another difference, somewhat more 
subtle, between the attitude towards life that I have 

246 



THE HAPPY MAN 

been recommending and that which is recom- 
mended by the traditional moralists. The traditional 
moralist, for example, will say that love should be 
unselfish. In a certain sense he is right, that is to 
say, it should not be selfish beyond a point, but it 
should undoubtedly be of such a nature that one's 
own happiness is bound up in its success. If a man 
were to invite a lady to marry him on the ground 
that he ardently desired her happiness and at the 
same time considered that she would afford him 
ideal opportunities of self-abnegation, I think it 
may be doubted whether she would be altogether 
pleased. Undoubtedly we should desire the happiness 
of those whom we love, but not as an alternative 
to our own. In fact the whole antithesis between 
self and the rest of the world, which is implied in 
the doctrine of self-denial, disappears as soon as 
we have any genuine interest in persons or things 
outside ourselves. Through such interests a man 
comes to feel himself part of the stream of life, not 
a hard separate entity like a billiard-ball, which 
can have no relation with other such entities except 
that of collision. All unhappiness depends upon 
some kind of disintegration or lack of integration ; 
there is disintegration within the self through lack 
of co-ordination between the conscious and the 
unconscious mind; there is lack of integration 
between the self and society, where the two are not 
knit together by the force of objective interests and 
affections. The happy man is the man who does 

247 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 

not suffer from either of these failures of unity, 
whose personality is neither divided against itself 
nor pitted against the world. Such a man feels 
himself a citizen of the universe, enjoying freely the 
spectacle that it offers and the joys that it affords, 
untroubled by the thought of death because he 
feels himself not really separate from those who 
will come after him. It is in such profound instinctive 
union with the stream of life that the greatest joy 
is to be found. 



348 



INDEX 



acquiescence, the attitude of, 
128 

admiration, 86, 106 

adolescence often a time of 
great unhappiness, 129 

affection, 175, 177-85, 243 

alcohol, 16, 71, 100 

altruism, 118-20. 123 

America, 49, 51, 130 

Angelo, Michael, 216 

animals and boredom, 57, 94 

anxieties, 77 

applause, desire for, 122 

aristocracy, one of the advan- 
tages of, 137 

ascetic element in morality, 
100 

autobiography, the author's 
18-19 

Bacon, Roger, 35-6 
belief in a cause, 152-3 
birth-rate, decline of the, 

193-4 
Blake, William, 128 
boredom, 18, 57-68, 209 
Bront«, Emily and Charlotte, 

128 
Browning, Robert, 37-8 
business man, the, 46-50 
Byron, 28 

Caution in love, 185 
child and envy, the, 83, 87 
child and inventiveness, the, 

64 



China and Japan, 148-9 
cities, 190 
competition, 91 
competitive success and hap- 
piness, 50, 52, 55 
congenial companionship, 132, 

i38> 152 

conscience, 96-7 

conscious upon the uncon- 
scious, operation of the, 
76, 102, 220-1 

constructiveness, 212-14, 217 

conventional people, 131 

courage, 79, 244-5 

craftsman's joy, the, 150-1 

creeds, 241 

cure for envy, 86-9 

Democracy, 84, 91, 191 
diversity of morals and 

beliefs, 126 
drink, 16, 25, 169, 228 
drugs, 61-2, 228 

Earth, contact with, 66-8, 

81 
EccUsiastes, 28-31, 33 
effort, 230-4 
ego, unimportance of one's, 

74, 123, 222 
emotional fatigue, 74-5 
enjoyment, 16, 51 
environment, 133 
envy, 80-95 
envy, fatigue as a cause of, 

92 

»49 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 



excitement, 58, 60, 6a, 65, 

79-81, no. 
external interests, 320, 222 

Family, the, 186-207 
fanaticism, 222-3 
fatigue, 69-81, 92, 220 
fear, 77-9, 242, 244 
fear of public opinion, 126- 

39 
flat, life in a, 190-1 
freedom of the Press, 139 

Golden mean, the, 230 
gormandizer, the, 158, 165-8 
grief, 227-8 

Happiness an achievement, 

231 
happiness and competitive 

success, 50 
happiness, sources of, 143-4, 

197, 208, 2io, 217-18, 
226, 228-9, 231 , 234, 240-5 

happiness, the best touch- 
stone for, no 

happiness the only cure for 
envy, 86-7 

hatred, the habit of, 213-14 

hatred stirred by propaganda, 

94 
hedonism, 246 
herd, fear of the, 97-8, 126, 

131-3 
hobbies, 153-4 
hope must be impersonal, 236 
housewife, the, 188-9, 210 

250 



Ibsen, 41-2 

idealistic theories, 84, 92, 119 

ill-treatment, hallucinations 

of, 1 11-13 
impersonal interests, 219, 227 
individual, problem of the, 17 
infantile moral teaching, 99, 

101, 104-5 
infantile suggestions, 103 
insanity, in, 124 
instinctive happiness, rareness 

of, 93 
intelligentsia, young, 148 
interest in oneself, 19 
interest in persons, 154-5 
interest in things, 156 
introvert, malady of the, 160, 

180 

Justice and envy, 92 

Krutch, J. W., 28, 32-6, 
41-4, 241 

Leisure, employment of, 52-3, 

55-6 
Lenin, 215 

Liaisons Dangereuses, 22 
love, 36-41, 67, 247 
lunacy, 23-4, 1 1 1 

Malicious gossip, 1 13-14 
marriage, 80-1, 232 
Massemmsch, Ernst Toller's, 

43 
masters and slaves, 191 
maternal element in love, the, 

21 



INDEX 



maxims to prevent persecution 

mania, 118-25 
megalomania, 23-5 
mental discipline, 7a, 75, 89 
minor interests, 219, 229 
moderation, 165, 167 
Modern Temper, The, Krutch's, 

28, 32-34 
modesty, 89-90 
monk, the, 19-20 
monotony, 64-5 
moralist, the traditional, 246- 7 
motherhood, 204-7 

Napoleon, 24 
Narcissism, 20-3, 25 
nervous breakdown, 75 
nervous fatigue, 69-70, 73, 
81, 220 

Objective interests, 243, 245 

oblivion, 169 

(Edipus complex, the, 10 1, 

192 
opinions of others, the, 136 
overwork, 74 

Parental affection, 198-9 
parental feeling, 41 
parenthood, 200-4 
parents and children, 192-3 
passions and reason, the, 

108-10, 166-7 
peacocks, 90-1 
persecution mania, 11 1-25 
pessimism, 32-4 
philosophy of competition, 

54-5 



physical fatigue, 69 
pleasure of work, the, 149-52, 

211-12, 216 
pleasure, pursuit of, 16, 25, 

80-1 
pleasures of achievement, 145 
pleasures of great men, the, 

64 
power, love of, 23-4, 119, 

203, 233-4 
preventatives of persecution 

mania, 118 
propaganda and hatred, 93-4 
proportion, sense of, 116, 

221-3 
Protestantism and sin, 96 
Protestants and Catholics, 

126-7 
psycho-analytic repression, 24 
public opinion, tyranny of, 

130, 136, 138-9 
Puritanism, 54-5 

Rationality, 108-9 
reading, 52-3, 63 
reason, hatred of, 109-10 
religion, 225, 241 
Religious Orders, 35 
religious psychology of sin, 96 
resignation, 230-40 
Retreat from Parenthood, Jean 

Aylin's, 189 
Roland, Madame, 84 
Russian, the young, 148 

Sages of antiquity, the, 36 
scientists, happiness of, 145-7 
secret of happiness, 157 

«5» 



THE CONQUEST OF HAPPINESS 



security, sense of, 176-7 
self-absorption, so, 107, 243, 

245 

self-centred passions, 242-3 

self-confidence, 177 

self-deception, 124-5 

self-denial, 245-7 

self-regarding motives, 120 

sense of sin, 20-1, 35, 96, 98, 
102, 106, 244 

sex and sin, 101-2 

sex attraction, 67, 184 

sex education, 102 

sex majority, 232-3 

sexual source of envy, 93 

Shakespeare, 41-3, 67, 215 

sin, consciousness of, 20-1, 
35» 96, 9 8 > Ioa » Io6 » io 9> 
243 

skill, 211, 224 

social freedom, 137 

social inequalities, 91 

social justice, 92 

social persecution, 139 

social system, the, 17 

socialism, equalitarian doc- 
trines of, 91 

Solomon, 31-3, 88 

Spinoza, 226 

spinster, the, 187 

sterility and civilization, 194 

Stoics, the, 40 

struggle for life, the, 45-6 



superstitions of childhood, 
105 

Test of genius, 122 

toleration, 139 

tragedy, 41-4 

tyranny of public opinion, 1 30 

Unhappiness, Causes of, 17- 
18,24-5,27,111, 127,155, 
185, 208, 220, 231, 235, 
242, 244, 247 

unhappiness, kinds of, 15-16, 
27 

unloved, feeling of being, 

unrecognized merit, 121 

Vanity, 23, 1 19 

Victorians and love, the, 36-9 

Women and external interests, 

222 
women and zest, 172-4 
Wordsworth, 65 
work, 208-18, 223 
worry, 72-3, 75-8, 237-8 

Youth and the tyranny of 
ignorance, 133-5 

Zest, 158-9, 161, 163-5, 
l6 9"75> 20 9» 228 



952 




GEORGE ALLEN & UNWIN LTD 

London: 40 Museum Street, W.C.i 

Cape Town: 73 St. George's Street 

Sydney, N.S.W.: Wynyard Square 

Auckland, N.Z. : 41 Albert Street 

Toronto: 91 Wellington Street, West 



books by BERTRAND RUSSELL, f.r.s. 
Principles of Social Reconstruction 

Cr. Svo. Tenth Impression 51., 3s. 6d. 

Roads to Freedom 

Socialism, Anarchism and Syndicalism 
Cr. 8no. Third Edition. Seventh Impression $s., y. 6d. 

Introduction to Mathematical Philosophy 

Library of Philosophy 
Demy Svo. Second Edition. Fourth Impression 12s. bd. 

The Analysis of Mind 

Demy Svo. Third Impression Library of Philosophy 12s. bd. 

Our Knowledge of the External World 

As a Field for Scientific Method in Philosophy 

Demy Svo. New and Revised Edition ys. bd. 

Fcap. Svo. Free Thought and Official Propaganda 2 s., is. 

La. Cr. Svo. Justice in War Time 5S , 

On Education 

Especially in Early Childhood 
Cr. Svo. Fifth Impression 5s. , 3s. bd. 

An Outline of Philosophy 

Demy Svo. Second Impression 12s. 6d. 

Sceptical Essays 

La. Cr. Svo. Second Impression ys. bd. 

Marriage and Morals 

La. Cr. Svo. Fifth Impression ys. bd. 

The Conquest of Happiness 

La. Cr. Svo. Fifth Impression ys. bd. 

La. Cr. Svo. The Scientific Outlook ?s . td 

Mysticism and Logic 

Cr. Svo. Seventh Impression ys. bd. 

La. Cr. Svo. Education and the Social Order 7S 6rf 

with SCOTT NEARING 

Cr. Svo. Bolshevism and the West 2S- 

with DORA RUSSELL 

The Prospects of Industrial Civilisation 

Cr. Svo. Cheaper Edition. Third Impression 5s., 35. bd. 

All prices are net 



Leisure in the Modern World 

Demy too. by C. DELISLE BURNS 8s. 6i. 

"An extremely interesting book. . . . The work of an optimist and, as 
«uch, makes comfortable reading." — Time and Tide 
"Commend me to C. Delisle Burns for common sense, uncommon social 
sanity and a forward-looking view . . . should start a peaceful revolt 
here and now." — Daily Herald 

Changes in Family Life 

by Sir WILLIAM BEVERIDGE 
Cr. Bvo. and Others 3s. 6d. 

"A first step in a suggested scientific analysis of family life as it exists 
in this country to-day and the way it differs from daily life of a genera- 
tion or more ago." — Times 
"Sure to be eagerly read." — Listener 

"Offers abundant material for argument, a goodly stock of information 
and likewise food for thought!" — Time and Tide 

The Recording Angel 

A Report from Earth 

Cr. Svo. by J. A. HOBSON 3 s. 6d. 

"A troubled lower world could do with more of these trenchant celestial 

comments. ' ' — Manchester Guardian 

"Mr. Hobson covers a lot of ground, and is to be congratulated on the 

ingenuity of his transitions." — Times Literary Supplement 

"Brief, engaging book." — New Statesman 

The Modern State 

by LEONARD WOOLF, Lord EUSTACE PERCY, 

Mrs. SIDNEY WEBB, Professor W. G. S. ADAMS, 

Cr. Svo. Sir ARTHUR SALTER 7 s. 6d. 

These talks, broadcast in the "Changing World" symposium, 1931-32, 
and now published in book form, are designed to show the rapid 
succession of changes in the political and social field, resulting from 
forces which had been gradually accumulating during the nineteenth 
century. Mr. Leonard Woolf and Lord Eustace Percy each write on 
"Can Democracy Survive?"; Mrs. Sidney Webb discusses "Diseases 
of Organized Society"; Professor W. G. S. Adams writes on "Has 
Parliamentary Government Failed ?" and Sir Arthur Salter on "The 
Problem of World Government." 



Set the Children Free! 

by FRITZ WITTELS 

TRANSLATED FROM THE GERMAN BY EdEN AND CEDAR PAUL 

Demy Svo. ios. 

''A coherent and very readable application of the Freudian thesis to 
the treatment of young children." — Manchester Guardian 

"A real contribution to education . . . remarkable and controversial." 
— Sheffield Daily Independent 

Dark Places in Education 

by Dr. WILLI SCHOHAUS 

Principal of the Teachers' Training College, Kreuzlingen, Switzerland 

Foreword by P. B. Ballard, D.Litt. 

TRANSLATED BY MARY CHADWICK, S.R.N. 

Demy Svo. 12s. 6d. 

"The Editor of an educational paper in the North of Switzerland 
invited his readers to send him answers to the simple question: 'From 
what did you suffer most at school ?' The response . . . led to two notable , 
results. One was that the paper lost 400 of its subscribers. . . . The 
other result was that Dr. Schohaus selected 78 of the most typical 
'reports,' classified them, prefaced them by a long essay of bis own, 
and published them in book form. Of that book this is an English 
translation. These pages are worth reading over and over again, for 
they illuminate the dark places and set before us an ideal of education 
which is at once noble, inspiring and humane." — From the Foreword 



Youth and Sex 

by MEYRICK BOOTH 
Cr. Svo. 5«. 

"Should commend itself very highly to parents and teachers. . . . He 
has some interesting commentaries on modern education which may 
provoke controversy." — Times Literary Supplement 

"One of the sanest, healthiest and most comprehensive books on modern 
psychology. . . . Underlying all he writes is a fine and subtle mysticism 
which lends an unusual air of distinction to what he says." — Sunday 
Referee 

All prices are net 
jy . ■v 

LONDON: GEORGE AtLEN & UNWIN LTD 



w 



